 
 
UNITED ST ATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☑ ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13  OR 15(d)  OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended  December 31, 2021
or
 
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d)  OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______________ to ______________         
 
Commission File Number: 001-13545  (Prologis, Inc.) 001-14245  (Prologis, L.P .)
 
 
Prologis, Inc.
Prologis, L.P .
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Maryland  (Prologis, Inc.)
Delaware  (Prologis, L.P .)94-3281941  (Prologis, Inc.)
94-3285362  (Prologis, L.P .)
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
  
Pier 1, Bay 1 , San Francisco , California 94111
(Address or principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
 
(415) 394-9000
(Registrants’  telephone number , including area code)
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year , if changed since last report)
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
 
  Title of Each Class  Trading Symbol(s)  Name of Each Exchange on Which Registered
Prologis, Inc.  Common Stock, $0.01 par value  PLD  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  3.000% Notes due 2026  PLD/26  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  2.250% Notes due 2029  PLD/29  New York Stock Exchange
       
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
Prologis, Inc. – NONE
Prologis, L.P . – NONE
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☑  No ☐ Prologis, L.P .:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☐ No ☑ Prologis, L.P .:  Yes ☐ No ☑
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant: (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding
12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Prologis,
Inc.: Yes ☑  No ☐  Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during
the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter periods that the registrant was required to submit such files). Prologis, Inc.: Yes ☑  No ☐ Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth
company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act
(check one):
 
Prologis, Inc.: ☑ Large accelerated filer ☐ Accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company
 ☐ Non-accelerated filer  ☐ Emerging growth company
 
Prologis, L.P.: ☐ Large accelerated filer ☐ Accelerated filer ☐   Smaller reporting company
 ☑ Non-accelerated filer  ☐   Emerging growth company
 
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial
accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial
reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report.  ☑
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☐  No ☑ Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☐  No ☑
 
Based on the closing price of Prologis, Inc.’s common stock on June 30, 2021, the aggregate market value of the voting common equity held by nonaffiliates of Prologis, Inc.
was $87,997,816,686.
 
The number of shares of Prologis, Inc.’s common stock outstanding at February 7, 2022, was approximately 740,000,000.
 
 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
 
Portions of Part III of this report are incorporated by reference to the registrant’s definitive proxy statement for the 2021 annual meeting of its stockholders or will be provided in
an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
Auditor Name: KPMG LLP  Auditor Location: Denver , CO  Auditor Firm ID: 185
 
 
 
 
EXPLANATORY NOTE
 
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021, of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .
Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to “Prologis, Inc.” or the “Parent” mean Prologis, Inc. and its
consolidated subsidiaries; and references to “Prologis, L.P .” or the “Operating Partnership” or the “OP” mean Prologis, L.P ., and its
consolidated subsidiaries. The terms “the Company ,” “Prologis,” “we,” “our” or “us” means the Parent and the OP  collectively .
 
The Parent is a real estate investment trust (a “REIT”) and the general partner of the OP . At December 31, 2021, the Parent owned
97.32% common general partnership interest in the OP  and substantially all of the preferred units in the OP . The remaining
2.68% common limited partnership interests are owned by unaf filiated investors and certain current and former directors and of ficers of
the Parent.
 
We operate the Parent and the OP  as one enterprise. The management of the Parent consists of the same members as the
management of the OP . These members are of ficers of the Parent and employees of the OP  or one of its subsidiaries. As sole general
partner , the Parent has control of the OP  through complete responsibility and discretion in the day-to-day management and therefore,
consolidates the OP  for financial reporting purposes. Because the only significant asset of the Parent is its investment in the OP , the
assets and liabilities of the Parent and the OP  are the same on their respective financial statements.
 
We believe combining the annual reports on Form 10-K of the Parent and the OP  into this single report results in the following benefits:
 
• enhances investors’  understanding of the Parent and the OP  by enabling investors to view the business as a whole in the same
manner as management views and operates the business;
 
• eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined and readable presentation as a substantial portion of the
Company’ s disclosure applies to both the Parent and the OP; and
 
• creates time and cost ef ficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two separate reports.
 
It is important to understand the few dif ferences between the Parent and the OP  in the context of how we operate the Company . The
Parent does not conduct business itself, other than acting as the sole general partner of the OP  and issuing public equity from time to
time. The OP  holds substantially all the assets of the business, directly or indirectly . The OP  conducts the operations of the business and
is structured as a partnership with no publicly traded equity . Except for net proceeds from equity issuances by the Parent, which are
contributed to the OP  in exchange for partnership units, the OP  generates capital required by the business through the OP’ s operations,
incurrence of indebtedness and issuance of partnership units to third parties.
 
The presentation of noncontrolling interests, stockholders’  equity and partners’  capital are the main areas of dif ference between the
consolidated financial statements of the Parent and those of the OP . The dif ferences in the presentations between stockholders’  equity
and partners’  capital result from the dif ferences in the equity and capital issuances in the Parent and in the OP .
                
The preferred stock, common stock, additional paid-in capital, accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and distributions in
excess of net earnings of the Parent are presented as stockholders’  equity in the Parent’ s consolidated financial statements. These
items represent the common and preferred general partnership interests held by the Parent in the OP  and are presented as general
partner ’s capital within partners’  capital in the OP’ s consolidated financial statements. The common limited partnership interests held by
the limited partners in the OP  are presented as noncontrolling interest within equity in the Parent’ s consolidated financial statements and
as limited partners’  capital within partners’  capital in the OP’ s consolidated financial statements.
 
To highlight the dif ferences between the Parent and the OP , separate sections in this report, as applicable, individually discuss the
Parent and the OP , including separate financial statements and separate Exhibit 31 and 32 certifications. In the sections that combine
disclosure of the Parent and the OP , this report refers to actions or holdings as being actions or holdings of Prologis.
 
 
 
Table of Contents
 
 
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
Item  Description  Page
  PART I   
1.  Business  3
  The Company  3
  Operating Segments  5
  Future Growth  6
  Code of Ethics and Business Conduct  11
  Environmental Stewardship, Social Responsibility and Governance  11
  Environmental Matters  12
  Governmental Matters  12
  Insurance Coverage  12
1A.  Risk Factors  12
1B.  Unresolved Staf f Comments  21
2.  Properties  21
  Geographic Distribution  21
  Lease Expirations  24
  Co-Investment V entures  25
3.  Legal Proceedings  25
4.  Mine Safety Disclosures  25
  PART II   
5.  Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities  25
  Market Information and Holders  25
  Preferred Stock Dividends  26
  Sales of Unregistered Securities  26
  Purchases of Equity Securities  27
  Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans  27
  Other Stockholder Matters  27
6.  [Reserved]  27
7.  Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  27
  Management’ s Overview  27
  Results of Operations  28
  Environmental Matters  37
  Liquidity and Capital Resources  37
  Critical Accounting Policies  41
  New Accounting Pronouncements  42
  Funds from Operations Attributable to Common Stockholders/Unitholders  42
7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk  44
8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  45
9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure  45
9A.  Controls and Procedures  45
9B.  Other Information  46
9C.  Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections  47
  PART III   
10.  Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance  47
11.  Executive Compensation  47
12.  Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  47
13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence  47
14.  Principal Accounting Fees and Services  47
  PART IV   
15.  Exhibits, Financial Statements and Schedules  47
16.  Form 10-K Summary  48
 
2
Table of Contents
 
 
The statements in this report that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities
Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. These forward-looking statements are
based on current expectations, estimates and projections about the industry and markets in which we operate as well as management’s
beliefs and assumptions. Such statements involve uncertainties that could significantly impact our financial results. Words such as
“expects,” “anticipates,” “intends,” “plans,” “believes,” “seeks,” and “estimates” including variations of such words and similar expressions
are intended to identify such forward-looking statements, which generally are not historical in nature. All statements that address operating
performance, events or developments that we expect or anticipate will occur in the future — including statements relating to rent and
occupancy growth, acquisition and development activity, contribution and disposition activity, general conditions in the geographic areas
where we operate, our debt, capital structure and financial position, our ability to earn revenues from co-investment ventures, form new co-
investment ventures and the availability of capital in existing or new co-investment ventures — are forward-looking statements. These
statements are not guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict.
Although we believe the expectations reflected in any forward-looking statements are based on reasonable assumptions, we can give no
assurance that our expectations will be attained, and therefore actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or
forecasted in such forward-looking statements. Some of the factors that may affect outcomes and results include, but are not limited to: (i)
international, national, regional and local economic and political climates and conditions; (ii) changes in global financial markets, interest
rates and foreign currency exchange rates; (iii) increased or unanticipated competition for our properties; (iv) risks associated with
acquisitions, dispositions and development of properties, including increased development costs due to additional regulatory requirements
related to climate change; (v) maintenance of Real Estate Investment Trust (“REIT”) status, tax structuring and changes in income tax laws
and rates; (vi) availability of financing and capital, the levels of debt that we maintain and our credit ratings; (vii) risks related to our
investments in our co-investment ventures, including our ability to establish new co-investment ventures; (viii) risks of doing business
internationally, including currency risks; (ix) environmental uncertainties, including risks of natural disasters; (x) risks related to the
coronavirus (“COVID-19”) pandemic; and (xi) those additional factors discussed under Part I, Item 1A. Risk Factors in this report. We
undertake no duty to update any forward-looking statements appearing in this report except as may be required by law.
 
PART I
 
ITEM 1. Business
 
Prologis, Inc. is a self-administered and self-managed REIT  and is the sole general partner of Prologis, L.P . through which it holds
substantially all of its assets. W e operate Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . as one enterprise and, therefore, our discussion and analysis
refers to Prologis, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Prologis, L.P . We invest in real estate through wholly owned
subsidiaries and other entities through which we co-invest with partners and investors. W e have a significant ownership interest in the
co-investment ventures, which may be consolidated or unconsolidated based on our level of control of the entity .
 
Prologis, Inc. began operating as a fully integrated real estate company in 1997 and elected to be taxed as a REIT  under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (“Internal Revenue Code” or “IRC”). W e believe the current organization and method of operation
enable Prologis, Inc. to maintain its status as a REIT . Prologis, L.P . was also formed in 1997.
 
We operate and manage our business on an owned and managed (“O&M”) basis and therefore evaluate the operating performance of
the properties for our O&M portfolio, which includes our consolidated properties and properties owned by our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures. W e make operating decisions based on our total O&M portfolio, as we manage the properties without regard to
their ownership. W e also evaluate our results based on our proportionate economic ownership of each property included in the O&M
portfolio (“our share”) to reflect our share of the financial results of the O&M portfolio.
 
Included in our discussion below are references to funds from operations (“FFO”) and net operating income (“NOI”), neither of which are
U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). See Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations for a reconciliation of Net Earnings Attributable to Common Stockholders/Unitholders  in the Consolidated
Statements of Income to our FFO measures and a reconciliation of NOI to Operating Income, the most directly comparable GAAP
measures.
 
Our corporate headquarters is located at Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111, and our other principal of fice locations are in
Amsterdam, Denver , Mexico City , Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
 
Our Internet address is www .prologis.com. All reports required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) are
available and can be accessed free of charge through the Investor Relations section of our website. The common stock of Prologis, Inc.
is listed on the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”) under the ticker “PLD” and is a component of the Standard & Poor ’s (“S&P”) 500.
 
THE COMPANY
 
We are the global leader in logistics real estate with a focus on high-barrier , high growth markets. W e own, manage and develop well-
located, high-quality logistics facilities in 19 countries across four continents. Our portfolio focuses on the world’ s most vibrant centers of
commerce and our scale across these locations allows us to respond to our customers’  diverse logistics requirements. Our teams
actively manage our portfolio to provide comprehensive real estate services, including leasing, property management, development,
acquisitions and dispositions. Our property dispositions allow us to recycle capital and contribute to self-funding our development and
acquisition activities.
3
Table of Contents
 
 
With the broadening of e-commerce adoption driving requirements for increased warehouse space to store inventory , surging customer
demand has continued to outpace supply . We believe this demand surge is driven by three primary factors: (i) overall consumption
growth; (ii) customer supply chains still re-positioning to address the significant shift to e-commerce, as well as preparing for higher
growth and service expectations; and (iii) our customers’  desire for more supply chain resiliency . With inventory-to-sales ratios below
pre-pandemic levels, our customers not only need to restock for this shortfall, but build an additional safety stock. W e believe these
forces have placed a premium on speed-to-market and flexibility , driving demand for years to come.  
 
The scale of our 1.0 billion square foot portfolio allows us to help our customers in a multitude of unique ways. W e continue to focus on
differentiated ways to meet our customers’  needs through our Prologis Essentials business. This program includes product and service
solutions for our customers’  operations, workforce, energy , transportation and data and analytic needs. Our integrated suite of solutions
allows our customers to benefit from our global scale, strategic partnerships with vendors and local expertise to obtain services and
products more ef ficiently . We use our proprietary data and analytics to provide our customers actionable insights on everything from
inventory , shipping, security , communications management and dock visibility .
 
Prologis Essentials has a strong sustainability component to its suite of services, which supports our customers’  progress toward their
sustainability goals. This includes new development and redevelopment of buildings to specifications that align with leading sustainable
building standards and implementation of energy solutions such as solar power and LED lighting. As we explore additional ways to
deliver revenue-generating sustainability solutions, we created a new senior leadership role in 2021 – chief sustainability and energy
officer. We also are anticipating the introduction of electric vehicle (“EV”) fleets in logistics and are making long-term investments in our
portfolio and talent to be well prepared for the future of EV trucking and logistics.
  
At December 31, 2021, we owned or had investments in, on a wholly-owned basis or through ventures, properties and development
projects (based on gross book value and total expected investment at completion, respectively) in the following geographies:
 
 
Throughout this discussion, we reflect amounts in the United States (“U.S.”) dollar , our reporting currency . Included in these amounts are
consolidated and unconsolidated investments denominated in foreign currencies, principally the British pound sterling, Canadian dollar ,
euro and Japanese yen that are impacted by fluctuations in exchange rates when translated to U.S. dollars. W e mitigate our exposure to
foreign currency fluctuations by investing outside the U.S. through co-investment ventures, borrowing in the functional currency of our
subsidiaries and utilizing derivative financial instruments.
 
4
Table of Contents
 
 
OPERATING SEGMENTS
 
Our business comprises two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital.
 
Below is information summarizing consolidated activity within our segments over the last three years (in millions):
 
 
(1) NOI from Real Estate Operations is calculated directly from our Consolidated Financial Statements as Rental Revenues  and
Development Management and Other Revenues less Rental Expenses  and Other Expenses.  NOI from Strategic Capital is
calculated directly from our Consolidated Financial Statements as Strategic Capital  Revenues  less Strategic Capital  Expenses.
 
(2) A developed property moves into the operating portfolio when it meets our definition of stabilization, which is the earlier of when a
property that was developed has been completed for one year , is contributed to a co-investment venture following completion or is
90% occupied. Amounts represent our total expected investment (“TEI”), which includes the estimated cost of development or
expansion, land, construction and leasing costs.
 
 
Real Estate Operations
 
Rental.  Rental operations comprise the largest component of our operating segments and generally contribute 85% to 90% of our
consolidated revenues, earnings and FFO. W e collect rent from our customers through operating leases, including reimbursements for
the majority of our property operating costs. For leases that commenced during 2021 within the consolidated operating portfolio, the
weighted average lease term was 62 months. W e expect to generate internal growth by increasing rents, maintaining high occupancy
rates and controlling expenses. The primary driver of our revenue growth will be rolling in-place leases to current market rents as leases
expire. W e believe our active portfolio management, combined with the skills of our property , leasing, maintenance, capital, energy ,
sustainability and risk management teams allow us to maximize NOI across our portfolio. Substantially all of our consolidated rental
revenue, NOI and cash flows are generated in the U.S.
 
Development. Given the scarcity of modern logistics facilities in our target markets, our development business provides the opportunity
to build to our customers’  current and future requirements and deepen our market presence. W e believe we have a competitive
advantage due to (i) the strategic locations of our global land bank and redevelopment sites; (ii) the development expertise of our local
teams; (iii) the depth of our customer relationships and (iv) our ability to integrate sustainable design features and practices, as detailed
in our Environmental Stewardship, Social Responsibility and Governance section below , that result in cost-savings and operational
efficiencies for our customers. Successful development and redevelopment ef forts provide significant earnings growth as projects are
leased, generate income and increase the net asset value of our Real Estate Operations segment. Generally , we develop properties in
the U.S. for long-term hold and outside the U.S. for contribution to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Strategic Capital
 
Our strategic capital segment allows us to partner with many of the world’ s largest institutional investors. W e capitalize our business
through private equity , principally perpetual open-ended or long-term ventures, and two publicly traded vehicles: Nippon Prologis REIT ,
Inc. in Japan and FIBRA  Prologis in Mexico. W e align our interests with our partners by holding significant ownership interests in all of
our eight unconsolidated co-investment ventures (ranging from 15% to 50%). This structure allows us to reduce our exposure to foreign
currency movements for investments outside the U.S.
 
This segment produces durable, long-term cash flows and generally contributes 10% to 15% of our recurring consolidated revenues,
earnings and FFO. W e generate strategic capital revenues from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, principally through asset
management and property management services. Asset management fees are primarily driven by the real estate valuation of the
respective ventures.  We earn additional revenues by providing leasing, acquisition, construction management, development and
disposition services. In certain ventures, we also have the ability to earn revenues through incentive fees (“promotes” or “promote
revenues”) periodically during the life of a venture or upon liquidation based primarily on the appreciation of the portfolio . We plan to
profitably grow this business by increasing our assets under management in existing or new ventures. Most of the strategic capital
revenues are generated outside the U.S.
 
5
Table of Contents
 
 
FUTURE GROWTH
 
We believe the quality and scale of our global portfolio, our ability to build out the global land bank, our strategic capital business, the
expertise of our team, the depth of our customer relationships and the strength of our balance sheet are dif ferentiators that allow us to
drive growth in revenues, NOI, earnings, FFO and cash flows.
 
 
• Rent Growth.  We expect rents in our markets to continue to increase due to the demand for the location and quality of our
properties. In addition, due to strong market rent growth over the last several years, our in-place leases have considerable upside
potential to drive future incremental organic NOI growth. W e estimate that our net ef fective lease mark-to-market is approximately
36%, which represents the growth rate from in-place rents to market rents based on our weighted average ownership of the O&M
portfolio at December 31, 2021. Therefore, even if market rent growth is flat in the future, we expect our lease renewals to
translate into significant increases in future rental income, on a consolidated basis or through the earnings we recognize from our
unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on our ownership. W e have experienced positive rent change on rollover
(comparing the net ef fective rent (“NER”) of the new lease to the prior lease for the same space) in every quarter since 2013.
 
• Value Creation from Development.  A successful development and redevelopment program requires maintaining control of well-
located land and redevelopment sites and sourcing a future pipeline through acquisition opportunities, including our innovative
approach with Covered Land Plays, which are income generating assets acquired with the intention to redevelop for higher and
better use as industrial properties. The global nature of our development program is a wide landscape of opportunities to pursue
based on our judgement of market conditions, opportunities and risks.  We believe that the carrying value of our global land bank is
meaningfully below its current fair value. Due to the strategic nature of our global land bank, development expertise of our teams
and strength of our customer relationships, we expect to create value as we build new properties.
 
We are able to maintain strong margins despite rising construction costs, as we experienced in 2021, due to our procurement
activities that mitigate a portion of the inflationary increases, as well as rising market rents. W e measure the estimated value
creation of a development project as the margin above our TEI. Based on our current estimates, our consolidated land, including
options and Covered Land Plays, has the potential to support the development of $22.2 billion ($26.4 billion on an O&M basis) of
TEI of new logistics space. As properties stabilize, we expect to realize the value creation principally through contributions to
unconsolidated co-investment ventures and increases in the NOI of the consolidated portfolio. Our current investment in the
development portfolio was $2.7 billion and we expect our development activities to increase in 2022.
 
• Strategic Capital Advantages. We continue to successfully raise capital to propel the long-term growth of the co-investment
ventures while maintaining our substantial investments in these vehicles. At December 31, 2021, the gross book value of the
operating portfolio held by our eight unconsolidated co-investment ventures was $45.3 billion across 456 million square
feet.  During 2021, the valuations of the real estate portfolios owned by the unconsolidated co-investment ventures increased
significantly , resulting in higher asset management fees. W e expect that continued market rent growth will result in an increase in
the asset valuations of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures, which will drive significant returns to the investors and increase
the potential for earning promote revenues over the next couple of years. Our Strategic Capital business generates durable fee
streams, with asset management fees marked to fair values each quarter , all while requiring minimal capital other than our
investment in the venture.
 
6
Table of Contents
 
 
 
(1) General and Administrative (“G&A”) Expenses  is a line item in the Consolidated Financial Statements. Adjusted G&A expenses is
calculated from our Consolidated Financial Statements as G&A Expenses and Strategic Capital Expenses , less expenses under
the Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”) and property-level management expenses for the properties owned by the ventures .
 
• Balance Sheet Strength.  We continue to seek and execute on opportunities to refinance debt at historically low rates. Our
financing activities over the last three years resulted in extending our consolidated weighted average remaining maturity from 6 to
10 years and lowering our weighted average ef fective interest rate from 2.7% to 1.6% at January 1, 2019 and December 31, 2021,
respectively . At December 31, 2021, we had total available liquidity of $5.0 billion and continue to maintain low leverage as a
percentage of our real estate investments and our market capitalization. As a result of our low leverage, available liquidity and
investment capacity in the co-investment ventures, we have significant capacity to capitalize on value-added investment
opportunities that will translate into future earnings growth.
 
• Economies of Scale from Growth.  We have scalable systems and infrastructure in place to grow both our consolidated and
O&M portfolios with limited incremental G&A  expense. W e believe we can continue to grow NOI and strategic capital revenues
organically and through accretive development and acquisition activity while further reducing G&A  as a percentage of our
investments in real estate. W e use adjusted G&A  expenses as a percentage of the O&M portfolio (based on gross book value) to
measure and evaluate our overhead costs. As shown in the graph above, the acquisitions of Liberty Property Trust and Liberty
Property Limited Partnership (collectively “Liberty” or the “Liberty Transaction”) and Industrial Property Trust Inc. (“IPT” or the “IPT
Transaction”) in 2020 are key examples of this ef fort, where we increased our investments in real estate in the O&M portfolio by
over 20% and had minimal increases to G&A  expenses , resulting in lower G&A  expenses as a percentage of investments in real
estate.
 
• Staying “Ahead of What’ s Next™”.  We are focused on creating value beyond real estate by enhancing our customers’
experience, leveraging our scale to deliver the best value through our procurement activities and constantly innovating through
data analytics and digitization ef forts. Our Prologis Essentials business supports our customers’  through service and product
offerings, including innovative solutions to operations, transport, technology , energy , and labor challenges that can make our
customers’  decision process easier and their enterprise more ef ficient. Additionally , we invest in sustainable logistics building
design features and practices, such as the addition of solar panels, LED lighting and EV charging, that also allows us to assist our
customers with their sustainability performance.
 
Competition
 
Real estate ownership is highly fragmented, and we face competition from many owners and operators. Competitively priced logistics
space could impact our occupancy rates and have an adverse ef fect on how much rent we can charge, which in turn could af fect our
operating results. W e face competition regarding our capital deployment activities, including regional, national and global operators or
developers. W e also face competition from investment managers for institutional capital within our strategic capital business.
 
Despite the competition, our global reach and local market knowledge over the years has given us distinct competitive advantages,
including the following:
 
• a portfolio of properties strategically located in markets characterized by large population densities, growing consumption and high
barriers to entry , typically near large labor pools and extensive transportation infrastructure, including our Last Touch ® facilities;
 
• the ability to leverage the organizational scale and structure of our 1.0 billion square foot O&M portfolio to provide a single point of
contact for our multi-market customers to address their needs through our in-house global customer led solutions team;
 
• long-term relationships with customers served by our customer experience team that allows us to proactively and promptly
respond to their needs across our global platform;
 
7
Table of Contents
 
 
• the access our customers have to Prologis Essentials integrated suite of solutions;
 
• a strategically located, global land bank and redevelopment sites that have the potential to support the development of $26.4
billion of TEI of new logistics space on an O&M basis;
 
• local teams with the expertise, experience and relationships to lease our properties and deploy capital advantageously;
 
• development of logistics facilities with sustainable design features that meet customer needs for high-quality buildings while
enabling them to make progress on their own sustainability objectives;
 
• relationships and successful track record with current and prospective investors in our strategic capital business that is comprised
of 95% perpetual long-term ventures and two publicly traded vehicles;
 
• a market intelligence team that allows us to track business conditions in real time, proactively pursue market opportunities and
disruptions alike, and develop revenue-generating capabilities to strengthen our operational excellence;
 
• an investment in technology and talent to support our sustainability objectives, including expanding our ef forts around renewable
energy;
 
• Prologis V entures, our corporate venture capital group, and Prologis Labs, our initiative for testing new technologies alongside our
customers, together track the leading edge of innovation within real estate and the supply chain, creating important capabilities
that connect Prologis with the C-suites of our customers; and
 
• a strong balance sheet and credit ratings, coupled with significant liquidity , borrowing capacity and long-term fixed debt with low
rates.
 
Customers
 
At December 31, 2021, in our Real Estate Operations segment representing our consolidated properties, we had more than 3,500
customers occupying 448 million square feet of logistics operating properties. Our broad customer base represents a spectrum of
international, national, regional and local logistics users who operate in various industries, providing diverse goods to consumers
throughout the globe.
 
The location of our global portfolio gives us the unique ability to provide our customers with the right real estate solutions for their supply
chains that, in turn, allows them to meet end-consumer delivery expectations. W e have invested in properties located within infill and
urban areas in our largest global markets with same day access (defined as Last Touch®) and next day access (defined as city
distribution), to the consumer population. W e have also invested in facilities located at key transportation hubs on the edge of these
major infill and urban areas and gateway distribution facilities that incorporate access to major sea and intermodal ports.
8
Table of Contents
 
 
Below are the primary categories of goods in our buildings for our consolidated real estate properties at December 31, 2021.
 
 
 
(1) NER is calculated using the estimated total cash to be received over the term of the lease divided by the lease term to determine
the average amount of cash rent payments received per year . Amounts derived in a currency other than the U.S. dollar have been
translated using the average rate from the previous twelve months.
 
9
Table of Contents
 
 
The following table details our top 25 customers for our consolidated and O&M real estate properties at December 31, 2021 (square feet
in millions):
 
 Consolidated - Real Estate
Operations    Owned and Managed  
Top Customers % of NER   Total Occupied
Square Feet 
 Top Customers % of NER   Total Occupied
Square Feet  
1.   Amazon  7.0   24  1.   Amazon  4.8   33 
2.   FedEx  2.1   7  2.   Geodis  1.4   15 
3.   Home Depot  1.9   9  3.   FedEx  1.3   9 
4.   Geodis  1.1   5  4.   DHL  1.2   11 
5.   W al-Mart  1.0   4  5.   Home Depot  1.2   11 
6.   U.S. Government  0.8   2  6.   GXO  1.2   11 
7.   UPS  0.8   4  7.   DSV Panalpina  0.8   7 
8.   GXO  0.7   4  8.   CEV A Logistics  0.7   7 
9.   DSV Panalpina  0.7   2  9.   UPS  0.7   6 
10. DHL  0.6   3  10. Kuehne + Nagel  0.7   6 
Top 10 Customers  16.7   64  Top 10 Customers  14.0   116 
11. Pepsi  0.6   3  11. W al-Mart  0.6   6 
12. Of fice Depot  0.5   3  12. U.S. Government  0.6   3 
13. Staples  0.5   3  13. ZOZO  0.5   3 
14. Berkshire Hathaway  0.5   2  14. Hitachi  0.5   4 
15. VF Corporation  0.4   1  15. DB Schenker  0.5   5 
16. Kellogg  0.4   2  16. J Sainsburys  0.5   3 
17. Ryder System  0.4   2  17. Cainiao (Alibaba)  0.5   5 
18. Mondelez International  0.4   2  18. BMW  0.4   4 
19. National Distribution Centers  0.3   1  19. Maersk  0.4   3 
20. W estrock Company  0.3   1  20. Ingram Micro  0.3   4 
21. Kuehne + Nagel  0.3   1  21. Sumitomo  0.3   3 
22. Sysco Guest Supply  0.3   2  22. Pepsi  0.3   3 
23. Lindt & Sprüngli  0.3   2  23. Staples  0.3   4 
24. Ingram Micro  0.3   1  24. Panasonic  0.3   2 
25. Iron Mountain  0.3   1  25. Mercado Libre  0.3   3 
Top 25 Customers  22.5   91  Top 25 Customers  20.3   171
 
 
In our Strategic Capital segment, we view our partners and investors as our customers. At December 31, 2021, we had 149 investors in
our private equity ventures, several of which invest in multiple ventures.
 
Employees
 
Our employees are the most important part of our business. When attracting, developing and retaining talent, we seek individuals who
hold varied experiences and viewpoints to create an inclusive and diverse culture and workplace that allows each employee to do their
best work and drive our collective success. W e focus on leadership development at every level of the organization. W e align employees’
goals with our overall strategic direction to create a clear link between individual ef forts and the long-term success of the company . We
then provide feedback on their performance towards those goals to ensure their growth. Providing our employees’  learning and
development through training, educational opportunities and mentorship is critical to our ability to continue to innovate. W e have strong
employee engagement throughout all areas of the company , which we regularly measure through employee engagement surveys.
 
Throughout the COVID-19 pandemic, we have protected our employee’ s health and well-being by providing the technology and
communication equipment necessary to allow the majority of our employees to work remotely . For those employees who cannot
effectively do their jobs remotely , we have put protocols in place to ensure a safe working environment. Moving forward, we will provide
workplace flexibility with accountability to our employees as determined by role. W e continue to attract and retain the top talent in the
industry through a robust benefit package, career growth opportunities, talent recognition and individual development planning. Our
talented team allows Prologis to deliver on our commitment to our customers and investors.
 
10
Table of Contents
 
 
The following table summarizes our total number of employees at December 31, 2021:
 
Geographies     
U.S. (1)   1,166  
Other Americas   146 
Europe   494 
Asia   247 
Total   2,053
 
 
(1) This includes employees who were based in the U.S. but also support other geographies.
 
We allocate the personnel costs related to providing property management and leasing functions to our Real Estate Operations and
Strategic Capital segments based on the square footage of the respective portfolios. The personnel costs to perform only Strategic
Capital functions are allocated directly to that segment.
 
Prologis employees are not organized under collective bargaining agreements, other than in Brazil, France and Spain, and there is a
works council in France.
 
CODE OF ETHICS AND BUSINESS CONDUCT
 
We maintain a Code of Ethics and Business Conduct applicable to our board of directors (the “Board”) and all of our of ficers and
employees, including the principal executive of ficer, the principal financial of ficer and the principal accounting of ficer, and other people
performing similar functions. A copy of our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct is available on our website, www .prologis.com . In
addition to being accessible through our website, copies of our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct can be obtained, free of charge,
upon written request to Investor Relations, Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111. Any amendments to or waivers of our Code
of Ethics and Business Conduct that apply to the principal executive of ficer, the principal financial of ficer, the principal accounting of ficer,
or other people performing similar functions, and that relate to any matter enumerated in Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K, will be disclosed
on our website.
 
ENVIRONMENTAL STEWARDSHIP, SOCIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND GOVERNANCE (“ESG”)
 
Our long-standing dedication to ESG creates value for our company by strengthening our relationships with our customers, investors,
employees and the communities in which we do business. The principles of ESG are an important aspect of our business strategy ,
delivering a strategic business advantage while positively impacting the environment. W e develop modern and ef ficient buildings with
state-of-the-art technology to stay ahead of our customers’  needs while advancing structural, transportation, and energy requirements.
We invest in sustainable design features and practices. This includes the addition of solar panels, cool roofs, LED lighting, electric
vehicle charging stations, waste diversion, recycling and xeriscaping. These services and solutions deliver cost-savings and operational
efficiencies for our customers, reduce energy and water consumption and decrease greenhouse gas emissions within our customers’
operations across our portfolio and our own corporate operations.
 
We believe our Prologis Essentials LED and SolarSmart solutions accelerate energy savings and help reduce the environmental
footprint of our customers. W e regularly and proactively reach out to customers to discuss how Prologis can work with them to enhance
the sustainability of their operations. W e have a comprehensive approach to carbon management that includes science-based targets to
address our global carbon footprint resulting from our development activities. W e have committed to achieving 100% carbon-neutral
construction globally by 2025 and will partner with our customers to decarbonize their operations through our CarbonZero program. W e
have also committed to achieving green building certifications for 100% of our new development and redevelopment and are exploring
innovative and sustainable building designs and technologies such as EV charging stations. W e are regularly recognized for our
commitment to and leadership in sustainable building practices and are positioning ourselves as the developer of choice for customers
seeking a partner that can help them meet their own sustainability goals.
 
We are committed to social responsibility and strengthening relationships important to our business through customer partnerships,
investor outreach, community involvement, labor solutions, and inclusion and diversity initiatives. W e also focus on our employees and
our customers’  employees through health and wellness programs and building design. Through our Community W orkforce Initiative, for
example, we are helping build a talent pipeline for our customers with an emphasis on revitalizing career pathways and creating
economic opportunities in the communities where we operate.  We set an ambitious goal to train 25,000 individuals by 2025 by
partnering with leading public sector organizations and leveraging digital learning technologies to develop innovative training solutions.
In 2021, we partnered with the Association for Supply Chain Management to create a new industry certificate for our digital curriculum to
develop the next generation of talent for the logistics industry .
 
We strive to promote a culture of uncompromising integrity , including through our governance practices and corporate oversight. Our
Board independence and diversity , open communication with our stockholders and a risk management framework that supports our
investment and process decisions all serve to mitigate risk and preserve value for our company . The strength of our balance sheet and
credit ratings, ability to stay ahead of customer needs, dedication to proactive risk mitigation and engagement with our employees
through ethics and anti-corruption training, along with stockholder outreach ensures the financial, operational and reputational resilience
of our organization for the long-term. Our approach is reinforced by our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, as described above.
11
Table of Contents
 
 
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
 
We are exposed to various environmental risks that may result in unanticipated losses and af fect our operating results and financial
condition. Either the previous owners or we have conducted environmental reviews on a majority of the properties we have acquired,
including land. While some of these assessments have led to further investigation and sampling, none of the environmental
assessments have revealed an environmental liability that we believe would have a material adverse ef fect beyond amounts recorded at
December 31, 2021. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors and Note 16 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8.
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
GOVERNMENTAL MATTERS
 
We are exposed to various regulatory requirements, taxes, tarif fs, trade wars and laws within the countries in which we operate and
unexpected changes in these items may result in unanticipated losses, adverse tax consequences and af fect our operating results and
financial condition. In addition, we may be impacted by the ability of our non-U.S. subsidiaries to distribute or otherwise transfer cash
among our subsidiaries due to currency exchange control regulations and transfer pricing regulations. The impact of regional or country-
specific economic instability , including government shutdowns or other internal trade alliances or agreements could also have a material
adverse ef fect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
INSURANCE COVERAGE
 
We carry insurance coverage on our properties. W e determine the type of coverage and the policy specifications and limits based on
what we deem to be the risks associated with our ownership of properties and our business operations in specific markets. Such
coverage typically includes property damage and rental loss insurance resulting from such perils as fire, windstorm, flood, earthquake
and terrorism; commercial general liability insurance; and environmental insurance. Insurance is maintained through a combination of
commercial insurance, self-insurance and a wholly-owned captive insurance entity . Additionally , in 2021 we sponsored catastrophe
bonds that provide further insurance coverage for potential losses resulting from earthquake risks in the U.S. The costs to insure our
properties are primarily covered through expense reimbursements from our customers. W e believe our insurance coverage contains
policy specifications and insured limits that are customary for similar properties, business activities and markets and we believe our
properties are adequately insured. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
 
Our operations and structure involve various risks that could adversely af fect our business and financial condition, including but not
limited to, our financial position, results of operations, cash flow , ability to make distributions and payments to security holders and the
market value of our securities. These risks relate to Prologis as well as our investments in consolidated and unconsolidated entities and
include among others, (i) risks related to our global operations (ii) risks related to our business; (iii) risks related to financing and capital;
(iv) risks related to income taxes; and (v) general risks.
 
Risks Related to our Global Operations
 
As a global company , we are subject to social, political and economic risks of doing business in many countries.
 
We conduct a significant portion of our business and employ a substantial number of people outside of the U.S. During 2021, we
generated approximately $620 million or 13.0% of our consolidated revenues from operations outside the U.S. Circumstances and
developments related to international operations that could negatively af fect us include, but are not limited to, the following factors:
 
• difficulties and costs of staf fing and managing international operations in certain geographies, including dif fering employment
practices and labor issues;
 
• local businesses and cultural factors that dif fer from our usual standards and practices;
 
• volatility in currencies and currency restrictions, which may prevent the transfer of capital and profits to the U.S.;
 
• challenges in establishing ef fective controls and procedures to regulate operations in dif ferent geographies and to monitor
compliance with applicable regulations, such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the United Kingdom (“U.K.”) Bribery Act and
other similar laws;  
 
• unexpected changes in regulatory and environmental requirements, taxes, tarif fs, trade wars and laws within the countries in
which we operate;
 
• potentially adverse tax consequences;
 
• the responsibility of complying with multiple and potentially conflicting laws, e.g., with respect to corrupt practices, employment
and licensing;
12
Table of Contents
 
 
• the impact of regional or country-specific business cycles and economic instability , including government shutdowns and
withdrawals from the European Union or other international trade alliances or agreements;
 
• political instability , uncertainty over property rights, civil unrest, drug traf ficking, political activism or the continuation or escalation
of terrorist or gang activities;
 
• foreign ownership restrictions in operations with the respective countries; and
 
• access to capital may be more restricted, or unavailable on favorable terms or at all in certain locations.
 
In addition, we may be impacted by the ability of our non-U.S. subsidiaries to dividend or otherwise transfer cash among our subsidiaries
due to currency exchange control regulations, transfer pricing regulations and potentially adverse tax consequences, among other
factors.
 
Compliance or failure to comply with regulatory requirements could result in substantial costs.
 
We are required to comply with many regulations in dif ferent countries, including (but not limited to) the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act,
the U.K. Bribery Act and similar laws and regulations. Our properties are also subject to various federal, state and local regulatory
requirements, such as the Americans with Disabilities Act and state and local fire, life-safety , energy and greenhouse gas emissions
requirements. Noncompliance could result in the imposition of governmental fines or the award of damages to private litigants. While we
believe that we are currently in material compliance with these regulatory requirements, the requirements may change or new
requirements may be imposed that could require significant unanticipated expenditures by us.
 
Disruptions in the global capital and credit markets may adversely af fect our operating results and financial condition.
 
To the extent there is turmoil in the global financial markets, this turmoil has the potential to adversely af fect (i) the value of our
properties; (ii) the availability or the terms of financing that we have or may anticipate utilizing; (iii) our ability to make principal and
interest payments on, or refinance any outstanding debt when due; and (iv) the ability of our customers to enter into new leasing
transactions or satisfy rental payments under existing leases. Disruptions in the capital and credit markets may also adversely af fect the
market price of our securities and our ability to make distributions and payments to our security holders.
 
The depreciation in the value of the foreign currency in countries where we have a significant investment may adversely af fect
our results of operations and financial position.
 
We hold significant real estate investments in international markets where the U.S. dollar is not the functional currency . At December 31,
2021, approximately $9.1 billion or 15.6% of our total consolidated assets were invested in a currency other than the U.S. dollar ,
principally the British pound sterling, Canadian dollar , euro and Japanese yen. For the year ended December 31, 2021, $422 million or
12.1% of our total consolidated segment NOI was denominated in a currency other than the U.S. dollar . See Note 17 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for more information on these amounts.  As
a result, we are subject to foreign currency risk due to potential fluctuations in exchange rates between foreign currencies and the
U.S. dollar . A significant change in the value of the foreign currency of one or more countries where we have a significant investment
may have a material adverse ef fect on our business and, specifically , our U.S. dollar reported financial position and results of operations.
 
Our hedging of foreign currency and interest rate risk may not ef fectively limit our exposure to these risks.
 
We attempt to mitigate our risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we have significant investments thereby providing a natural
hedge. W e may also enter into derivative financial instruments that we designate as net investment hedges, as these amounts of fset the
translation adjustments on the underlying net assets of our foreign investments. W e enter into other foreign currency contracts, such as
forwards, to reduce fluctuations in foreign currency cash flow associated with the translation of future earnings  of our international
subsidiaries. Although we attempt to mitigate the potential adverse ef fects of changes in foreign currency rates there can be no
assurance that those attempts will be successful.  In addition, we occasionally use interest rate swap contracts to manage interest rate
risk and limit the impact of future interest rate changes on earnings and cash flows. Hedging arrangements involve risks, such as the
risk of fluctuation in the relative value of the foreign currency or interest rates and the risk that counterparties may fail to honor their
obligations under these arrangements. The funds required to settle such arrangements could be significant depending on the stability
and movement of the hedged foreign currency or the size of the underlying financing and the applicable interest rates at the time of the
breakage. The failure to hedge ef fectively against foreign exchange changes or interest rate changes may adversely af fect our business.
 
13
Table of Contents
 
 
Risks Related to our Business
 
General economic conditions and other events or occurrences that af fect areas in which our properties are geographically
concentrated, may impact financial results.
 
We are exposed to the economic conditions and other events and occurrences in the local, regional, national and international
geographies in which we own properties. Our operating performance is further impacted by the economic conditions of the specific
markets in which we have concentrations of properties.
 
At December 31, 2021, 30.7% of our consolidated operating properties or $13.8 billion (based on consolidated gross book value, or
investment before depreciation) were located in California (Central V alley, San Francisco Bay Area and Southern California markets),
which represented 25.9% of the aggregate square footage of our operating properties and 33.0% of our consolidated operating property
NOI. Our revenues from, and the value of, our properties located in California may be af fected by local real estate conditions (such as
an oversupply of or reduced demand for logistics properties) and the local economic climate. Business layof fs, downsizing, industry
slowdowns, changing demographics and other factors may adversely impact California’ s economic climate. Because of the investment
we have located in California, a downturn in California’ s economy or real estate conditions, including state income tax and property tax
laws, could adversely af fect our business.
 
In addition to California, we also have significant holdings (defined as more than 3% of total consolidated investment before
depreciation) in operating properties in certain markets located in Atlanta, Chicago, Dallas/Fort W orth, Houston, Lehigh V alley, New
Jersey/New York City , Seattle and South Florida. Of these markets, no single market contributed more than 10% of our total
consolidated investment before depreciation in operating properties. Our operating performance could be adversely af fected if
conditions become less favorable in any of the markets in which we have a concentration of properties. Conditions such as an
oversupply of logistics space or a reduction in demand for logistics space, among other factors, may impact operating conditions. Any
material oversupply of logistics space or material reduction in demand for logistics space could adversely af fect our overall business.  
 
Our O&M portfolio, which includes our consolidated properties and properties owned by our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, has
concentrations of properties in the same markets mentioned above, as well as in markets in China, France, Japan, Mexico and the U.K.,
and are subject to the economic conditions in those markets.
 
Real estate investments are not as liquid as certain other types of assets, which may reduce economic returns to investors.
 
Real estate investments are not as liquid as certain other types of investments and this lack of liquidity may limit our ability to react
promptly to changes in economic or other conditions. Significant expenditures associated with real estate investments, such as secured
mortgage debt payments, real estate taxes and maintenance costs, are generally not reduced when circumstances cause a reduction in
income from the investments. As a REIT , under the IRC, we are only able to hold property for sale in the ordinary course of business
through taxable REIT  subsidiaries in order to not incur punitive taxation on any tax gain from the sale of such property . We may dispose
of certain properties that have been held for investment to generate liquidity . If we do not satisfy certain safe harbors or we believe there
is too much risk of incurring the punitive tax on any tax gain from the sale, we may not pursue such sales.
 
We may decide to sell or contribute properties to certain of our co-investment ventures or sell properties to third parties to generate
proceeds to fund our capital deployment activities. Our ability to sell or contribute properties on advantageous terms is af fected by: (i)
competition from other owners of properties that are trying to dispose of their properties; (ii) economic and market conditions, including
the capitalization rates applicable to our properties; and (iii) other factors beyond our control. If our competitors sell assets similar to
assets we intend to divest in the same markets or at valuations below our valuations for comparable assets, we may be unable to divest
our assets at favorable pricing or at all. The co-investment ventures or third parties who might acquire our properties may need to have
access to debt and equity capital, in the private and public markets, in order to acquire properties from us. Should they have limited or
no access to capital on favorable terms, then dispositions and contributions could be delayed.
 
If we do not have suf ficient cash available to us through our operations, sales or contributions of properties or available credit facilities to
continue operating our business as usual, we may need to find alternative ways to increase our liquidity . Such alternatives may include,
without limitation, divesting properties at less than optimal terms, incurring debt, entering into leases with new customers at lower rental
rates or less than optimal terms or entering into lease renewals with our existing customers without an increase in rental rates. There
can be no assurance, however , that such alternative ways to increase our liquidity will be available to us. Additionally , taking such
measures to increase our liquidity may adversely af fect our business, and in particular , our distributable cash flow and debt covenants.
 
Our investments are concentrated in the logistics sector and our business would be adversely af fected by an economic
downturn in that sector .
 
Our investments in real estate assets are concentrated in the logistics sector . This concentration may expose us to the risk of economic
downturns in this sector to a greater extent than if our business activities were more diversified.
 
14
Table of Contents
 
 
Investments in real estate properties are subject to risks that could adversely af fect our business.
 
Investments in real estate properties are subject to varying degrees of risk. While we seek to minimize these risks through geographic
diversification of our portfolio, market research and our asset management capabilities, these risks cannot be eliminated. Factors that
may af fect real estate values and cash flows include:
 
• local conditions, such as oversupply or a reduction in demand;
 
• technological changes, such as reconfiguration of supply chains, autonomous vehicles, robotics, 3D printing or other technologies;
 
• the attractiveness of our properties to potential customers and competition from other available properties;
 
• increasing costs of maintaining, insuring, renovating and making improvements to our properties;
 
• our ability to reposition our properties due to changes in the business and logistics needs of our customers;
 
• our ability to lease the properties at favorable rates and control variable operating costs; and
 
• governmental and environmental regulations and the associated potential liability under , and changes in, environmental, zoning,
usage, tax, tarif fs and other laws.
 
These factors may af fect our ability to recover our investment in the properties and result in impairment charges.
 
Our customers may be unable to meet their lease obligations or we may be unable to lease vacant space or renew leases or re-
lease space on favorable terms as leases expire.
 
Our operating results and distributable cash flow would be adversely af fected if a significant number of our customers were unable to
meet their lease obligations. At December 31, 2021, our top 10 customers accounted for 16.7% of our consolidated NER and 14.0% of
our O&M NER. In the event of default by a significant number of customers, we may experience delays and incur substantial costs in
enforcing our rights as landlord, and we may be unable to re-lease spaces. A customer may experience a downturn in its business,
which may cause the loss of the customer or may weaken its financial condition, resulting in the customer ’s failure to make rental
payments when due or requiring a restructuring that might reduce cash flow from the lease. In addition, a customer may seek the
protection of bankruptcy , insolvency or similar laws, which could result in the rejection and termination of such customer ’s lease and
thereby cause a reduction in our available cash flow .
 
We are also subject to the risk that, upon the expiration of leases they may not be renewed by existing customers, the space may not be
re-leased to new customers or the terms of renewal or re-leasing (including the cost of required renovations or concessions to
customers) may be less favorable to us than current lease terms. Our competitors may of fer space at rental rates below current market
rates or below the rental rates we currently charge our customers and we may be pressured to reduce our rental rates below those we
currently charge to retain customers when leases expire or we may lose potential customers.
 
We may acquire properties and companies that involve risks that could adversely af fect our business and financial condition.  
 
We have acquired properties and will continue to acquire properties through the direct acquisition of real estate, the acquisition of
entities that own real estate or through additional investments in co-investment ventures that acquire properties. The acquisition of
properties involves risks, including the risk that the acquired property will not perform as anticipated and that any actual costs for
rehabilitation, repositioning, renovation and improvements identified in the pre-acquisition due diligence process will exceed estimates.
When we acquire properties, we may face risks associated with a lack of market knowledge or understanding of the local economy ,
forging new business relationships in the area and unfamiliarity with local government and permitting procedures. Additionally , there is,
and it is expected there will continue to be, significant competition for properties that meet our investment criteria as well as risks
associated with obtaining financing for acquisition activities. The acquired properties or entities may be subject to liabilities, including tax
liabilities, which may be without any recourse, or with only limited recourse, with respect to unknown liabilities. As a result, if a liability
were asserted against us based on our new ownership of any of these entities or properties, then we may have to pay substantial sums
to settle it.
 
We may be unable to integrate the operations of newly acquired companies and realize the anticipated synergies and other benefits or
do so within the anticipated timeframe. Potential dif ficulties we may encounter in the integration process include: (i) the inability to
dispose of non-industrial assets or operations that are outside of our area of expertise; (ii) potential unknown liabilities and unforeseen
increased expenses, delays or regulatory conditions associated with these transactions; and (iii) performance shortfalls as a result of the
diversion of management’ s attention caused by completing these transactions and integrating the companies’  operations.  
 
15
Table of Contents
 
 
Our real estate development and redevelopment strategies may not be successful.
 
Our real estate development and redevelopment strategy is focused on monetizing land and redevelopment sites in the future through
development of logistics facilities to hold for long-term investment and for contribution or sale to a co-investment venture or third party ,
depending on market conditions, our liquidity needs and other factors. W e may increase our investment in the development, renovation
and redevelopment business and we expect to complete the build-out and leasing of our current development portfolio. W e may also
develop, renovate and redevelop properties within existing or newly formed co-investment ventures. The real estate development,
renovation and redevelopment business includes the following significant risks:
 
• we may not be able to obtain financing for development projects on favorable terms or at all;
 
• we may explore development opportunities that may be abandoned and the related investment impaired;
 
• we may not be able to obtain, or may experience delays in obtaining, all necessary zoning, land-use, building, occupancy and
other governmental permits and authorizations;
 
• we may have construction costs or additional environmental regulation costs that exceed our estimates and projects may not be
completed, delivered or stabilized as planned due to defects or other issues;
 
• we may not be able to attract third-party investment in new development co-investment ventures or suf ficient customer demand for
our product;
 
• we may have properties that perform below anticipated levels, producing cash flows below budgeted amounts;
 
• we may seek to sell certain land parcels and not be able to find a third party to acquire such land or the sales price will not allow
us to recover our investment, resulting in impairment charges;
 
• we may not be able to lease properties we develop on favorable terms or at all;
 
• we may not be able to capture the anticipated enhanced value created by our value-added properties on expected timetables or at
all;
 
• we may experience delays (temporary or permanent) if there is public or government opposition to our activities; and
 
• we may have substantial renovation, new development and redevelopment activities, regardless of their ultimate success, that
require a significant amount of management’ s time and attention, diverting their attention from our day-to-day operations.
 
We are subject to risks and liabilities in connection with forming and attracting third-party investment in co-investment
ventures, investing in new or existing co-investment ventures, and managing properties through co-investment ventures.
 
At December 31, 2021, we had investments in co-investment ventures, both public and private, that owned operating properties with a
gross book value of approximately $54 billion. Our organizational documents do not limit the amount of available funds that we may
invest in these ventures, and we may and currently intend to develop and acquire properties through co-investment ventures and
investments in other entities when warranted by the circumstances. However , there can be no assurance that we will be able to form
new co-investment ventures, or attract third-party investment or that additional investments in new or existing ventures to develop or
acquire properties will be successful. Further , there can be no assurance that we are able to realize value from our existing or future
investments. The same factors that impact the valuation of our consolidated portfolio, as discussed above, also impact the portfolios
held by the co-investment ventures and could result in other than temporary impairment of our investment and a reduction in fee
revenues.  
 
Our co-investment ventures involve certain additional risks that we do not otherwise face, including:
 
• our partners may share certain approval rights over major decisions made on behalf of the ventures;
 
• if our partners fail to fund their share of any required capital contributions, then we may choose to contribute such capital;
 
• our partners might have economic or other business interests or goals that are inconsistent with our business interests or goals
that would af fect our ability to operate the venture;
 
• the venture or other governing agreements often restrict the transfer of an interest in the co-investment venture or may otherwise
restrict our ability to sell the interest when we desire or on advantageous terms;
 
• our relationships with our partners are generally contractual in nature and may be terminated or dissolved under the terms of the
agreements, and in such event, we may not continue to invest in or manage the assets underlying such relationships resulting in
16
Table of Contents
 
a decrease in our assets under management and a reduc tion in  fee revenues . This may also require us to  acquire the properties
in order to maintain an investment in the portfolio ; and
 
• disputes between us and our partners may result in litigation or arbitration that would increase our expenses and prevent our
officers and directors from focusing their time and ef fort on our business and result in subjecting the properties owned by the
applicable co-investment venture to additional risk.
 
We generally seek to maintain suf ficient influence over our co-investment ventures to permit us to achieve our business objectives;
however , we may not be able to continue to do so indefinitely . We have formed publicly traded investment vehicles, such as NPR and
FIBRA  Prologis, for which we serve as sponsor or manager . These entities bear their own risks related to trading markets, foreign
currency exchange rates and market demand. W e have contributed, and may continue to contribute, assets into such vehicles. There is
a risk that our managerial relationship may be terminated. 
 
We have also made investments in early and growth-stage companies that are focused on emerging technology . These companies may
not be successful at raising additional capital or generating cash flows to sustain operations, which could result in the impairment of our
investment. In addition, through Prologis Essentials we are investing in the development of new business lines that are complementary
to our core business. These business lines may not be successful and may include risks that are dif ferent than investing in our core real
estate business.
 
We are exposed to various environmental risks, which may result in unanticipated losses that could af fect our business and
financial condition.
 
Under various federal, state and local laws, ordinances and regulations, a current or previous owner , developer or operator of real estate
may be liable for the costs of removal or remediation of certain hazardous or toxic substances. The costs of removal or remediation of
such substances could be substantial. Such laws often impose liability without regard to whether the owner or operator knew of, or was
responsible for , the release or presence of such hazardous substances. In addition, third parties may sue the owner or operator of a site
for damages based on personal injury , property damage or other costs, including investigation and clean-up costs, resulting from the
environmental contamination.
 
Environmental laws in some countries, including the U.S., also require that owners or operators of buildings containing asbestos
properly manage and maintain the asbestos, adequately inform or train those who may come into contact with asbestos and undertake
special precautions, including removal or other abatement, in the event that asbestos is disturbed during building renovation or
demolition. These laws may impose fines and penalties on building owners or operators who fail to comply with these requirements and
may allow third parties to seek recovery from owners or operators for personal injury associated with exposure to asbestos. Some of our
properties are known to contain asbestos-containing building materials.
 
In addition, some of our properties are leased or have been leased, in part, to owners and operators of businesses that use, store or
otherwise handle petroleum products or other hazardous or toxic substances, creating a potential for the release of such hazardous or
toxic substances. Furthermore, certain of our properties are on, adjacent to or near other properties that have contained or currently
contain petroleum products or other hazardous or toxic substances, or upon which others have engaged, are engaged or may engage in
activities that may release such hazardous or toxic substances. From time to time, we may acquire properties, or interests in properties,
with known adverse environmental conditions for which we believe that the environmental liabilities associated with these conditions are
quantifiable and that the acquisition will yield a superior risk-adjusted return. In connection with certain divested properties, we have
agreed to remain responsible for , and to bear the cost of, remediating or monitoring certain environmental conditions on the properties.
 
Our insurance coverage does not cover all potential losses.
 
We and our unconsolidated co-investment ventures carry insurance coverage including property damage and rental loss insurance
resulting from certain perils such as fire and additional perils as covered under an extended coverage policy , namely windstorm, flood,
earthquake and terrorism; commercial general liability insurance; and environmental insurance, as appropriate for the markets where
each of our properties and business operations are located. The insurance coverage contains policy specifications and insured limits
customarily carried for similar properties, business activities and markets. W e believe our properties and the properties of our co-
investment ventures are adequately insured. Certain losses, however , including losses from floods, earthquakes, acts of war , acts of
terrorism or riots and pandemics, generally are not insured against or not fully insured against because it is not deemed economically
feasible or prudent to do so. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits occurs with respect to one or more of our
properties, we could experience a significant loss of capital invested and future revenues in these properties and could potentially
remain obligated under any recourse debt associated with the property .
 
Furthermore, we cannot be sure that the insurance companies will be able to continue to of fer products with suf ficient coverage at
commercially reasonable rates. If we experience a loss that is uninsured or that exceeds insured limits with respect to one or more of
our properties or if the insurance companies fail to meet their coverage commitments to us in the event of an insured loss, then we could
lose the capital invested in the damaged properties, as well as the anticipated future revenues from those properties and, if there is
recourse debt, then we would remain obligated for any mortgage debt or other financial obligations related to the properties. Any such
losses or higher insurance costs could adversely af fect our business.  
 
17
Table of Contents
 
 
A number of our investments, both wholly-owned and owned through co-investment ventures, are located in areas that are known to be
subject to earthquake activity . U.S. properties located in active seismic areas include properties in our markets in California and Seattle.
International properties located in active seismic areas include Japan and Mexico. W e generally carry earthquake insurance on our
properties located in areas historically subject to seismic activity , subject to coverage limitations and deductibles, if we believe it is
commercially reasonable. W e evaluate our earthquake insurance coverage annually in light of current industry practice through an
analysis prepared by outside consultants and in some specific instances have elected to self-insure our earthquake exposure based on
this analysis. W e have elected not to carry earthquake insurance for our assets in Japan based on this analysis.
 
Furthermore, a number of our properties are located in areas that are known to be subject to hurricane or flood risk. W e carry hurricane
and flood hazard insurance on all of our properties located in areas historically subject to such activity , subject to coverage limitations
and deductibles, if we believe it is commercially reasonable. W e evaluate our insurance coverage annually in light of current industry
practice through an analysis prepared by outside consultants.
 
Risks Related to Financing and Capital
 
We may be unable to refinance our debt or our cash flow may be insuf ficient to make required debt payments.
 
We are subject to risks normally associated with debt financing, including the risk that our cash flow will be insuf ficient to meet required
payments of principal and interest. There can be no assurance that we will be able to refinance any maturing indebtedness, that such
refinancing would be on terms as favorable as the terms of the maturing indebtedness, or that we will be able to otherwise obtain funds
by selling assets or raising equity to make required payments on maturing indebtedness. If we are unable to refinance our indebtedness
at maturity or meet our payment obligations, our business and financial condition will be negatively impacted and, if the maturing debt is
secured, the lender may foreclose on the property securing such indebtedness. Our credit facilities and certain other debt bears interest
at variable rates. Increases in market interest rates would increase our interest expense under these agreements.
 
Covenants in our credit agreements could limit our flexibility and breaches of these covenants could adversely af fect our
financial condition.
 
The terms of our various credit agreements, including our credit facilities and term loans, the indentures under which certain of our
senior notes are issued and other note agreements, require us to comply with a number of customary financial covenants, such as
maintaining debt service coverage ratios, leverage ratios and fixed charge coverage ratios. These covenants may limit our flexibility to
run our business, and breaches of these covenants could result in defaults under the instruments governing the applicable
indebtedness. If we default under the covenant provisions and are unable to cure the default, refinance the indebtedness or meet
payment obligations, our business and financial condition generally and, in particular , the amount of our distributable cash flow could be
adversely af fected.  
 
Adverse changes in our credit ratings could negatively af fect our financing activity .
 
At December 31, 2021, our credit ratings were A3 from Moody’ s with a stable outlook and A- from S&P  with a positive outlook. A
securities rating is not a recommendation to buy , sell or hold securities and is subject to revision or withdrawal at any time by the rating
organization.
 
The credit ratings of our senior notes and preferred stock are based on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage ratios, overall
financial position and other factors employed by the credit rating agencies in their rating analyses of us. Our credit ratings can af fect the
amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms and pricing of any debt we may incur . There can be no assurance that we will be
able to maintain our current credit ratings, and in the event our credit ratings are downgraded, we would likely incur higher borrowing
costs and may encounter dif ficulty in obtaining additional financing. Also, a downgrade in our credit ratings may trigger additional
payments or other negative consequences under our credit facilities and other debt instruments. Adverse changes in our credit ratings
could negatively impact our business and, in particular , our refinancing and other capital market activities, our ability to manage debt
maturities, our future growth and our development and acquisition activity .
 
In order to meet REIT distribution requirements we may need access to external sources of capital.
 
To qualify as a REIT , we are required each year to distribute at least 90% of our REIT  taxable income (determined without regard to the
dividends-paid deduction and by excluding any net capital gain) to our stockholders and we may be subject to tax to the extent our
taxable income is not fully distributed. Historically , we have satisfied these distribution requirements by making cash distributions to our
stockholders, however , we may elect to pay a portion of the distribution in shares of our stock. Assuming we continue to satisfy these
distribution requirements with cash, we may not be able to fund all future capital needs, including acquisition and development activities,
from cash retained from operations and may have to rely on third-party sources of capital. Furthermore, to maintain our REIT  status and
not have to pay federal income and excise taxes, we may need to borrow funds on a short-term basis to meet the REIT  distribution
requirements even if the then-prevailing market conditions are not favorable for these borrowings. These short-term borrowing needs
could result from dif ferences in timing between the actual receipt of cash and inclusion of income for federal income tax purposes, or the
effect of nondeductible capital expenditures, the creation of reserves or required debt or amortization payments. Our ability to access
debt and equity capital on favorable terms or at all depends on a number of factors, including general market conditions, the market’ s
perception of our growth potential, our current and potential future earnings and cash distributions and the market price of our securities.
18
Table of Contents
 
 
Transition to an alternative reference rate due to the cessation of the London Inter-bank Of fered Rate (“LIBOR”) could have a
negative impact on our required debt payments and the value of our related debt and derivative financial instruments.
 
In March 2021, the Financial Conduct Authority (“FCA”) formally announced that the publication of LIBOR was ending and confirmed
that USD LIBOR-indexed rates would cease to be published after June 30, 2023. Certain interbank of fered rates (“IBOR”) ceased on
December 31, 2021. For discussion on the transition of these rates see Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8.
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data. The Federal Reserve Board and the Federal Reserve Bank of New York identified the
Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”) as its preferred alternative rate for USD LIBOR for debt and derivative financial
instruments. This extended cessation date for USD LIBOR-indexed rates would allow most legacy USD LIBOR contracts to mature
before disruptions occur in the USD LIBOR market, without the need to transition those contracts to SOFR. At December 31, 2021, only
the available USD commitments on our global senior credit facilities were indexed to USD LIBOR. See Item 7A. Quantitative and
Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk for additional discussion regarding our variable rate debt.
 
Our global senior credit facility agreements contain provisions that reference a comparable or successor rate to the extent USD LIBOR
rates are no longer available and no mandatory prepayment or redemption provisions would be triggered in that instance. W e anticipate
managing the transition from USD LIBOR to SOFR using the language set out in our agreements and through potentially modifying our
debt and derivative instruments, however future market conditions may not allow immediate implementation of desired modifications and
we may incur significant associated costs in doing so. W e will continue to monitor and evaluate the potential impact on our debt
payments and value of our related debt and derivative financial instruments.
 
Our stockholders may experience dilution if we issue additional common stock or units in the OP .
 
Any additional future issuance of common stock or OP  units will reduce the percentage of our common stock and units owned by
investors. In most circumstances, stockholders and unitholders will not be entitled to vote on whether or not we issue additional common
stock or units. In addition, depending on the terms and pricing of any additional of fering of our common stock or OP  units and the
utilization of the proceeds, our stockholders and unitholders may experience dilution in both book value and fair value of their common
stock or units.
 
Risks Related to Income Tax
 
The failure of Prologis, Inc. to qualify as a REIT would have serious adverse consequences.
 
Prologis, Inc. elected to be taxed as a REIT  under Sections 856 through 860 of the IRC commencing with the taxable year ended
December 31, 1997. W e believe Prologis, Inc. has been organized and operated to qualify as a REIT  under the IRC and believe that the
current organization and method of operation comply with the rules and regulations promulgated under the IRC to enable Prologis, Inc.
to continue to qualify as a REIT . However , it is possible that we are organized or have operated in a manner that would not allow
Prologis, Inc. to qualify as a REIT , or that our future operations could cause Prologis, Inc. to fail to qualify . Qualification as a REIT
requires us to satisfy numerous requirements (some annually and others on a quarterly basis) established under highly technical and
complex sections of the IRC for which there are only limited judicial and administrative interpretations and involves the determination of
various factual matters and circumstances not entirely within our control. For example, to qualify as a REIT , Prologis, Inc. must derive at
least 95% of its gross income in any year from qualifying sources. In addition, Prologis, Inc. must pay dividends to its stockholders
aggregating annually at least 90% of its taxable income (determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and by excluding
capital gains) and must satisfy specified asset tests on a quarterly basis. Historically , we have satisfied these distribution requirements
by making cash distributions to our stockholders, but we may choose to satisfy these requirements by making distributions of cash or
other property , including, in limited circumstances, our own stock. The provisions of the IRC and applicable Treasury regulations
regarding qualification as a REIT  are more complicated for Prologis, Inc. because we hold substantially all of our assets through the OP .
 
If Prologis, Inc. fails to qualify as a REIT  in any taxable year , we will be required to pay federal income tax (including, for taxable years
prior to 2018, any applicable alternative minimum tax) on taxable income at regular corporate rates. Unless we are entitled to relief
under certain statutory provisions, Prologis, Inc. would be disqualified from treatment as a REIT  for the four taxable years following the
year in which it lost the qualification and would be subject to corporate tax on built-in gains that exist at the time of REIT  re-election if
recognized within the five-year period after re-election, and potentially 10 years for certain states. If Prologis, Inc. lost its REIT  status,
our net earnings would be significantly reduced for each of the years involved. In addition, we may need to borrow additional funds or
liquidate some investments to pay any additional tax liability . Accordingly , funds available for investment, operations and distributions
would be reduced.
 
Furthermore, we own a direct or indirect interest in certain subsidiary REIT s that elected to be taxed as REIT s under Sections 856
through 860 of the IRC. Provided that each subsidiary REIT  qualifies as a REIT , our interest in such subsidiary REIT  will be treated as a
qualifying real estate asset for purposes of the REIT  asset tests, and any dividend income or gains derived by us from such subsidiary
REIT  will generally be treated as income that qualifies for purposes of the REIT  95% and 75% gross income tests. To qualify as a REIT ,
the subsidiary REIT  must independently satisfy all of the REIT  qualification requirements. If such subsidiary REIT  were to fail to qualify
as a REIT , and certain relief provisions did not apply , it would be treated as a regular taxable corporation and its income would be
subject to U.S. federal income tax. In addition, a failure of the subsidiary REIT  to qualify as a REIT  would have an adverse ef fect on the
ability of Prologis, Inc. to comply with the REIT  income and asset tests, and thus its ability to qualify as a REIT .
19
Table of Contents
 
 
In addition, we may acquire properties through the acquisition of REIT  entities that own the real estate. If a gain in such assets is not
otherwise recognized by the seller or target in such acquisitions, and such entities were to fail to satisfy the REIT  requirements for any
year, they would be disqualified from treatment as a REIT  for the four taxable years following the year in which the REIT  qualification
was lost and the acquired assets would be subject to corporate tax on built-in gains that exist at the time of REIT  re-election or , if earlier ,
at the time of Prologis’  acquisition of the assets. A sale of such assets within the 5-year recognition period, and potentially 10 years for
certain states, could result in corporate tax liabilities that could be significant.  
 
Certain property transfers may generate prohibited transaction income, resulting in a penalty tax on gain attributable to the
transaction.
 
From time to time, we may transfer or otherwise dispose of some of our properties, including by contributing properties to our co-
investment ventures. Under the IRC, any gain resulting from transfers of properties we hold as inventory or primarily for sale to
customers in the ordinary course of business is treated as income from a prohibited transaction subject to a 100% penalty tax. W e do
not believe that our transfers or disposals of property or our contributions of properties into our co-investment ventures are prohibited
transactions. However , whether property is held for investment purposes is a question of fact that depends on all the facts and
circumstances surrounding the particular transaction. The Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) may contend that certain transfers or
dispositions of properties by us or contributions of properties into our co-investment ventures are prohibited transactions. While we
believe that the IRS would not prevail in any such dispute, if the IRS were to argue successfully that a transfer , disposition or
contribution of property constituted a prohibited transaction, we would be required to pay a 100% penalty tax on any gain allocable to us
from the prohibited transaction. In addition, income from a prohibited transaction might adversely af fect our ability to satisfy the income
tests for qualification as a REIT .
 
Legislative or regulatory action could adversely af fect us.
 
In recent years, numerous legislative, judicial and administrative changes have been made to the U.S., state, local and foreign income
tax laws applicable to investments in real estate, REIT s, similar entities and investments. Additional changes are likely to continue to
occur in the future, both in and outside of the U.S. and may impact our taxation or that of our stockholders.  Any increases in tax liability
could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash available for other purposes.
 
Complying with REIT requirements may limit our flexibility or cause us to forego otherwise attractive opportunities.
 
Our use of taxable REIT  subsidiaries (“TRSs”) enables us to engage in non-REIT  qualifying business activities. Under the IRC, no more
than 20% of the value of the assets of a REIT  may be represented by securities of one or more TRSs and other non-qualifying assets.
This limitation may hinder our ability to make certain attractive investments, including the purchase of non-qualifying assets, the
expansion of non-real estate activities and investments in the businesses to be conducted by our TRSs, and to that extent limit our
opportunities.
 
General Risks
 
Our business may be materially and adversely af fected by the impact of the global pandemic of COVID-19.
The W orld Health Organization and certain national and local governments characterized COVID-19 as a pandemic in March 2020. The
COVID-19 outbreak has disrupted financial markets and global, national and local economies. There are government restrictions on
activities across the globe. The impact of the COVID-19 outbreak on our business, that of our co-investment ventures, and our
customers for the long-term continues to be uncertain.
 
Given the ongoing and dynamic nature of these circumstances, we cannot predict the extent to which the continuation of the COVID-19
pandemic may impact our business and operating results and that of our co-investment ventures, but its impact may include the
following:
 
• Existing customers and potential customers of our logistics facilities may be adversely af fected by the decrease in economic
activity , which in turn could disrupt their business and their ability to enter into new leasing transactions or satisfy rental payments;
 
• Government, labor or other restrictions may prevent us from completing the development or leasing of properties currently under
development or making our properties ready for our customers to move in;
 
• Our ability to recover our investments in real estate assets may be impacted by current market conditions;
 
• Increases in material costs as a result of labor shortages and supply chain disruptions may make the development of properties
more costly than we originally budgeted; and
 
• Our workforce, including our executives, may become ill or have dif ficulty working remotely , caring for our properties and/or
customers.
 
20
Table of Contents
 
 
Any prolonged economic downturn, escalation of the outbreak or disruption in the financial markets may also impact our ability to access
capital markets to issue debt or equity securities and to complete real estate transactions at attractive pricing or at all.
 
These items may materially and adversely af fect our financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and real estate values.
 
Our business and operations could suf fer in the event of system failures or cyber security attacks.
 
Despite system redundancy , the implementation of security measures and the existence of a disaster recovery plan for our internal and
hosted information technology systems, our systems are vulnerable to damages from any number of sources, including energy
blackouts, natural disasters, terrorism, war , telecommunication failures and cyber security attacks, such as malware, ransomware, or
unauthorized access. Any system failure or accident that causes interruptions in our operations could result in a material disruption to
our business. W e may incur additional costs to remedy damages caused by such disruptions. Third-party security events at vendors,
sub-processors, and service providers could also impact our data and operations via unauthorized access to information or disruption of
services which may ultimately result in financial losses. Despite training, detection systems and response procedures, an increase in
email attacks (phishing and business email compromise) may create disruption to our business and financial risk.
 
Although security incidents have had an insignificant financial impact on our operating results, the growing frequency of attempts may
lead to increased costs to protect the company and respond to any events, including additional personnel, consultants and protection
technologies. Any compromise of our security could result in a violation of applicable privacy and other laws, unauthorized access to
information of ours and others, significant legal and financial exposure, damage to our reputation, loss or misuse of the information and
a loss of confidence in our security measures, which could harm our business. Additionally , remediation costs for security events may
not be covered by our insurance.
 
Risks associated with our dependence on key personnel.
 
We depend on the deep industry knowledge and the ef forts of our executive of ficers and other key employees. From time to time, our
personnel and their roles may change. While we believe that we are able to retain our key talent and find suitable employees to meet
our needs, the loss of key personnel, any change in their roles or the limitation of their availability could adversely af fect our business. If
we are unable to continue to attract and retain our executive of ficers, or if compensation costs required to attract and retain key
employees become more expensive, our performance and competitive position could be materially adversely af fected.
 
Our business could be adversely impacted if we have deficiencies in our disclosure controls and procedures or internal
control over financial reporting.
 
The design and ef fectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting may not prevent all
errors, misstatements or misrepresentations. While management continually reviews the ef fectiveness of our disclosure controls and
procedures and internal control over financial reporting, there can be no guarantee that our internal control over financial reporting will
be ef fective in accomplishing all control objectives all of the time. Deficiencies, including any material weakness, in our internal control
over financial reporting that may occur in the future could result in misstatements or restatements of our financial statements or a decline
in the price of our securities.
 
We are exposed to the potential impacts of future climate change and could be required to implement new or stricter
regulations, which may result in unanticipated losses that could af fect our business and financial condition.
 
We are also exposed to potential physical risks from possible future changes in climate. Our logistics facilities may be exposed to
catastrophic weather events, such as severe storms, fires or floods. If the frequency of extreme weather events increases, our exposure
to these events could increase. W e may be adversely impacted as a real estate developer in the future by potential impacts to the
supply chain or stricter energy ef ficiency standards or greenhouse gas regulations for the commercial building sectors. W e cannot give
any assurance that other such conditions do not exist or may not arise in the future. The potential impacts of future climate change on
our real estate properties could adversely af fect our ability to lease, develop or sell such properties or to borrow using such properties as
collateral.
 
ITEM 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments
 
None.
 
ITEM 2. Properties
 
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION
 
We predominately invest in logistics facilities. Our properties are typically used for distribution, storage, packaging, assembly and light
manufacturing of consumer products. The vast majority of our operating properties are used by our customers for retail and online
fulfillment and business-to-business transactions.
 
The following tables provide details of our consolidated operating properties, investment in land and development portfolio and our O&M
portfolio. The O&M portfolio includes the properties we consolidate and the properties owned by our unconsolidated co-
21
Table of Contents
 
investment ventures reflected at 100% of the amount included in the ventures’  financial statements  as calculated on a GAAP  basis , not
our proportionate share.
 
Included in the operating property information below for our consolidated operating properties are 497 buildings owned primarily by one
co-investment venture that we consolidate but of which we own less than 100% of the equity . No individual property or market amounted
to 10% or more of our consolidated total assets at December 31, 2021, or generated revenue equal to 10% or more of our consolidated
total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2021, with the exception of the Southern California market. Dollars and square feet in
the following tables are in millions:
 
  Consolidated Operating Properties   O&M  
Geographies  Rentable Square
Footage   Gross Book
Value   Encumbrances (1)  Rentable Square
Footage   Gross Book
Value  
U.S.:                     
Atlanta   25  $ 1,629  $ 13   31  $ 2,084 
Baltimore/Washington D.C.   11   1,269   12   15   1,667 
Central PA   15   1,308   -   17   1,428 
Central Valley   17   1,326   9   19   1,461 
Chicago   39   3,248   8   55   4,724 
Dallas/Ft. Worth   32   2,281   8   39   2,872 
Houston   24   2,518   4   31   3,034 
Lehigh Valley   25   3,107   -   28   3,386 
New Jersey/New York City   33   3,869   44   41   5,144 
Orlando   10   1,022   70   11   1,120 
San Francisco Bay Area   20   2,951   9   25   3,611 
Seattle   14   2,066   -   22   2,932 
South Florida   12   1,614   28   19   2,471 
Southern California   77   9,181   14   97   11,515 
Remaining Markets – U.S. (15 markets) (2)   76   5,500   38   102   7,485 
Subtotal U.S.   430   42,889   257   552   54,934 
Other Americas:                     
Brazil  -  -  -   13   641 
Canada   10   833   150   10   833 
Mexico  *   28  -   43   2,765 
Subtotal Other Americas   10   861   150   66   4,239 
Europe:                     
France   1   93  -   33   2,913 
Germany   1   78  -   26   2,387 
Netherlands  *   12  -   24   2,261 
U.K.  *   69  -   28   5,351 
Remaining Countries – Europe (8 countries)
(3)   2   117  -   90   7,064 
Subtotal Europe   4   369   -   201   19,976 
Asia:                     
China  -  -  -   42   3,098 
Japan  *   26  -   40   7,201 
Singapore   1   141  -   1   141 
Subtotal Asia   1   167   -   83   10,440 
Total operating portfolio (4)   445   44,286   407   902   89,589 
Value-added properties (5)   3   626   -   5   968 
Total operating properties   448  $ 44,912  $ 407   907  $ 90,557 
                     
Items notated by ‘*’ indicate an amount less than one million that rounds to zero.  
22
Table of Contents
 
 
 
  Consolidated – Investment in Land   Consolidated – Development Portfolio 
Geographies  Acres  Estimated Build
Out Potential
(square feet) (6)  Current
Investment  Rentable Square
Footage Upon
Completion   TEI (7)  
U.S.:                     
Atlanta   221   3  $ 34   3  $ 191 
Baltimore/Washington D.C.   41  *   18  *   13 
Central PA   29  *   8   -   - 
Central Valley   770   14   158   2   272 
Chicago   134   2   43   2   292 
Dallas/Ft. Worth   351   5   140   2   173 
Houston   163   2   39  *   99 
Lehigh Valley   208   2   77   1   101 
New Jersey/New York City   18   1   56  *   124 
Orlando   100   1   27   1   106 
San Francisco Bay Area   -   -   -  *   42 
Seattle   158   2   116  *   77 
South Florida   150   2   134   1   154 
Southern California   536   10   400   3   468 
Remaining Markets – U.S. (15 markets)   814   12   281   4   368 
Subtotal U.S.   3,693   56   1,531   19   2,480 
Other Americas:                     
Brazil   263   5   52   -   - 
Canada   167   3   125   1   54 
Mexico   681   12   94   1   103 
Subtotal Other Americas   1,111   20   271   2   157 
Europe:                     
France   254   5   137  *   27 
Germany   26   1   12   1   96 
Netherlands   42   1   24   1   138 
U.K.   247   4   295   3   514 
Remaining Countries – Europe (8 countries)  780   16   158   2   178 
Subtotal Europe   1,349   27   626   7   953 
Asia:                     
Japan   74   5   92   7   1,127 
Subtotal Asia   74   5   92   7   1,127 
Total land and development portfolio   6,227   108  $ 2,520   35  $ 4,717 
                     
Items notated by ‘*’ indicate an amount less than one million that rounds to zero.  
 
(1) Certain of our consolidated properties are pledged as security under secured mortgage debt and assessment bonds. For
purposes of this table, the total principal balance of a debt issuance that is secured by a pool of properties is allocated among the
properties in the pool based on each property’ s investment balance. In addition to the amounts reflected here, we also have $10
million of encumbrances related to one land parcel included in the consolidated land portfolio.
 
(2) No remaining market within the U.S. represented more than 2% of the total gross book value of the consolidated operating
properties.
 
(3) No remaining country within Europe represented more than 2% of the total gross book value of the O&M operating properties.
 
(4) Included in our consolidated operating properties are properties that we consider to be held for contribution and are presented
within Assets Held for Sale or Contribution  in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. W e include these properties in our operating
portfolio as they are expected to be contributed to our co-investment ventures and remain in our O&M operating portfolio. At
December 31, 2021, we had investments in real estate properties that were expected to be contributed to our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures totaling $535 million and aggregating 4 million square feet. See Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for further information on our Assets Held for Sale or
Contribution.
 
(5) Value-added properties are properties we have either acquired at a discount and believe we could provide greater returns post-
stabilization or properties we expect to repurpose to a higher and better use.
 
(6) Represents the estimated finished square feet available for lease upon completion of a building on existing parcels of land.
 
 
(7) TEI is based on current projections and is subject to change. As noted in the table below , our current investment in the
development portfolio was $2.7 billion, leaving approximately $2.0 billion of additional required investment. At December 31, 2021,
based on TEI, approximately 18% of the properties in the development portfolio were completed but not yet stabilized, 71% of the
properties were expected to be completed before December 31, 2022, and the remaining properties were expected to be
completed before October 2023.  
23
Table of Contents
 
 
 
The following table summarizes our investment in consolidated real estate properties at December 31, 2021 (in millions):
 
  Investment Before
Depreciation  
Operating properties, excluding assets held for sale or contribution  $ 44,454  
Development portfolio, including cost of land   2,729  
Land   2,520  
Other real estate investments (1)   3,302  
Total consolidated real estate properties  $ 53,005
 
 
(1)Included in other real estate investments were: (i) non-strategic real estate assets acquired that we do not intend to operate long-
term; (ii) real estate assets that we intend to redevelop into industrial properties; (iii) land parcels we own and lease to third
parties; and (iv) costs associated with potential acquisitions and future development projects, including purchase options on land.
 
LEASE EXPIRATIONS
 
We generally lease our properties on a long-term basis (the average term for leases commenced, including new leases and renewals, in
2021 was 62 months). The following table summarizes the lease expirations of our consolidated operating portfolio for leases in place at
December 31, 2021 (dollars and square feet in millions):
                     
          NER  
  Number of
Leases   Occupied
Square Feet   Dollars   % of T otal  Dollars Per
Square Foot  
2022 (1)   780   51  $ 308   10.5% $ 6.04 
2023   927   64   394   13.5%  6.16 
2024   947   64   421   14.4%  6.58 
2025   628   54   359   12.3%  6.65 
2026   775   63   438   15.0%  6.95 
2027   374   40   285   9.7%  7.13 
2028   179   23   161   5.5%  7.00 
2029   132   23   152   5.2%  6.61 
2030   74   15   105   3.6%  7.00 
2031   83   15   108   3.6%  7.20 
Thereafter   70   23   197   6.7%  8.57 
   4,969    435  $ 2,928    100% $ 6.73 
Month to month   93   3             
Total consolidated   5,062    438            
 
 
(1) We have signed leases that were due to expire in 2022, totaling 31 million square feet in our consolidated portfolio (5.7% of total
NER). These are excluded from 2022 expirations and are reflected at their respective expiration year .
 
24
Table of Contents
 
 
CO-INVESTMENT VENTURES
 
Included in our O&M portfolio are consolidated and unconsolidated co-investment ventures that hold investments in real estate
properties, primarily logistics facilities, that we also manage. Our unconsolidated co-investment ventures are accounted for under the
equity method. The amounts included for the unconsolidated ventures are reflected at 100% of the amount included in the ventures’
financial statements as calculated on a GAAP  basis, not our proportionate share. The following table summarizes our consolidated and
unconsolidated co-investment ventures at December 31, 2021 (in millions):  
 
  Operating Properties          
  Square Feet   Gross
Book V alue   Investment
in Land   Development
Portfolio – TEI  
Consolidated Co-Investment V enture                 
U.S.:                 
Prologis U.S. Logistics V enture (“USL V”)   77  $ 7,927   $ 12  $ 6 
Total   77  $ 7,927   $ 12  $ 6 
                 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment V entures                 
U.S.:                 
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund (“USLF”)   122  $ 12,199   $ -  $ 288 
Other Americas:                 
FIBRA  Prologis   43   2,763    -   27 
Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture ("PBL V") and other joint
      ventures   13   641   46   185 
Subtotal Other Americas   56   3,404    46   212 
Europe:                 
Prologis European Logistics Fund (“PELF”) (1)   140   14,560    9   62 
Prologis European Logistics Partners Holdings
     Sàrl (“PELP”)  (1)   58   5,208    35   54 
Subtotal Europe   198   19,768    44   116 
Asia:                 
Nippon Prologis REIT  (“NPR”)   40   7,175    -   - 
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund (“PCCLF”)   26   2,241    -   - 
Prologis China Logistics V enture   16   858   24   786 
Subtotal Asia   82   10,274    24   786 
Total   458  $ 45,645   $ 114  $ 1,402  
                
 
(1) In December 2021, Prologis UK Logistics V enture (“UKL V”) sold its operating properties to our unconsolidated co-investment
ventures, PELF and PELP , and its land to us.
 
For more information regarding our unconsolidated and consolidated co-investment ventures, see Notes 5 and 11 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
ITEM 3. Legal Proceedings
 
From time to time, we and our co-investment ventures are parties to a variety of legal proceedings arising in the ordinary course of
business. We believe that, with respect to any such matters to which we are currently a party , the ultimate disposition of any such matter
will not result in a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial position or results of operations.
 
ITEM 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
 
Not Applicable.
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities
 
MARKET INFORMATION AND HOLDERS
 
Our common stock is listed on the NYSE under the symbol “PLD.”
 
25
Table of Contents
 
 
Stock Performance Graph
 
The following line graph compares the change in Prologis, Inc. cumulative total stockholder ’s return on shares of its common stock from
December 31, 2016, to the cumulative total return of the S&P  500 Stock Index and the Financial Times and Stock Exchange NAREIT
Equity REIT s Index from December 31, 2016, to December 31, 2021. The graph assumes an initial investment of $100 in our common
stock and each of the indices on December 31, 2016, and, as required by the SEC, the reinvestment of all dividends. The return shown
on the graph is not necessarily indicative of future performance.
 
This graph and the accompanying text are not “soliciting material,” are not deemed filed with the SEC and are not to be incorporated by
reference in any filing by the Company under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, whether made before or after the date hereof and irrespective of any general incorporation language in any such filing.
 
PREFERRED STOCK DIVIDENDS
 
At December 31, 2021, we had 1.3 million shares of the Series Q preferred stock with a liquidation preference of $50 per share that will
be redeemable at our option on or after November 13, 2026. Dividends payable per share was $4.27 for the year ended December 31,
2021.
  
For more information regarding dividends, see Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data.
 
SALES OF UNREGISTERED SECURITIES
 
During 2021, we issued 0.8 million shares of common stock of Prologis, Inc. in connection with the redemption of common units of
Prologis, L.P . and issued 1.0 million common units in Prologis, L.P . in connection with the acquisition of additional ownership interest in
an unconsolidated other venture from our partner in reliance on the exemption from registration requirements of the Securities Act of
1933, as amended, af forded by Section 4(a)(2) thereof.
 
26
Table of Contents
 
 
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
 
During 2021, we did not purchase any common stock of Prologis, Inc. in connection with our share purchase program.
 
SECURITIES AUTHORIZED FOR ISSUANCE UNDER EQUITY COMPENSATION PLANS
 
For information regarding securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see Notes 9 and 12 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
OTHER STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
 
Common Stock Plans
 
Further information relative to our equity compensation plans will be provided in our 2022 Proxy Statement or in an amendment filed on
Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 6. [Reserved]
 
ITEM 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
 
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements included in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data of this report and the matters described under Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
A discussion regarding our financial condition and results of operations for 2021 compared to 2020 is presented below . Information on
2019 is included in graphs only to show year over year trends in our results of operations and operating metrics. Our financial condition
for 2019, results of operations for 2019 and 2020 compared to 2019 and details on the IPT  Transaction and LPT  Transaction referenced
throughout this document can be found under Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations, which is incorporated by reference herein to our Annual Report on Form 10-K  for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020,
filed with the SEC on February 11, 2021, and is available on the SEC’ s website at www .sec.gov and our Investor Relations website at
www .ir.prologis.com.
 
MANAGEMENT’S OVERVIEW
 
Summary of 2021
 
Our financial condition and operating results were strong during 2021. E-commerce continues to grow well above its historical average
and demand for space is robust based on our proprietary data. As demand surges, having the right logistics real estate in the right
location is mission critical for our customers, which is evident with our O&M occupancy at 97.7% at December 31, 2021. Leasing activity
accelerated for our portfolio during 2021. Our outlook for 2022 is equally as promising as we expect increases in market rents and asset
valuations to drive our operating results as well as our execution of profitable deployment activities.
 
We generated net proceeds of $5.2 billion and realized net gains of $1.6 billion, principally from the contribution of properties to our
unconsolidated co-investment ventures in Japan, Europe and the U.S. and dispositions to third parties.
 
We earned promotes aggregating $98 million ($43 million net of related expenses), primarily during the fourth quarter of 2021 from one
of our unconsolidated co-investment ventures in Europe.
 
In December 2021, UKL V sold its operating properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, PELF and PELP , and its land to
us.
 
27
Table of Contents
 
 
We completed the following consolidated financing activities that included the issuance of $2.9 billion and redemption of $1.5 billion of
senior notes, with aggregate principal amounts in U.S. dollars. This resulted in a consolidated weighted average remaining maturity of
10 years and lowered our weighted average ef fective interest rate to 1.6% at December 31, 2021 (principal in millions):
 
   Aggregate Principal   Issuance Date W eighted Average    
 Issuance Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate (2)  Term (3)   Maturity Dates
 February  € 1,350   $ 1,639   0.7%    14.3   February 2032 – 2041
 February  $ 400  $ 400  1.6%    10.1   March 2031
 June  ¥ 65,000   $ 587  0.8%    15.4   June 2028 – 2061
 December  £ 215  $ 285  2.0%    17.7   December 2033 – 2041
 Total      $ 2,911   1.0%    14.2    
                    
   Aggregate Principal   Redemption Date W eighted Average    
 Redemption Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate  (2)  Term  (3)   Maturity Date
 March  € 600  $ 716  3.4%    3.0   February 2024
 March  $ 750  $ 750  3.8%    4.7   November 2025
 Total      $ 1,466   3.6%    3.8    
 
 (1) The exchange rate used to calculate into U.S. dollars was the spot rate at the settlement date.
 
 (2) The weighted average interest rate represents the fixed or variable interest rates of the related debt at the issuance or
redemption date.
 
 (3) The weighted average term represents the remaining maturity in years on the related debt at the issuance or redemption
date.
 
At December 31, 2021, we had total available liquidity of $5.0 billion, principally due to aggregate availability under our credit facilities of
$4.4 billion and unrestricted cash balances of $556 million. In April 2021, we increased our available liquidity by entering into a second
global senior credit facility with an available borrowing capacity of $1.0 billion and we terminated the $500 million multi-currency term
loan.
 
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
 
We evaluate our business operations based on the NOI of our two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital.
NOI by segment is a non-GAAP  performance measure that is calculated using revenues and expenses directly from our financial
statements. W e consider NOI by segment to be an appropriate supplemental measure of our performance because it helps
management and investors understand our operating results.
 
Below is a reconciliation of our NOI by segment to Operating Income  per the Consolidated Financial Statements (in millions). Each
segment’ s NOI is reconciled to line items in the Consolidated Financial Statements as provided in the related discussion below .
 
  2021   2020  
Real Estate Operations – NOI  $ 3,105   $ 2,820  
Strategic Capital – NOI   384   419 
General and administrative expenses   (294 )  (275 )
Depreciation and amortization expenses   (1,578 )  (1,562 )
Operating income before gains on real estate transactions, net   1,617    1,402  
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   817   465 
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   773   252 
Operating income  $ 3,207   $ 2,119  
        
 
See Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on our segments and a reconciliation of each business
segment’ s NOI to Operating Income  and Earnings Before Income T axes.
 
Real Estate Operations
 
This operating segment principally includes rental revenue and rental expenses recognized from our consolidated properties. W e
allocate the costs of our property management and leasing functions to the Real Estate Operations segment through Rental Expenses
28
Table of Contents
 
and the Strategic Capital segment through Strategic Capital Expenses based on the square footage of the relative portfolios. In addition,
this segment is impacted by our development, acquisition and disposition activities.
 
Below are the components of Real Estate Operations NOI, derived directly from line items in the Consolidated Financial Statements (in
millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Rental revenues  $ 4,148   $ 3,791  
Development management and other revenues   20   11 
Rental expenses   (1,041 )  (952 )
Other expenses   (22)  (30)
Real Estate Operations – NOI  $ 3,105   $ 2,820
 
 
The change in Real Estate Operations (“REO”) NOI in 2021 compared to 2020 of approximately $285 million was impacted by the
following activities (in millions):
 
 
(1) During both periods, we experienced positive rental rate growth. Rental rate growth is a combination of higher rental rates on
rollover of leases (or rent change) and contractual rent increases on existing leases. If a lease has a contractual rent increase
driven by a metric that is not known at the time the lease commences, such as the consumer price index or a similar metric, the
rent increase is not included in rent leveling and therefore impacts the rental revenue we recognize. Significant rent change during
both periods continues to be a key driver in increasing rental income. See below for key metrics on rent change on rollover and
occupancy for the consolidated operating portfolio.
 
(2) One of the drivers of the increase in NOI in 2021, compared to 2020, was the Liberty Transaction on February 4, 2020. In the
transaction we acquired 519 industrial operating properties, aggregating 100 million square feet, and increased our consolidated
investments in real estate by approximately $13 billion.
 
(3) We calculate changes in NOI from development completions period over period by comparing the change in NOI generated on the
pool of developments that completed on or after January 1, 2020 through December 31, 2021.
 
Below are key operating metrics of our consolidated operating portfolio, which excludes non-strategic industrial properties.
 
 
29
Table of Contents
 
 
(1) In 2020, we completed the Liberty Transaction.
 
(2) Consolidated square feet of leases commenced and weighted average net ef fective rent change were calculated for leases with
initial terms of one year or greater .
 
Development Activity
 
The following table summarizes consolidated development activity (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Starts:         
Number of new development projects during the period   78   42 
Square feet   26   14 
TEI  $ 3,478   $ 1,997  
Percentage of build-to-suits based on TEI   46.2%  40.0%
         
Stabilizations:         
Number of development projects stabilized during the period   62   66 
Square feet   19   23 
TEI  $ 2,329   $ 2,451  
Percentage of build-to-suits based on TEI   42.7%  48.9%
Weighted average stabilized yield (1)   6.1%  6.3%
Estimated value at completion  $ 3,613   $ 3,383  
Estimated weighted average margin (2)   55.1%  38.0%
Estimated value creation  $ 1,284   $ 932
 
 
(1) We calculate the weighted average stabilized yield as estimated NOI assuming stabilized occupancy divided by TEI.
 
(2) Estimated weighted average margin is calculated on development properties as estimated value creation, less estimated closing
costs and taxes, if any , on properties expected to be sold or contributed, divided by TEI.
 
At December 31, 2021, the consolidated development portfolio, including properties under development and pre-stabilized properties,
was expected to be completed before October 2023 with a TEI of $4.7 billion, leaving $2.0 billion remaining to be spent and was 54.6%
leased. While construction costs increased during 2021, we continue to maintain high margins as a result of lower capitalization rates
and higher market rents. Our current investment in the development portfolio was $2.7 billion and we expect our development activities
to increase in 2022. For additional information on our development portfolio at December 31, 2021, see Item 2. Properties.
 
30
Table of Contents
 
 
Capital Expenditures
 
We capitalize costs incurred in improving and leasing our operating properties as part of the investment basis or within other assets. The
following graph summarizes capitalized expenditures, excluding development costs, and property improvements per average square
foot of our consolidated operating properties during each year:
 
 
Our capital expenditures continue to increase year over year as we grow the consolidated operating portfolio through development
stabilizations and acquisitions. W e plan to continue allocating capital in 2022 to renovate and modernize our operating portfolio,
including the addition of sustainable and ef ficient building features.  
 
Strategic Capital
 
This operating segment includes revenues from asset management and property management services performed, transactional
services for acquisition, disposition and leasing activity and promote revenue earned from the unconsolidated entities. Revenues
associated with the Strategic Capital segment fluctuate because of changes in the size of the portfolios through acquisitions and
dispositions, the fair value of the properties and other transactional activity including foreign currency exchange rates and timing of
promotes. These revenues are reduced by the direct costs associated with the asset and property-level management expenses for the
properties owned by these ventures. W e allocate the costs of our property management and leasing functions to the Strategic Capital
segment through Strategic Capital Expenses and to the Real Estate Operations segment through Rental Expenses based on the square
footage of the relative portfolios. For further details regarding the key property information and summarized financial condition and
operating results of our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, refer to Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
Below are the components of Strategic Capital NOI derived directly from the line items in the Consolidated Financial Statements (in
millions):  
 
  2021   2020  
Strategic capital revenues  $ 591  $ 637 
Strategic capital expenses   (207 )   (218 )
Strategic Capital – NOI  $ 384  $ 419 
         
Below is additional detail of our Strategic Capital revenues, expenses and NOI (in millions):
 
  U.S. (1) Other Americas Europe Asia Total
  2021  2020  2021  2020  2021  2020  2021  2020  2021  2020  
Strategic capital revenues ($)                                          
Recurring fees (2)   136   111   38   32   156   120   79   68   409   331  
Transactional fees (3)   14   16   8   5   30   20   32   26   84   67  
Promote revenue (4)   22   228   13   1   63   5   -   5   98   239  
Total strategic capital revenues ($)   172   355   59   38   249   145   111   99   591   637  
Strategic capital expenses ($) (4)   (112)  (118)  (12)  (13)  (45)  (45)  (38)  (42)  (207)  (218) 
Strategic Capital - NOI ($)   60   237   47   25   204   100   73   57   384   419  
                                          
(1) The U.S. expenses include compensation and personnel costs for employees who are based in the U.S. but also support other
geographies.
 
(2) Recurring fees include asset management and property management fees. The increase in fees in 2021 as compared to 2020 is
due primarily to higher asset management fees driven by the increases in the fair value of the properties based on third party
valuations.
 
(3) Transactional fees include leasing commissions and acquisition, disposition, development and other fees.
31
Table of Contents
 
 
 
(4) We generally earn promote revenue directly from third-party investors in the co-investment ventures based on the cumulative
returns of the venture over a three-year period or the stabilization of individual development projects owned by the venture.  An
increase in asset valuations in the co-investment ventures, as we have experienced in 2021, is one of the significant drivers of
returns that can translate into earning future promote revenues. Approximately 40% of the promote earned by us from the co-
investment ventures is paid to our employees as a combination of cash and stock awards pursuant to the terms of the PPP  and
expensed through Strategic Capital Expenses, as vested.
 
G&A Expenses
 
G&A expenses were $294 million and $275 million for 2021 and 2020, respectively . G&A  expenses increased in 2021 as compared to
2020, due to higher compensation expenses based largely on our outperformance and the increase in our share price. W e capitalize
certain internal costs, including salaries and related expenses, directly related primarily to our development activities. For discussion on
our long-term incentive plans refer to the proxy statement for our 2021 annual meeting of stockholders.
 
The following table summarizes capitalized G&A  (in millions):  
 
  2021   2020  
Building and land development activities  $ 95  $ 73 
Operating building improvements and other   29   23 
Total capitalized G&A  expenses  $ 124  $ 96 
Capitalized salaries and related costs as a percent of total salaries and related costs   21.9%  20.2%
 
Depreciation and Amortization Expenses
 
Depreciation and amortization expenses were $1.6 billion in both 2021 and 2020.
 
The change in depreciation and amortization expenses in 2021 compared to 2020 of approximately $16 million was impacted by the
following activities (in millions):
 
 
(1) Included in acquisitions are the operating properties and related intangible assets acquired in the Liberty Transaction.
 
Gains on Real Estate Transactions, Net
 
Gains on the disposition of development properties and land were $817 million and $465 million for 2021 and 2020, respectively , and
primarily included gains from the contribution of properties we developed to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures in Japan, the
U.S. and Europe. Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate were $773 million and $252 million for 2021 and 2020,
respectively , which included sales of operating properties, including certain non-strategic assets acquired in the Liberty Transaction  and
the IPT  Transaction, the contribution of operating properties to our unconsolidated co-investment venture in the U.S. and the sale of our
ownership interest in other unconsolidated ventures. W e utilized the proceeds from these transactions primarily to fund our development
activities during both periods. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on these transactions.
 
32
Table of Contents
 
 
Our Owned and Managed (“O&M”) Operating Portfolio
 
We manage our business and review our operating fundamentals on an O&M basis, which includes our consolidated properties and
properties owned by our unconsolidated co-investment ventures. W e believe reviewing the fundamentals this way allows management
to understand the entire impact to the financial statements, as it will af fect both the Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital
segments, as well as the net earnings we recognize from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on our ownership. W e do
not control the unconsolidated co-investment ventures for purposes of GAAP  and the presentation of the ventures’  operating information
does not represent a legal claim.
 
Our O&M operating portfolio does not include our development portfolio, value-added properties, non-industrial properties or properties
we do not have the intent to hold long-term that are classified as either held for sale or within other real estate investments. Value-added
properties are properties we have either acquired at a discount and believe we could provide greater returns post-stabilization or
properties we expect to repurpose to a higher and better use. See below for information on our O&M operating portfolio at December 31
(square feet in millions):
 
 2021   2020  
 Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied   Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied  
Consolidated  2,300    446   98.2%  2,252    441   96.6%
Unconsolidated  1,987    456   97.3%  1,849    416   95.9%
Total  4,287    902   97.7%  4,101    857   96.2%
 
Below are the key leasing metrics of our O&M operating portfolio.
 
 
 (1) Square feet of leases commenced and weighted average net ef fective rent change were calculated for leases with initial terms of
one year or greater . We retained approximately 70% or more of our customers, based on the total square feet of leases
commenced, for each year .
 
 (2) Turnover costs include external leasing commissions and tenant improvements and represent the obligations incurred in
connection with the lease commencement for leases greater than one year . As a result of higher rents on leases that commenced
in 2021, leasing commissions on a per square foot basis have continued to increase as commissions are based on the
contractual rent we receive over the lease term.
 
Same Store Analysis
 
Our same store metrics are non-GAAP  financial measures, which are commonly used in the real estate industry and expected from the
financial community , on both a net ef fective and cash basis. W e evaluate the performance of the operating properties we own and
manage using a “same store” analysis because the population of properties in this analysis is consistent from period to period, which
allows us and investors to analyze our ongoing business operations. W e determine our same store metrics on property NOI, which is
calculated as rental revenue less rental expense for the applicable properties in the same store population for both consolidated and
unconsolidated properties based on our ownership interest, as further defined below .
 
We define our same store population for the three months ended December 31, 2021 as the properties in our O&M operating portfolio,
including the property NOI for both consolidated properties and properties owned by the unconsolidated co-investment ventures at
January 1, 2020 and owned throughout the same three-month period in both 2020 and 2021. W e believe the drivers of property NOI for
the consolidated portfolio are generally the same for the properties owned by the ventures in which we invest and therefore we evaluate
the same store metrics of the O&M portfolio based on Prologis’  ownership in the properties (“Prologis Share”). The same store
population excludes properties held for sale to third parties, along with development properties that were not stabilized at the beginning
of the period (January 1, 2020) and properties acquired or disposed of to third parties during the period. To derive an appropriate
measure of period-to-period operating performance, we remove the ef fects of foreign currency exchange rate movements by using the
reported period-end exchange rate to translate from local currency into the U.S. dollar , for both periods.
33
Table of Contents
 
 
As non-GAAP  financial measures, the same store metrics have certain limitations as an analytical tool and may vary among real estate
companies. As a result, we provide a reconciliation of Rental Revenues  less Rental Expenses  (“Property NOI”) (from our Consolidated
Financial Statements prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP) to our Same Store Property NOI measures.
 
We evaluate the results of our same store portfolio on a quarterly basis. The following is a reconciliation of our consolidated rental
revenues, rental expenses and property NOI for each quarter in 2021 and 2020 to the full year , as included in the Consolidated
Statements of Income and within Note 19 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and to the respective amounts in our same store
portfolio analysis for the three months ended December 31 (dollars in millions):
 
  Three Months Ended      
  March 31,   June 30,   September 30,   December 31,   Full Year  
2021                     
Rental revenues  $ 1,022   $ 1,015   $ 1,037   $ 1,074   $ 4,148  
Rental expenses   (278 )  (245 )  (256 )  (262 )  (1,041 )
Property NOI  $ 744  $ 770  $ 781  $ 812  $ 3,107  
2020                     
Rental revenues  $ 879  $ 944  $ 980  $ 988  $ 3,791  
Rental expenses   (228 )  (232 )  (245 )  (247 )  (952 )
Property NOI  $ 651  $ 712  $ 735  $ 741  $ 2,839
 
 
 Three Months Ended
December 31,      
 2021   2020   % Change  
Reconciliation of Consolidated Property NOI to Same Store Property NOI measures:  
            
Rental revenues $ 1,074   $ 988     
Rental expenses  (262 )  (247 )    
Consolidated Property NOI $ 812  $ 741     
            
Adjustments to derive same store results:            
Property NOI from consolidated properties not included in same store portfolio and
     other adjustments  (1)  (259 )  (228 )    
Property NOI from unconsolidated co-investment ventures included in same store
     portfolio  (1)(2)  572   542     
Third parties' share of Property NOI from properties included in same store portfolio (1)(2) (459 )  (438 )    
Prologis Share of Same Store Property NOI – Net Effective  (2) $ 666  $ 617   7.9%
Consolidated properties straight-line rent and fair value lease adjustments
     included in same store portfolio (3)  (14)  (11)    
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures straight-line rent and fair value lease
     adjustments included in same store portfolio  (3)  (12)  (14)    
Third parties' share of straight-line rent and fair value lease adjustments included
     in same store portfolio  (2)(3)  8   11     
Prologis Share of Same Store Property NOI – Cash  (2)(3) $ 648  $ 603   7.5%
 
(1) We exclude properties held for sale to third parties, along with development properties that were not stabilized at the beginning of
the period and properties acquired or disposed of to third parties during the period. W e also exclude net termination and
renegotiation fees to allow us to evaluate the growth or decline in each property’ s rental revenues without regard to one-time items
that are not indicative of the property’ s recurring operating performance. Net termination and renegotiation fees represent the
gross fee negotiated to allow a customer to terminate or renegotiate their lease, of fset by the write-of f of the asset recorded due to
the adjustment to straight-line rents over the lease term. Same Store Property NOI is adjusted to include an allocation of property
management expenses for our consolidated properties based on the property management services provided to each property
(generally , based on a percentage of revenues). On consolidation, these amounts are eliminated and the actual costs of providing
property management and leasing services are recognized as part of our consolidated rental expense.
 
(2) We include the Property NOI for the same store portfolio for both consolidated properties and properties owned by the co-
investment ventures based on our investment in the underlying properties. In order to calculate our share of Same Store Property
NOI from the co-investment ventures in which we own less than 100%, we use the co-investment ventures’  underlying Property
NOI for the same store portfolio and apply our ownership percentage at December 31, 2021 to the Property NOI for both periods,
including the properties contributed during the period. W e adjust the total Property NOI from the same store portfolio of the co-
investment ventures by subtracting the third parties’  share of both consolidated and unconsolidated co-investment ventures .
 
During the periods presented, certain wholly owned properties were contributed to a co-investment venture and are included in the
same store portfolio. Neither our consolidated results nor those of the co-investment ventures, when viewed individually ,
34
Table of Contents
 
would be comparable on a same store basis because of the changes in composition of the respective portfolios from period to
period (e.g. the results of a contributed property are included in our consolidated results through the contribution date and in the
results of the venture subsequent to the contribution date based on our ownership interest at the end of the period). As a result,
only line items labeled “Prologis Share of Same Store Property NOI” are comparable period over period.
 
(3) We further remove certain noncash items (straight-line rent and amortization of fair value lease adjustments) included in the
financial statements prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP  to reflect a Same Store Property NOI – Cash measure.
 
We manage our business and compensate our executives based on the same store results of our O&M portfolio at 100% as we manage
our portfolio on an ownership blind basis. W e calculate those results by including 100% of the properties included in our same store
portfolio.
 
Other Components of Income (Expense)
 
Earnings from Unconsolidated Entities, Net
 
We recognized net earnings from unconsolidated entities, which are accounted for using the equity method, of $404 million and $297
million during 2021 and 2020, respectively . Included in 2021 is our share of the gains recognized upon the sale of certain non-strategic
assets acquired in the IPT  Transaction and the sale by UKL V of its operating properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures,
PELF and PELP .
 
The earnings we recognize can be impacted by: (i) variances in revenues and expenses of each venture; (ii) the size and occupancy
rate of the portfolio of properties owned by each venture; (iii) gains or losses from the dispositions of properties and extinguishment of
debt; (iv) our ownership interest in each venture; and (v) fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates used to translate our share of
net earnings to U.S. dollars. See the discussion of our unconsolidated entities above in the Strategic Capital segment discussion and in
Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for a further breakdown of our share of net earnings recognized.
 
Interest Expense
 
The following table details our net interest expense (dollars in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Gross interest expense  $ 299  $ 348 
Amortization of debt discount and debt issuance costs, net   9   9 
Capitalized amounts   (42)   (42)
Net interest expense  $ 266  $ 315 
Weighted average ef fective interest rate during the year   1.7%  2.2%
 
Although our debt balances have increased, interest expense decreased in 2021 as compared to 2020 due to our refinancing activities
to redeem higher interest rate senior notes before their stated maturities. As a result of these activities, we lowered the consolidated
weighted average ef fective interest rate on our senior notes from 2.4% on January 1, 2020 to 1.7% on December 31, 2021 while
extending the weighted average remaining maturity of our senior notes from 8 to 12 years over the same two-year period.
 
See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and the Liquidity and Capital Resources section below , for further discussion of
our debt and borrowing costs.
 
Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net
 
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange risk related to investments in and earnings from our foreign investments.  We may use
derivative financial instruments to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk related to our earnings. W e recognize the change in fair
value of the undesignated derivative contracts in unrealized gains and losses. Upon settlement of these transactions, we recognize
realized gains or losses.
 
We primarily hedge our foreign currency risk related to our investments by borrowing in the currencies in which we invest thereby
providing a natural hedge. W e have issued debt in a currency that is not the same functional currency of the borrowing entity and have
designated a portion of the debt as a nonderivative net investment hedge. We recognize the remeasurement and settlement of the
translation adjustment on the unhedged portion of the debt and accrued interest in unrealized gains or losses.
35
Table of Contents
 
 
The following table details our foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net included in earnings (in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Realized foreign currency and derivative losses, net:         
Losses on the settlement of undesignated derivatives  $ (8)  $ (6)
Losses on the settlement of transactions with third parties   (1)  - 
Total realized foreign currency and derivative losses, net   (9)  (6)
         
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net:         
Gains (losses) on the change in fair value of undesignated derivatives and unhedged debt   169   (152 )
Gains (losses) on remeasurement of certain assets and liabilities   4   (9)
Total unrealized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   173   (161 )
Total foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net  $ 164  $ (167 )
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our foreign currency and derivative financial instrument
policies and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our derivative and nonderivative transactions.
 
Losses on Early Extinguishment of Debt, Net
 
We recognized $187 million and $188 million of losses on the early extinguishment of debt in 2021 and 2020, respectively . The losses
during both periods were driven by the redemption of certain higher interest rate senior notes before their stated maturity . We compare
any prepayment penalties incurred from the early redemption of the borrowings to the potential interest savings over the term, and make
a decision to refinance the debt when it is economically viable. W e redeemed $1.5 billion of senior notes with stated maturities of 2024
and 2025 in 2021 and $2.6 billion of senior notes with stated maturities between 2021 and 2024 in 2020. The losses in 2020 also
included the extinguishment of debt assumed in the Liberty Transaction and the IPT  Transaction, which represented the excess of the
prepayment penalties over the premium recorded upon assumption of the debt. See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements
and the Liquidity and Capital Resources section, for more information regarding our debt repurchases.
 
Income Tax Expense
 
We recognize income tax expense related to our taxable REIT  subsidiaries and in the local, state and foreign jurisdictions in which we
operate. Our current income tax expense fluctuates from period to period based primarily on the timing of our taxable income, including
gains on the disposition of properties and fees earned from the co-investment ventures. Deferred income tax expense (benefit) is
generally a function of the period’ s temporary dif ferences and the utilization of net operating losses generated in prior years that had
been previously recognized as deferred income tax assets in taxable subsidiaries.
 
The following table summarizes our income tax expense (benefit) (in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Current income tax expense:         
Income tax expense  $ 108  $ 83 
Income tax expense on dispositions   62   41 
Income tax expense on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   3   6 
Total current income tax expense   173   130 
         
Deferred income tax expense (benefit):         
Income tax expense   4   6 
Income tax benefit on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   (3)  (6)
Total deferred income tax expense   1   - 
Total income tax expense  $ 174  $ 130
 
 
Our income taxes are discussed in more detail in Note 13 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
 
This amount represents the third-party investors’  share of the earnings generated in consolidated entities in which we do not own 100%
of the equity , reduced by the third-party share of fees or promotes payable to us and earned during the period.  We had net earnings
attributable to noncontrolling interests of $209 million and $135 million in 2021 and 2020, respectively . Included in these amounts were
$82 million and $42 million in 2021 and 2020, respectively , of net earnings attributable to the common limited partnership unitholders of
Prologis, L.P . The recognition of net gains on the sale of the non-strategic assets identified for disposition in the IPT  Transaction also
increased the net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests in 2021.
 
36
Table of Contents
 
 
See Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on our noncontrolling interests.
 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
The key driver of changes in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) (“AOCI/L”)  in 2021 and 2020 was the currency
translation adjustment derived from changes in exchange rates during both periods primarily on our net investments in real estate
outside the U.S. and the borrowings we issue in the functional currencies of the countries where we invest. These borrowings serve as a
natural hedge of our foreign investments. In addition, we use derivative financial instruments, such as foreign currency forward and
option contracts to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk related to our foreign investments, that when designated the change in
fair value is included in AOCI/L .
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our foreign currency and derivative financial instrument
policies and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our derivative and nonderivative transactions
and other comprehensive income (loss).
 
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
 
See Note 16 in the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information about environmental liabilities.
 
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
 
Overview
 
We consider our ability to generate cash from operating activities, distributions from our co-investment ventures, contributions and
dispositions of properties and available financing sources to be adequate to meet our anticipated future development, acquisition,
operating, debt service, dividend and distribution requirements.
 
Near-Term Principal Cash Sources and Uses
 
In addition to dividends and distributions, we expect our primary cash needs will consist of the following:
 
• completion of the development and leasing of the properties in our consolidated development portfolio (at December 31, 2021, 99
properties in our development portfolio were 54.6% leased with a current investment of $2.7 billion and a TEI of $4.7 billion when
completed and leased, leaving $2.0 billion of estimated additional required investment);
 
• development of new properties that we may hold for long-term investment or subsequently contribute to unconsolidated co-
investment ventures, including the acquisition of land in certain markets;
 
• capital expenditures and leasing costs on properties in our operating portfolio;
 
• repayment of debt and scheduled principal payments of $986 million in 2022;
 
• additional investments in current and future unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures; and
 
• acquisition of operating properties or portfolios of operating properties (depending on market and other conditions) for direct, long-
term investment in our consolidated portfolio (this might include acquisitions from our co-investment ventures).
 
We expect to fund our cash needs principally from the following sources (subject to market conditions):
 
• net cash flow from property operations;
 
• fees earned for services performed on behalf of co-investment ventures, including promotes;
 
• distributions received from co-investment ventures;
 
• proceeds from the contributions of properties to current or future co-investment ventures;
 
• proceeds from disposition of properties, land parcels or other investments to third parties;
 
• available unrestricted cash balances ($556 million at December 31, 2021);
 
• borrowing capacity under our current credit facility arrangements ($4.4 billion available at December 31, 2021); and
 
• proceeds from the issuance of debt.
 
37
Table of Contents
 
 
Long-term, we may also have a primary cash need related to the voluntary repurchase of our outstanding debt or equity securities
(depending on prevailing market conditions, our liquidity , contractual restrictions and other factors) through cash purchases, open-
market purchases, privately negotiated transactions, tender of fers or otherwise. W e may also fund our cash needs from the issuance of
equity securities, subject to market conditions, and the sale of a portion of our investments in co-investment ventures to achieve long-
term ownership targets.
 
Debt
 
The following table summarizes information about our consolidated debt by currency at December 31 (dollars in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
  Weighted Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of T otal  Weighted Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total  
British pound sterling   2.1% $ 1,377    7.8%  2.2% $ 1,019    6.1%
Canadian dollar   2.7%  284   1.6%  2.7%  286   1.7%
Euro   1.0%  7,408    41.8%  1.4%  6,550    38.8%
Japanese yen   0.9%  2,879    16.2%  0.8%  2,877    17.1%
U.S. dollar   2.6%  5,767    32.6%  2.8%  6,117    36.3%
Total debt (1)   1.6% $ 17,715    100.0 %  1.9% $ 16,849    100.0 %
 
(1) The weighted average remaining maturity for total debt outstanding at both December 31, 2021 and 2020 was 10 years.
 
Our credit ratings at December 31, 2021, were A3 from Moody’ s with a stable outlook and A- from Standard & Poor ’s with a positive
outlook. These ratings allow us to borrow at an advantageous interest rate. Adverse changes in our credit ratings could negatively
impact our business and, in particular , our refinancing and other capital market activities, our ability to manage debt maturities, our future
growth and our development and acquisition activity . A securities rating is not a recommendation to buy , sell or hold securities and is
subject to revision or withdrawal at any time by the rating organization.
 
At December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with all of our financial debt covenants. These covenants include a number of customary
financial covenants , such as maintaining debt service coverage ratios, leverage ratios and fixed charge coverage ratios.
 
See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion on our debt.
 
Equity Commitments Related to Certain Co-Investment Ventures
 
Certain co-investment ventures have equity commitments from us and our venture partners. Our venture partners fulfill their equity
commitment with cash. W e may fulfill our equity commitment through contributions of properties or cash.
 
The following table summarizes the remaining equity commitments at December 31, 2021 (in millions):
 
  Equity Commitments (1)    
  Prologis   Venture Partners   Total   Expiration Date
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund  $ -  $ 2,114   $ 2,114   2023 – 2024 (2)
Prologis European Logistics Fund   -   1,803    1,803   2023 – 2024 (2)
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund   -   133   133  2022 – 2024 (2)
Prologis China Logistics V enture   272   1,543    1,815   2023 – 2028
Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture   40   161   201  2026
Total  $ 312  $ 5,754   $ 6,066    
 
(1) The equity commitments for the co-investment ventures that operate in a dif ferent functional currency than the U.S. dollar were
calculated using the foreign currency exchange rate at December 31, 2021.
 
(2) Venture partners have the option to cancel their equity commitment up to 18 months after the initial commitment date.
 
See the Cash Flow Summary below for more information about our investment activity in our co-investment ventures.
 
38
Table of Contents
 
 
Cash Flow Summary
 
The following table summarizes our cash flow activity (in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Net cash provided by operating activities  $ 2,996   $ 2,937  
Net cash used in investing activities  $ (1,990 ) $ (3,074 )
Net cash used in financing activities  $ (1,008 ) $ (372 )
Net decrease in cash and cash equivalents, including the ef fect of foreign
    currency exchange rates on cash  $ (42) $ (491 )
 
Operating Activities
 
Cash provided by and used in operating activities, exclusive of changes in receivables and payables, was impacted by the following
significant activities:
 
• Real estate operations. We receive the majority of our operating cash through the net revenues of our Real Estate Operations
segment, including the recovery of our operating costs. Cash flows generated by the Real Estate Operations segment are
impacted by our acquisition, development and disposition activities, which are drivers of NOI recognized during each period. See
the Results of Operations section above for further explanation of our Real Estate Operations segment. The revenues from this
segment include noncash adjustments for straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases of $148 million
and $126 million for 2021 and 2020, respectively .
 
• Strategic capital.  We also generate operating cash through our Strategic Capital segment by providing asset management and
property management and other services to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures. See the Results of Operations section
above for the key drivers of the net revenues from our Strategic Capital segment. Included in Strategic Capital Revenues  is the
third-party investors’  share that is owed for promotes, which is recognized in operating activities in the period the cash is received,
generally the quarter after the revenue is recognized.
 
• G&A  expenses and equity-based compensation awards.  We incurred $294 million and $275 million of G&A  expenses in 2021
and 2020, respectively . We recognized equity-based, noncash compensation expenses of $113 million and $110 million in 2021
and 2020, respectively , which were recorded to Rental Expenses in the Real Estate Operations segment, Strategic Capital
Expenses in the Strategic Capital segment and G&A Expenses.
 
• Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities.  We received $440 million and $451 million of distributions as a return on
our investment from the cash flows generated from the operations of our unconsolidated entities in 2021 and 2020, respectively .
 
• Cash paid for interest, net of amounts capitalized.  We paid interest, net of amounts capitalized, of $279 million and $309
million in 2021 and 2020, respectively . See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on this activity .
 
• Cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds.  We paid income taxes, net of refunds, of $149 million and $101 million in 2021 and
2020, respectively . See Note 13 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on this activity .
 
Investing Activities
 
Cash provided by investing activities is driven by proceeds from contributions and dispositions of real estate. During 2021, our
dispositions included significant contributions of properties we developed to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures as well as the
sale of operating properties. Cash used in investing activities is primarily driven by our capital deployment activities of investing in real
estate development, acquisitions and capital expenditures. During 2021, our acquisitions included significant acquisitions of land for
future development, operating properties and other real estate assets, including Covered Land Plays to support increased development
activities in the future. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on these activities. In addition, the
following significant transactions also impacted our cash used in and provided by investing activities:  
 
• Liberty T ransaction, net of cash acquired . We paid net cash of $29 million to complete the Liberty Transaction in 2020, primarily
due to transaction costs. The acquisition was financed through the issuance of equity and the assumption of debt. A portion of this
debt was paid down subsequent to the acquisition, see the Financing Activities section below . See Note 3 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements for more information on this transaction.
 
• IPT T ransaction, net of cash acquired . Our consolidated co-investment venture, USL V, acquired real estate assets from IPT  for
a cash purchase price of $1.7 billion in 2020. Our partner in USL V contributed their share of the purchase price, $917 million,
which is presented in Noncontrolling Interests Contributions  in financing activities. All of the debt assumed was paid down
subsequent to the acquisition, see the Financing Activities section below . See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for
more information on this transaction.
39
Table of Contents
 
 
• Investments in and advances to our unconsolidated entities.  We invested cash in our unconsolidated entities that represented
our proportionate share, of $798 million and $386 million in 2021 and 2020, respectively . The ventures used the funds for the
acquisition of properties, development and repayment of debt. See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more
detail on our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
• Return of investment from unconsolidated entities. We received distributions from unconsolidated entities as a return of
investment of $58 million and $257 million in 2021 and 2020, respectively . Included in these amounts were distributions from
venture activities including proceeds from property sales, debt refinancing and the redemption of our investment in certain
unconsolidated entities.
 
Financing Activities
 
Cash provided by and used in financing activities is principally driven by proceeds from and payments on credit facilities and other debt,
along with dividends paid on common and preferred stock and noncontrolling interest contributions and distributions.
 
• Repurchase of common and preferred stock. We paid $35 million and $7 million to repurchase common shares and shares of
Series Q preferred stock, respectively , during 2020.
 
Our repurchase of and payments on debt and proceeds from the issuance of debt consisted of the following activity (in millions):
 
  2021   2020 (1) 
Repurchase of and payments on debt (including extinguishment costs)         
Regularly scheduled debt principal payments and payments at maturity  $ 10  $ 10 
Secured mortgage debt   656   565 
Senior notes   1,644    4,856  
Term loans   250   1,351  
Total  $ 2,560   $ 6,782  
         
Proceeds from the issuance of debt         
Secured mortgage debt  $ 242  $ 155 
Senior notes   2,902    6,170  
Term loans   454   1,500  
Total  $ 3,598   $ 7,825
 
 
(1) We completed the Liberty Transaction in 2020 and assumed $2.8 billion of debt, of which $1.8 billion was paid of f with the
proceeds from the issuance of senior notes. USL V assumed $342 million of debt in the IPT  Transaction, all of which was paid of f
at closing. The assumption of debt was excluded from the table above.
 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment Venture Debt
 
We had investments in and advances to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures of $7.8 billion at December 31, 2021. These
ventures listed below had total third-party debt of $12.0 billion at December 31, 2021 with a weighted average remaining maturity of 7
years and weighted average interest rate of 2.2% . Certain of our ventures do not have third-party debt and are therefore excluded. This
debt is non-recourse to Prologis and other investors in the co-investment ventures and bears interest as follows at December 31, 2021
(dollars in millions):
 
  Total (1)  Weighted Average Interest Rate   Gross Book V alue (1)  Ownership %  
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund  $3,069   3.0%   $ 12,714   27.0%  
FIBRA  Prologis   1,052   3.8%    2,780   47.3%  
Prologis European Logistics Fund   3,737   1.5%    14,703   23.8%  
Nippon Prologis REIT   2,621   0.6%    7,198   15.1%  
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund   760  5.3%    2,240   15.3%  
Prologis China Logistics V enture   776  2.9%    1,409   15.0%  
Total  $12,015       $ 41,044     
 
 
(1) The weighted average loan-to-value ratio for all unconsolidated co-investment ventures was 25.4% at December 31, 2021. Loan-
to-value, a non-GAAP  measure, was calculated as the percentage of total third-party debt to the gross book value of real estate
for each venture and weighted based on the cumulative gross book value of all unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
At December 31, 2021, we did not guarantee any third-party debt of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures. In our role as the
manager or sponsor , we work with the co-investment ventures to maintain suf ficient liquidity and refinance their maturing debt. There
can be no assurance that the co-investment ventures will be able to refinance any maturing indebtedness on terms as favorable as the
40
Table of Contents
 
maturing debt, or at all. If the ventures are unable to refinance the maturing indebtedness with newly issued debt, they may be able to
obtain funds by voluntary capital contributions from us and our partners or by selling assets. Certain of our ventures also have credit
facilities, or unencumbered properties, both of which may be used to obtain funds.
 
Dividend and Distribution Requirements
 
Our dividend policy on our common stock is to distribute a percentage of our cash flow to ensure that we will meet the dividend
requirements of the IRC, relative to maintaining our REIT  status, while still allowing us to retain cash to fund our capital deployment and
other investment activities.
 
Under the IRC, REIT s may be subject to certain federal income and excise taxes on undistributed taxable income.
 
We paid quarterly cash dividends of $0.63 and $0.58 per common share in 2021 and 2020, respectively . Our future common stock
dividends, if and as declared, may vary and will be determined by the Board based upon the circumstances prevailing at the time,
including our financial condition, operating results and REIT  distribution requirements, and may be adjusted at the discretion of the
Board during the year .
 
We make distributions on the common limited partnership units outstanding at the same per unit amount as our common stock dividend.
The Class A Units in the OP  are entitled to a quarterly distribution equal to $0.64665 per unit so long as the common units receive a
quarterly distribution of at least $0.40 per unit. W e paid a quarterly cash distribution of $0.64665 per Class A Unit in 2021 and 2020.
 
At December 31, 2021, our Series Q preferred stock had an annual dividend rate of 8.54% per share and the dividends are payable
quarterly in arrears.
 
Pursuant to the terms of our preferred stock, we are restricted from declaring or paying any dividend with respect to our common stock
unless and until all cumulative dividends with respect to the preferred stock have been paid and suf ficient funds have been set aside for
dividends that have been declared for the relevant dividend period with respect to the preferred stock.
 
Other Commitments
 
On an ongoing basis, we are engaged in various stages of negotiations for the acquisition or disposition of individual properties or
portfolios of properties.
 
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES
 
A critical accounting policy is one that involves an estimate or assumption that is subjective and requires management judgment about
the ef fect of a matter that is inherently uncertain and material to an entity’ s financial condition and results of operations. Management’ s
judgment considers historical and current economic conditions and expectations for the future. Changes in estimates could af fect our
financial position and specific items in our results of operations that are used by stockholders, potential investors, industry analysts and
lenders in their evaluation of our performance. Of the significant accounting policies discussed in Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, those presented below have been identified by us as meeting the criteria to be considered critical accounting policies as
they relate to our financial condition as of the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 and our operating results for the three-year
period ended December 31, 2021. Refer to Note 2 for more information on these critical accounting policies.
 
Asset Acquisitions
 
We generally account for an acquisition of a single property or portfolio of properties as an asset acquisition. W e measure the real estate
assets acquired through an asset acquisition based on their cost or total consideration exchanged and any excess consideration or
bargain purchase amount is allocated to the real estate properties and related lease intangibles on a relative fair value basis. Assets we
do not intend to hold long-term are recorded at fair value. At a property-level, we allocate the fair value to the components, which include
building, land, improvements, and intangible assets or liabilities related to acquired leases. The most significant portion of the allocation
is to building and land and requires the use of market based estimates and assumptions.
 
The purchase price allocation is based on the expected future cash flows of the property and various characteristics of the markets
where the property is located utilizing an income approach methodology , which may be a discounted cash flow analysis or applying a
capitalization rate to the estimated NOI of a property . Key assumptions include market rents, growth rates, and discount and
capitalization rates. Estimates of future cash flows are based on a number of factors including historical operating results, known trends
and market and economic conditions. W e determine discount and capitalization rates by market based on recent transactions and other
market data and adjust if necessary , based on the property characteristics. The fair value of land is generally based on relevant market
data, such as a comparison of the subject site to similar parcels that have recently been sold or are currently being of fered on the
market for sale. The use of dif ferent assumptions to value the acquired properties and allocate the most significant portion of the
property value between the building and land could af fect the expenses we recognize over the estimated remaining useful life.
41
Table of Contents
 
 
Recoverability of Real Estate Assets
 
We assess the carrying values of our respective long-lived assets whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amounts of these assets may not be fully recoverable. This assessment is primarily triggered based on the shortening of the
expected hold period due to our change in intent to sell a property in the near term. W e have processes to monitor our intent with regard
to our investments and the estimated disposition value in comparison to the current carrying value. If our assessment of potential
triggering events indicates that the carrying value of a property that we expect to sell in the near term is not recoverable, we recognize
an impairment charge for the amount by which the carrying value exceeds the current estimated fair value of the property . We determine
the fair value of the property based on the proceeds from disposition that are estimated based on quoted market values, third-party
appraisals or discounted cash flow models that utilize the future NOI of the property and expected market capitalization rates. The use of
projected future cash flows is based on assumptions that are consistent with our estimates of future expectations and the strategic plan
we use to manage our underlying business. Changes in economic and operating conditions could impact our intent and the assumptions
used in determining the fair value that could result in future impairment.
 
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
FUNDS FROM OPERATIONS ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS/UNITHOLDERS (“FFO”)
 
FFO is a non-GAAP  financial measure that is commonly used in the real estate industry . The most directly comparable GAAP  measure
to FFO is net earnings.
 
The National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts (“NAREIT”) defines FFO as earnings computed under GAAP  to exclude
historical cost depreciation and gains and losses from the sales  net of any related tax, along with impairment charges, of previously
depreciated properties. W e also exclude the gains on revaluation of equity investments upon acquisition of a controlling interest and the
gain recognized from a partial sale of our investment, as these are similar to gains from the sales of previously depreciated properties.
We exclude similar adjustments from our unconsolidated entities and the third parties’  share of our consolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Our FFO Measures
 
Our FFO measures begin with NAREIT’ s definition and we make certain adjustments to reflect our business and the way that
management plans and executes our business strategy . While not infrequent or unusual, the additional items we adjust for in calculating
FFO, as modified by Prologis and Core FFO , both as defined below , are subject to significant fluctuations from period to period.
Although these items may have a material impact on our operations and are reflected in our financial statements, the removal of the
effects of these items allows us to better understand the core operating performance of our properties over the long term. These items
have both positive and negative short-term ef fects on our results of operations in inconsistent and unpredictable directions that are not
relevant to our long-term outlook.
 
We calculate our FFO measures, as defined below , based on our proportionate ownership share of both our unconsolidated and
consolidated ventures. W e reflect our share of our FFO measures for unconsolidated ventures by applying our average ownership
percentage for the period to the applicable reconciling items on an entity by entity basis. W e reflect our share for consolidated ventures
in which we do not own 100% of the equity by adjusting our FFO measures to remove the noncontrolling interests share of the
applicable reconciling items based on our average ownership percentage for the applicable periods.
 
These FFO measures are used by management as supplemental financial measures of operating performance and we believe that it is
important that stockholders, potential investors and financial analysts understand the measures management uses. W e do not use our
FFO measures as, nor should they be considered to be, alternatives to net earnings computed under GAAP , as indicators of our
operating performance, as alternatives to cash from operating activities computed under GAAP  or as indicators of our ability to fund our
cash needs.
 
We analyze our operating performance principally by the rental revenue of our real estate and the revenues from our strategic capital
business, net of operating, administrative and financing expenses. This income stream is not directly impacted by fluctuations in the
market value of our investments in real estate or debt securities.
 
FFO, as modified by Prologis attributable to common stockholders/unitholders (“FFO, as modified by Prologis”)
 
To arrive at FFO, as modified by Prologis , we adjust the NAREIT  defined FFO measure to exclude the impact of foreign currency related
items and deferred tax, specifically:
 
• deferred income tax benefits and deferred income tax expenses recognized by our subsidiaries;
 
• current income tax expense related to acquired tax liabilities that were recorded as deferred tax liabilities in an acquisition, to the
extent the expense is of fset with a deferred income tax benefit in earnings that is excluded from our defined FFO measure; and
42
Table of Contents
 
 
• foreign currency exchange gains and losses resulting from (i) debt transactions between us and our foreign entities, (ii) third-party
debt that is used to hedge our investment in foreign entities, (iii) derivative financial instruments related to any such debt
transactions, and (iv) mark-to-market adjustments associated with other derivative financial instruments.
 
We use FFO, as modified by Prologis , so that management, analysts and investors are able to evaluate our performance against other
REIT s that do not have similar operations or operations in jurisdictions outside the U.S.
 
Core FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders (“Core FFO”)
 
In addition to FFO, as modified by Prologis , we also use Core FFO.  To arrive at Core FFO, we adjust FFO, as modified by Prologis , to
exclude the following recurring and nonrecurring items that we recognize directly in FFO, as modified by Prologis :
 
• gains or losses from the disposition of land and development properties that were developed with the intent to contribute or sell;
 
• income tax expense related to the sale of investments in real estate;
 
• impairment charges recognized related to our investments in real estate generally as a result of our change in intent to contribute
or sell these properties;
 
• gains or losses from the early extinguishment of debt and redemption and repurchase of preferred stock; and
 
• expenses related to natural disasters.
 
We use Core FFO , including by segment and region, to: (i) assess our operating performance as compared to other real estate
companies; (ii) evaluate our performance and the performance of our properties in comparison with expected results and results of
previous periods; (iii) evaluate the performance of our management; (iv) budget and forecast future results to assist in the allocation of
resources; (v) provide guidance to the financial markets to understand our expected operating performance; and (vi) evaluate how a
specific potential investment will impact our future results.
 
Limitations on the use of our FFO measures
 
While we believe our modified FFO measures are important supplemental measures, neither NAREIT’ s nor our measures of FFO should
be used alone because they exclude significant economic components of net earnings computed under GAAP  and are, therefore,
limited as an analytical tool. Accordingly , these are only a few of the many measures we use when analyzing our business. Some of the
limitations are:
 
• The current income tax expenses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures represent the taxes that are payable.
 
• Depreciation and amortization of real estate assets are economic costs that are excluded from FFO. FFO is limited, as it does not
reflect the cash requirements that may be necessary for future replacements of the real estate assets. Furthermore, the
amortization of capital expenditures and leasing costs necessary to maintain the operating performance of logistics facilities are
not reflected in FFO.
 
• Gains or losses from property dispositions and impairment charges related to expected dispositions represent changes in value of
the properties. By excluding these gains and losses, FFO does not capture realized changes in the value of disposed properties
arising from changes in market conditions.
 
• The deferred income tax benefits and expenses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures result from the creation of a
deferred income tax asset or liability that may have to be settled at some future point. Our modified FFO measures do not
currently reflect any income or expense that may result from such settlement.
 
• The foreign currency exchange gains and losses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures are generally recognized
based on movements in foreign currency exchange rates through a specific point in time. The ultimate settlement of our foreign
currency-denominated net assets is indefinite as to timing and amount. Our FFO measures are limited in that they do not reflect
the current period changes in these net assets that result from periodic foreign currency exchange rate movements.
 
• The gains and losses on extinguishment of debt or preferred stock that we exclude from our Core FFO, may provide a benefit or
cost to us as we may be settling our obligation at less or more than our future obligation.
 
• The natural disaster expenses that we exclude from Core FFO are costs that we have incurred.
 
43
Table of Contents
 
 
We compen sate for these limitations by using our FFO measures only in conjunction with net earnings computed under GAAP  when
making our decisions. This information should be read with our complete Consolidated Financia l Statements prepared under GAAP . To
assist invest ors in compensating for these limitations, we reconcile our modified FFO measures to our net earnings computed under
GAAP  as follows (in millions):
 
  2021   2020  
Reconciliation of net earnings attributable to common stockholders to FFO measures:         
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $ 2,934   $ 1,473  
         
Add (deduct) NAREIT  defined adjustments:         
Real estate related depreciation and amortization   1,534    1,523  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net of taxes   (749 )  (252 )
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   5   (57)
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings related to unconsolidated entities   200   268 
NAREIT defined FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders   3,924    2,955  
         
Add (deduct) our modified adjustments:         
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   (173 )  161 
Deferred income tax expense   1   - 
Current income tax expense on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   3   6 
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   1   (2)
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings related to unconsolidated entities   (1)  - 
FFO, as modified by Prologis attributable to common stockholders/unitholders   3,755    3,120  
         
Adjustments to arrive at Core FFO:         
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (817 )  (465 )
Current income tax expense on dispositions   38   41 
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, preferred stock repurchase and other , net   187   199 
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   7   (3)
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings related to unconsolidated entities   2   (28)
Core FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders  $ 3,172   $ 2,864
 
 
ITEM 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
 
We are exposed to the impact of foreign exchange-related variability and earnings volatility on our foreign investments and interest rate
changes. See our risk factors in Item 1A. Risk Factors, specifically Risks Related to our Global Operations and Risks Related to
Financing and Capital. See also Notes 2 and 15 in the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data for more information about our foreign operations and derivative financial instruments.
 
We monitor our market risk exposures using a sensitivity analysis. Our sensitivity analysis estimates the exposure to market risk
sensitive instruments assuming a hypothetical 10% adverse change in foreign currency exchange rates or interest rates at December
31, 2021. The results of the sensitivity analysis are summarized in the following sections. The sensitivity analysis is of limited predictive
value. As a result, revenues and expenses, as well as our ultimate realized gains or losses with respect to foreign currency exchange
rate and interest rate fluctuations will depend on the exposures that arise during a future period, hedging strategies at the time and the
prevailing foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates.
 
Foreign Currency Risk
 
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange variability related to investments in and earnings from our foreign investments. Foreign
currency market risk is the possibility that our results of operations or financial position could be better or worse than planned because of
changes in foreign currency exchange rates. W e primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we
invest thereby providing a natural hedge. Additionally , we hedge our foreign currency risk by entering into derivative financial instruments
that we designate as net investment hedges, as these amounts of fset the translation adjustments on the underlying net assets of our
foreign investments. At December 31, 2021, after consideration of our ability to borrow in the foreign currencies in which we invest and
also derivative and nonderivative financial instruments as discussed in Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, we had
minimal net equity denominated in a currency other than the U.S. dollar .
 
For the year ended December 31, 2021, $573 million or 12.0% of our total consolidated revenue was denominated in foreign currencies.
We enter into other foreign currency contracts, such as forwards, to reduce fluctuations in foreign currency associated with the
translation of the future earnings of our international subsidiaries. W e have forward contracts that were not designated as hedges,
denominated principally in British pound sterling, Canadian dollar , euro and Japanese yen, and have an aggregate notional amount of
$1.7 billion to mitigate risk associated with the translation of the future earnings of our subsidiaries denominated in these currencies. The
gain or loss on settlement of these contracts is included in our earnings and of fsets the lower or higher translation of earnings from our
investments denominated in currencies other than the U.S. dollar . Although the impact to net earnings is mitigated through higher
44
Table of Contents
 
translated U.S. dollar earnings from these currencies, a  weakening of the U.S. dollar against these c urrencies by 10% c ould result in a
$166 million cash payment on settlement of these contracts .
 
Interest Rate Risk
 
We are also exposed to the impact of interest rate changes on future earnings and cash flows. To mitigate that risk, we generally borrow
with fixed rate debt and we may use derivative instruments to fix the interest rate on our variable rate debt. At December 31, 2021, $15.9
billion of our debt bore interest at fixed rates and therefore the fair value of these instruments was af fected by changes in market interest
rates. At December 31, 2021, $1.9 billion of our debt bore interest at variable rates. The following table summarizes the future
repayment of debt and scheduled principal payments at December 31, 2021 (dollars in millions):
 
 2022   2023   2024   2025   Thereafter   Total   Fair V alue  
Fixed rate debt (1) $646  $ 36  $136  $188  $14,858   $15,864   $15,995  
Weighted average interest
rate (2)  -0.1%   4.4%   7.6%   3.1%   1.7%   1.7%     
                            
Variable rate debt                            
Credit facilities $ -  $266  $225  $ -  $ -  $ 491  $ 491 
Senior notes  340   -   -   -   -   340   340 
Term loans  -   134   -   -   956   1,090    1,090  
Total variable rate debt $340  $400  $225  $ -  $ 956  $ 1,921   $ 1,921
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2021, we had one interest rate swap agreement to fix €150 million ($165 million) of our floating rate euro senior
notes which is included in fixed rate debt.
 
(2) The weighted average  interest rates represent the ef fective interest rates (including amortization of debt issuance costs and
noncash premiums and discounts) at December 31, 2021 for the debt outstanding .
 
At December 31, 2021, the weighted average ef fective interest rate on our variable rate debt was 0.5%. Changes in interest rates can
cause interest expense to fluctuate on our variable rate debt. On the basis of our sensitivity analysis, a 10% increase in interest rates on
our average outstanding variable rate debt balances would result in additional annual interest expense of $1 million for the year ended
December 31, 2021, which equates to a change in interest rates of 5 basis points on our average outstanding variable rate debt
balances and less than 1 basis point on our average total debt portfolio balances.
 
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
 
The Consolidated Balance Sheets of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . at December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Consolidated Statements of
Income of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .,
the Consolidated Statements of Equity of Prologis, Inc., the Consolidated Statements of Capital of Prologis, L.P . and the Consolidated
Statements of Cash Flows of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2021,
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation, together with the reports of
KPMG LLP , independent registered public accounting firm, are included under Item 15 of this report and are incorporated herein by
reference. Selected unaudited quarterly financial data are voluntarily presented in Note 19 of the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
ITEM 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
 
None.
 
ITEM 9A. Controls and Procedures
 
Controls and Procedures (Prologis, Inc.)
 
Prologis, Inc. carried out an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Of ficer, of the ef fectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the “Exchange Act”)) at December 31, 2021. Based on this evaluation, the Chief Executive
Officer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective to ensure that
information required to be disclosed by us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized
and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC rules and forms. Subsequent to December 31, 2021, there were no significant
changes in the internal controls or in other factors that could significantly af fect these controls, including any corrective actions with
regard to significant deficiencies and material weaknesses.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There have not been any changes in Prologis, Inc.’ s internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and
15(d)-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2021, that have materially af fected, or are
reasonably likely to materially af fect, Prologis, Inc.’ s internal control over financial reporting.
45
Table of Contents
 
 
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and
15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act.
 
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, an
evaluation of the ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting was conducted at December 31, 2021, based on the criteria
described in “Internal Control — Integrated Framework” (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission. Based on this assessment, management determined that, at December 31, 2021, the internal control over financial
reporting was ef fective.
 
Our internal control over financial reporting at December 31, 2021, has been audited by KPMG LLP , an independent registered public
accounting firm, as stated in their attestation report, which is included herein.
 
Limitations of the Effectiveness of Controls
 
Management’ s assessment included an evaluation of the design of the internal control over financial reporting and testing of the
operational ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting. The internal control over financial reporting is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with GAAP . Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent
or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may
become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
Controls and Procedures (Prologis, L.P.)
 
Prologis, L.P . carried out an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Of ficer, of the ef fectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Exchange Act) at December 31, 2021. Based on this evaluation, the Chief Executive Of ficer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have
concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in reports
that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the
SEC rules and forms. Subsequent to December 31, 2021, there were no significant changes in the internal controls or in other factors
that could significantly af fect these controls, including any corrective actions with regard to significant deficiencies and material
weaknesses.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There have not been any changes in Prologis, L.P .’s internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and
15(d)-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2021, that have materially af fected, or are
reasonably likely to materially af fect, Prologis, L.P .’s internal control over financial reporting.
 
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and
15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act.
 
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, an
evaluation of the ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting was conducted at December 31, 2021, based on the criteria
described in “Internal Control — Integrated Framework” (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission. Based on this assessment, management determined that, at December 31, 2021, the internal control over financial
reporting was ef fective.
 
Limitations of the Effectiveness of Controls
 
Management’ s assessment included an evaluation of the design of the internal control over financial reporting and testing of the
operational ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting. The internal control over financial reporting is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with GAAP . Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent
or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may
become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
ITEM 9B. Other Information
 
None.
46
Table of Contents
 
ITEM 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
 
Not Applicable.
 
PART III
 
ITEM 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to, including relevant sections in our 2022 Proxy Statement,
under the captions entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance; Executive Of ficers; Executive Compensation; Director
Compensation; Security Ownership; Equity Compensation Plans and Additional Information or will be provided in an amendment filed on
Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 11. Executive Compensation
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2022 Proxy Statement, under the
captions entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance; Executive Of ficers; Executive Compensation and Director
Compensation or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2022 Proxy Statement, under the
captions entitled Security Ownership and Equity Compensation Plans or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2022 Proxy Statement, under the
caption entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2022 Proxy Statement, under the
caption entitled Audit Matters or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
PART IV
 
ITEM 15. Exhibits, Financial Statements and Schedules
 
The following documents are filed as a part of this report:
 
(a) Financial Statements and Schedules:
 
1. Financial Statements:
 
See Index to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III on page 49 of this report, which is incorporated herein by
reference.
 
2. Financial Statement Schedules:
 
Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
 
All other schedules have been omitted since the required information is presented in the Consolidated Financial Statements and the
related notes or is not applicable.
 
(b) Exhibits: The Exhibits required by Item 601 of Regulation S-K are listed in the Index to the Exhibits on pages 102 to 112 of this
report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(c) Financial Statements: See Index to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III on page 49 of this report, which is
incorporated by reference.
 
47
Table of Contents
 
 
ITEM 16. Form 10-K Summary
 
Not Applicable.
48
Table of Contents
 
INDEX T O THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS AND SCHEDULE III
 
 Page
Number
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .:  
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 50
Prologis, Inc.:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 53
Consolidated Statements of Income 54
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 55
Consolidated Statements of Equity 56
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 57
Prologis, L.P .:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 58
Consolidated Statements of Income 59
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 60
Consolidated Statements of Capital 61
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 62
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .:  
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 63
     Note 1. Description of the Business 63
     Note 2. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies 63
     Note 3. Liberty Transaction 70
     Note 4. Real Estate 71
     Note 5. Unconsolidated Entities 73
     Note 6. Assets Held for Sale or Contribution 76
     Note 7. Other Assets and Other Liabilities 76
     Note 8. Debt 77
     Note 9. Stockholders' Equity of Prologis, Inc. 80
     Note 10. Partners' Capital of Prologis, L.P . 82
     Note 11. Noncontrolling Interests 82
     Note 12. Long-T erm Compensation 83
     Note 13. Income Taxes 86
     Note 14. Earnings Per Common Share or Unit 88
     Note 15. Financial Instruments and Fair V alue Measurements 89
     Note 16. Commitments and Contingencies 92
     Note 17. Business Segments 93
     Note 18. Supplemental Cash Flow Information 95
     Note 19. Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited) 97
Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 99
 
49
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Prologis, Inc. and subsidiaries (the Company) as of December 31, 2021 and
2020, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, equity, and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year
period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively, the consolidated financial
statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as
of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended
December 31, 2021, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission, and our report dated February 9, 2022
expressed an unqualified opinion on the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
these consolidated financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the
Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our
audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding
the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Critical Audit Matter
 
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial statements that was
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the
consolidated financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of a critical
audit matter does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating
the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
 
Assessment of the Company’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties
 
As discussed in Notes 2 and 4, the Company had $44,454 million of operating properties as of December 31, 2021. The Company tests the
recoverability of operating properties whenever events or changes in circumstances, including shortening the expected holding period of
such assets, indicate that the carrying amount of these assets may not be recoverable.
 
We identified the assessment of the Company’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties as a critical audit matter.
Subjective auditor judgment was required to assess the relevant events or changes in circumstances that the Company used to evaluate its
expected holding period. A shortening of the expected holding period could indicate a potential impairment.
 
The following are the primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter. We evaluated the design and tested the
operating effectiveness of certain internal controls related to determining the expected holding period of operating properties and any
related changes. We evaluated the Company’s expected holding period by inquiring of the Company regarding changes to the expected
holding period, considering certain factors related to the current economic environment, reading minutes of the meetings of the Company’s
Board of Directors, reading external communications with investors and analysts, and analyzing documents prepared by the Company
regarding proposed real estate transactions and potential changes to the expected holding period.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2002.
 
Denver, Colorado
February 9, 2022
50
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Partners of Prologis, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Prologis, L.P. and subsidiaries (the Operating Partnership) as of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, capital, and cash flows for each of the
years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively, the
consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial
position of the Operating Partnership as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the
years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Operating Partnership’s management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Operating Partnership in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The
Operating Partnership is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of
our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion
on the effectiveness of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion.
 
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding
the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Critical Audit Matter
 
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial statements that was
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material to the
consolidated financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of a critical
audit matter does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating
the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Assessment of the Operating Partnership’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties
 
As discussed in Notes 2 and 4, the Operating Partnership had $44,454 million of operating properties as of December 31, 2021. The
Operating Partnership tests the recoverability of operating properties whenever events or changes in circumstances, including shortening
the expected holding period of such assets, indicate that the carrying amount of these assets may not be recoverable.
 
We identified the assessment of the Operating Partnership’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties as a critical
audit matter. Subjective auditor judgment was required to assess the relevant events or changes in circumstances that the Operating
Partnership used to evaluate its expected holding period. A shortening of the expected holding period could indicate a potential impairment.
 
The following are the primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter. We evaluated the design and tested the
operating effectiveness of certain internal controls related to determining the expected holding period of operating properties and any
related changes. We evaluated the Operating Partnership’s expected holding period by inquiring of the Operating Partnership regarding
changes to the expected holding period, considering certain factors related to the current economic environment, reading minutes of the
meetings of the Board of Directors of Prologis, Inc., reading external communications with investors and analysts, and analyzing documents
prepared by the Operating Partnership regarding proposed real estate transactions and potential changes to the expected holding period.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
We have served as the Operating Partnership’s auditor since 2002.
 
Denver, Colorado
February 9, 2022
51
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
We have audited Prologis, Inc. and subsidiaries' (the Company) internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on
criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission. In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
 
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the
consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of income,
comprehensive income, equity, and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes
and financial statement schedule III (collectively, the consolidated financial statements), and our report dated February 9, 2022 expressed an
unqualified opinion on those consolidated financial statements.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of the
effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report on Internal Control over
Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We
are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain
reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit of
internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our
audit also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial
reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A
company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in
reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance
that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any
evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or
that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
Denver, Colorado
February 9, 2022
 
 
 
52
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except per share data)
 
 December 31,  
 2021   2020  
ASSETS        
Investments in real estate properties $53,005,190  $50,384,328 
Less accumulated depreciation  7,668,187   6,539,156 
Net investments in real estate properties  45,337,003   43,845,172 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities  8,610,958   7,602,014 
Assets held for sale or contribution  669,688   1,070,724 
Net investments in real estate  54,617,649   52,517,910 
        
Cash and cash equivalents  556,117   598,086 
Other assets  3,312,454   2,949,009 
Total assets $58,486,220  $56,065,005 
        
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY        
Liabilities:        
Debt $17,715,054  $16,849,076 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  1,252,767   1,143,372 
Other liabilities  1,776,189   1,747,977 
Total liabilities  20,744,010   19,740,425 
        
Equity:        
Prologis, Inc. stockholders’ equity:        
Series Q preferred stock at stated liquidation preference of $50 per share; $0.01 par value; 1,279 shares issued
     and outstanding and 100,000 preferred shares authorized at December 31, 2021 and 2020  63,948   63,948 
Common stock; $0.01 par value; 739,827 and 739,381 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2021
     and 2020, respectively  7,398   7,394 
Additional paid-in capital  35,561,608   35,488,634 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (878,253)  (1,193,739)
Distributions in excess of net earnings  (1,327,828)  (2,394,690)
Total Prologis, Inc. stockholders’ equity  33,426,873   31,971,547 
Noncontrolling interests  4,315,337   4,353,033 
Total equity  37,742,210   36,324,580 
Total liabilities and equity $58,486,220  $56,065,005
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
53
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2021   2020   2019  
Revenues:             
Rental  $4,147,994  $3,791,131  $2,831,818 
Strategic capital   590,750   636,987   491,886 
Development management and other   20,696   10,617   6,917 
Total revenues   4,759,440   4,438,735   3,330,621 
Expenses:             
Rental   1,041,316   952,063   734,266 
Strategic capital   207,171   218,041   184,661 
General and administrative   293,167   274,845   266,718 
Depreciation and amortization   1,577,942   1,561,969   1,139,879 
Other   22,435   30,010   13,149 
Total expenses   3,142,031   3,036,928   2,338,673 
             
Operating income before gains on real estate transactions, net   1,617,409   1,401,807   991,948 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   817,017   464,942   467,577 
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   772,570   252,195   390,241 
Operating income   3,206,996   2,118,944   1,849,766 
             
Other income (expense):             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   404,255   297,370   200,178 
Interest expense   (266,228)  (314,507)  (239,953)
Interest and other income, net   871   1,044   24,213 
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   164,407   (167,473)  (41,715)
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   (187,453)  (188,290)  (16,126)
Total other income (expense)   115,852   (371,856)  (73,403)
Earnings before income taxes   3,322,848   1,747,088   1,776,363 
Total income tax expense   (174,258)  (130,458)  (74,517)
Consolidated net earnings   3,148,590   1,616,630   1,701,846 
Less net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   208,867   134,816   128,887 
Net earnings attributable to controlling interests   2,939,723   1,481,814   1,572,959 
Less preferred stock dividends   6,152   6,345   6,009 
Loss on preferred stock repurchase   -   2,347   - 
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $2,933,571  $1,473,122  $1,566,950 
             
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Basic   739,363   728,323   630,580 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Diluted   764,762   754,414   654,903 
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders – Basic  $ 3.97  $ 2.02  $ 2.48 
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders – Diluted  $ 3.94  $ 2.01  $ 2.46
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
54
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands )
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2021   2020   2019  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 3,148,590  $ 1,616,630  $ 1,701,846 
Other comprehensive income (loss):             
Foreign currency translation gains (losses), net   305,929   (194,673)  98,482 
Unrealized gains (losses) on derivative contracts, net   17,542   (14,117)  (1,335)
Comprehensive income   3,472,061   1,407,840   1,798,993 
Net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   (208,867)  (134,816)  (128,887)
Other comprehensive loss (income) attributable to noncontrolling interests   (7,985)  5,449   (2,874)
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders  $ 3,255,209  $ 1,278,473  $ 1,667,232
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
55
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(In thousands)
 
     Common Stock      Accumulated  Distributions         
     Number      Additional  Other   in Excess of  Non-      
 Preferred  of   Par  Paid-in   Comprehensive  Net   controlling  Total  
 Stock  Shares  Value  Capital  Income (Loss)  Earnings  Interests  Equity 
Balance at January 1, 2019 $68,948   629,616  $6,296  $25,685,987  $ (1,084,671) $(2,378,467) $3,502,795  $25,800,888 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,572,959   128,887   1,701,846 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   961   10   37,008   -   -   67,691   104,709 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   11,604   11,604 
Purchase of noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   2,133   -   -   (15,383)  (13,250)
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   1,220   12   32,878   -   -   (141,323)  (108,433)
Contribution to Brazil venture  -   -   -   -   -   -   (12,630)  (12,630)
Foreign currency translation gains, net  -   -   -   -   95,572   -   2,910   98,482 
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   -   (1,299)  -   (36)  (1,335)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (38,561)  -   -   38,561   - 
Dividends ($2.12 per common share) and
     other distributions  -   -   -   (18)  -   (1,345,660)  (164,419)  (1,510,097)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $68,948   631,797  $6,318  $25,719,427  $ (990,398) $(2,151,168) $3,418,657  $26,071,784 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,481,814   134,816   1,616,630 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   690   7   27,745   -   -   82,233   109,985 
Liberty Transaction, net of issuance costs -   106,723   1,067   9,801,373   -   -   211,086   10,013,526 
Acquisitions by noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   -   -   -   48,533   48,533 
Repurchase of common stock  -   (539)  (5)  (34,824)  -   -   -   (34,829)
Repurchase of preferred stock  (5,000)  -   -   147   -   (2,347)  -   (7,200)
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   917,092   917,092 
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   710   7   30,727   -   -   (147,712)  (116,978)
Foreign currency translation losses, net  -   -   -   -   (189,599)  -   (5,074)  (194,673)
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   -   (13,742)  -   (375)  (14,117)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (55,413)  -   -   55,413   - 
Dividends ($2.32 per common share) and
     other distributions  -   -   -   (548)  -   (1,722,989)  (361,636)  (2,085,173)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $63,948   739,381  $7,394  $35,488,634  $ (1,193,739) $(2,394,690) $4,353,033  $36,324,580 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   2,939,723   208,867   3,148,590 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   (389)  (4)  38,114   -   -   78,062   116,172 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   74,404   74,404 
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   835   8   37,238   -   -   (190,482)  (153,236)
Consolidation of other venture  -   -   -   -   -   -   25,759   25,759 
Acquisitions by noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   -   -   -   130,416   130,416 
Foreign currency translation gains, net  -   -   -   -   298,413   -   7,516   305,929 
Unrealized gains on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   -   17,073   -   469   17,542 
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (2,347)  -   -   2,347   - 
Dividends ($2.52 per common share) and
     other distributions  -   -   -   (31)  -   (1,872,861)  (375,054)  (2,247,946)
Balance at December 31, 2021 $63,948   739,827  $7,398  $35,561,608  $ (878,253) $(1,327,828) $4,315,337  $37,742,210
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
56
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2021   2020   2019  
Operating activities:             
Consolidated net earnings  $3,148,590  $1,616,630  $1,701,846 
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided by operating activities:             
Straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases   (148,239)  (126,328)  (98,426)
Equity-based compensation awards   113,028   109,831   97,557 
Depreciation and amortization   1,577,942   1,561,969   1,139,879 
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   (404,255)  (297,370)  (200,178)
Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities   440,034   450,622   346,517 
Decrease (increase) in operating receivables from unconsolidated entities   (14,223)  14,670   11,557 
Amortization of debt discounts and debt issuance costs, net   8,656   7,859   17,006 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (817,017)  (464,942)  (467,577)
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   (772,570)  (252,195)  (390,241)
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   (173,026)  160,739   70,693 
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   187,453   188,290   16,126 
Deferred income tax expense   1,322   744   12,221 
Increase in accounts receivable and other assets   (328,511)  (127,619)  (108,165)
Increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses and other liabilities   176,858   94,105   115,219 
Net cash provided by operating activities   2,996,042   2,937,005   2,264,034 
Investing activities:             
Real estate development   (2,639,872)  (1,920,218)  (1,795,137)
Real estate acquisitions   (2,320,448)  (1,239,034)  (1,006,043)
Liberty Transaction, net of cash acquired   -   (29,436)  - 
IPT Transaction, net of cash acquired   -   (1,665,359)  - 
Tenant improvements and lease commissions on previously leased space   (329,059)  (221,491)  (179,274)
Property improvements   (169,933)  (149,491)  (143,029)
Proceeds from dispositions and contributions of real estate   4,222,290   2,281,940   2,331,623 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   (798,103)  (385,936)  (276,169)
Return of investment from unconsolidated entities   58,275   257,065   389,463 
Proceeds from repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate   -   4,312   - 
Proceeds from the settlement of net investment hedges   3,305   2,352   23,640 
Payments on the settlement of net investment hedges   (16,513)  (9,034)  (30,424)
Net cash used in investing activities   (1,990,058)  (3,074,330)  (685,350)
Financing activities:             
Proceeds from issuance of common stock   743   2,217   6,082 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock   -   (34,829)  - 
Repurchase of preferred stock   -   (7,200)  - 
Dividends paid on common and preferred stock   (1,872,861)  (1,722,989)  (1,345,660)
Noncontrolling interests contributions   74,404   917,092   11,604 
Noncontrolling interests distributions   (375,054)  (361,636)  (164,419)
Settlement of noncontrolling interests   (153,236)  (116,978)  (109,811)
Tax paid with shares withheld   (19,855)  (24,887)  (22,434)
Debt and equity issuance costs paid   (23,318)  (54,204)  (17,656)
Net proceeds from (payments on) credit facilities   323,336   (10,959)  127,566 
Repurchase of and payments on debt   (2,560,174)  (6,782,306)  (3,301,827)
Proceeds from the issuance of debt   3,597,690   7,824,517   3,976,956 
Net cash used in financing activities   (1,008,325)  (372,162)  (839,599)
             
Effect of foreign currency exchange rate changes on cash   (39,628)  18,718   5,914 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (41,969)  (490,769)  744,999 
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year   598,086   1,088,855   343,856 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $ 556,117  $ 598,086  $1,088,855
 
 
See Note 18 for information on noncash investing and financing activities and other information.
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
57
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands)
 
 December 31,  
 2021   2020  
ASSETS        
Investments in real estate properties $ 53,005,190  $ 50,384,328 
Less accumulated depreciation  7,668,187   6,539,156 
Net investments in real estate properties  45,337,003   43,845,172 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities  8,610,958   7,602,014 
Assets held for sale or contribution  669,688   1,070,724 
Net investments in real estate  54,617,649   52,517,910 
        
Cash and cash equivalents  556,117   598,086 
Other assets  3,312,454   2,949,009 
Total assets $ 58,486,220  $ 56,065,005 
        
LIABILITIES AND CAPITAL        
Liabilities:        
Debt $ 17,715,054  $ 16,849,076 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  1,252,767   1,143,372 
Other liabilities  1,776,189   1,747,977 
Total liabilities  20,744,010   19,740,425 
        
Capital:        
Partners’ capital:        
General partner – preferred  63,948   63,948 
General partner – common  33,362,925   31,907,599 
Limited partners – common  557,097   523,954 
Limited partners – Class A common  360,702   345,553 
Total partners’ capital  34,344,672   32,841,054 
Noncontrolling interests  3,397,538   3,483,526 
Total capital  37,742,210   36,324,580 
Total liabilities and capital $ 58,486,220  $ 56,065,005
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
58
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In thousands, except per unit amounts)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2021   2020   2019  
Revenues:             
Rental  $4,147,994  $3,791,131  $2,831,818 
Strategic capital   590,750   636,987   491,886 
Development management and other   20,696   10,617   6,917 
Total revenues   4,759,440   4,438,735   3,330,621 
Expenses:             
Rental   1,041,316   952,063   734,266 
Strategic capital   207,171   218,041   184,661 
General and administrative   293,167   274,845   266,718 
Depreciation and amortization   1,577,942   1,561,969   1,139,879 
Other   22,435   30,010   13,149 
Total expenses   3,142,031   3,036,928   2,338,673 
             
Operating income before gains on real estate transactions, net   1,617,409   1,401,807   991,948 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   817,017   464,942   467,577 
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   772,570   252,195   390,241 
Operating income   3,206,996   2,118,944   1,849,766 
             
Other income (expense):             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   404,255   297,370   200,178 
Interest expense   (266,228)  (314,507)  (239,953)
Interest and other income, net   871   1,044   24,213 
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   164,407   (167,473)  (41,715)
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   (187,453)  (188,290)  (16,126)
Total other income (expense)   115,852   (371,856)  (73,403)
Earnings before income taxes   3,322,848   1,747,088   1,776,363 
Total income tax expense   (174,258)  (130,458)  (74,517)
Consolidated net earnings   3,148,590   1,616,630   1,701,846 
Less net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   127,075   93,195   82,222 
Net earnings attributable to controlling interests   3,021,515   1,523,435   1,619,624 
Less preferred unit distributions   6,152   6,345   6,009 
Loss on preferred unit repurchase   -   2,347   - 
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $3,015,363  $1,514,743  $1,613,615 
             
Weighted average common units outstanding – Basic   751,973   740,860   641,128 
Weighted average common units outstanding – Diluted   764,762   754,414   654,903 
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders – Basic  $ 3.97  $ 2.02  $ 2.48 
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders – Diluted  $ 3.94  $ 2.01  $ 2.46
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
59
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2021   2020   2019  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 3,148,590  $ 1,616,630  $ 1,701,846 
Other comprehensive income (loss):             
Foreign currency translation gains (losses), net   305,929   (194,673)  98,482 
Unrealized gains (losses) on derivative contracts, net   17,542   (14,117)  (1,335)
Comprehensive income   3,472,061   1,407,840   1,798,993 
Net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   (127,075)  (93,195)  (82,222)
Other comprehensive loss (income) attributable to noncontrolling interests   692   (92)  (188)
Comprehensive income attributable to common unitholders  $ 3,345,678  $ 1,314,553  $ 1,716,583
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
60
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CAPIT AL
(In thousands)
 
 General Partner   Limited Partners   Non-     
 Preferred   Common   Common   Class A Common  controlling     
 Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Interests  Total  
Balance at January 1, 2019  1,379  $68,948   629,616  $22,229,145   10,516  $371,281   8,849  $295,045  $2,836,469  $25,800,888 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   1,572,959   -   26,211   -   20,454   82,222   1,701,846 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   -   961   37,018   1,525   67,691   -   -   -   104,709 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   11,604   11,604 
Purchase of noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   2,133   -   -   -   -   (15,383)  (13,250)
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   (8,045)  -   -   -   -   (13,048)  (21,093)
Redemption of limited partnership units  -   -   1,220   40,935   (2,108)  (120,387)  (236)  (7,888)  -   (87,340)
Contribution to Brazil venture  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   (12,630)  (12,630)
Foreign currency translation gains, net  -   -   -   95,572   -   1,502   -   1,220   188   98,482 
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   (1,299)  -   (19)  -   (17)  -   (1,335)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (38,561)  -   36,603   -   1,958   -   - 
Distributions ($2.12 per common unit) and
other  -   -   -   (1,345,678)  -   (27,806)  -   (22,585)  (114,028)  (1,510,097)
Balance at December 31, 2019  1,379  $68,948   631,797  $22,584,179   9,933  $355,076   8,613  $288,187  $2,775,394  $26,071,784 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   1,481,814   -   25,359   -   16,262   93,195   1,616,630 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   -   690   27,752   1,362   82,233   -   -   -   109,985 
Liberty Transaction, net of issuance costs -   -   106,723   9,802,440   2,288   210,190   -   -   896   10,013,526 
Issuance of units related to acquisitions -   -   -   -   461   48,533   -   -   -   48,533 
Repurchase of common units  -   -   (539)  (34,829)  -   -   -   -   -   (34,829)
Repurchase of preferred units  (100)  (5,000)  -   (2,200)  -   -   -   -   -   (7,200)
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   917,092   917,092 
Redemption of limited partnership units  -   -   710   30,734   (1,902)  (146,990)  (18)  (722)  -   (116,978)
Foreign currency translation gains
(losses), net  -   -   -   (189,599)  -   (3,113)  -   (2,053)  92   (194,673)
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   (13,742)  -   (226)  -   (149)  -   (14,117)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (55,413)  -   (10,868)  -   66,281   -   - 
Distributions ($2.32 per common unit) and
other  -   -   -   (1,723,537)  -   (36,240)  -   (22,253)  (303,143)  (2,085,173)
Balance at December 31, 2020  1,279  $63,948   739,381  $31,907,599   12,142  $523,954   8,595  $345,553  $3,483,526  $36,324,580 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   2,939,723   -   50,034   -   31,758   127,075   3,148,590 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   -   (389)  38,110   1,286   78,062   -   -   -   116,172 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   74,404   74,404 
Redemption of limited partnership units  -   -   835   37,246   (2,105)  (190,482)  -   -   -   (153,236)
Consolidation of other venture  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   25,759   25,759 
Issuance of units related to acquisitions -   -   -   -   1,031   130,416   -   -   -   130,416 
Foreign currency translation gains
(losses), net  -   -   -   298,413   -   4,982   -   3,226   (692)  305,929 
Unrealized gains on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   17,073   -   285   -   184   -   17,542 
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (2,347)  -   133   -   2,214   -   - 
Distributions ($2.52 per common unit) and
other  -   -   -   (1,872,892)  -   (40,287)  -   (22,233)  (312,534)  (2,247,946)
Balance at December 31, 2021  1,279  $63,948   739,827  $33,362,925   12,354  $557,097   8,595  $360,702  $3,397,538  $37,742,210
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
61
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, L.P
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2021   2020   2019  
Operating activities:             
Consolidated net earnings  $3,148,590  $1,616,630  $1,701,846 
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided by operating activities:             
Straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases   (148,239)  (126,328)  (98,426)
Equity-based compensation awards   113,028   109,831   97,557 
Depreciation and amortization   1,577,942   1,561,969   1,139,879 
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   (404,255)  (297,370)  (200,178)
Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities   440,034   450,622   346,517 
Decrease (increase) in operating receivables from unconsolidated entities   (14,223)  14,670   11,557 
Amortization of debt discounts and debt issuance costs, net   8,656   7,859   17,006 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (817,017)  (464,942)  (467,577)
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   (772,570)  (252,195)  (390,241)
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   (173,026)  160,739   70,693 
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   187,453   188,290   16,126 
Deferred income tax expense   1,322   744   12,221 
Increase in accounts receivable and other assets   (328,511)  (127,619)  (108,165)
Increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses and other liabilities   176,858   94,105   115,219 
Net cash provided by operating activities   2,996,042   2,937,005   2,264,034 
Investing activities:             
Real estate development   (2,639,872)  (1,920,218)  (1,795,137)
Real estate acquisitions   (2,320,448)  (1,239,034)  (1,006,043)
Liberty Transaction, net of cash acquired   -   (29,436)  - 
IPT Transaction, net of cash acquired   -   (1,665,359)  - 
Tenant improvements and lease commissions on previously leased space   (329,059)  (221,491)  (179,274)
Property improvements   (169,933)  (149,491)  (143,029)
Proceeds from dispositions and contributions of real estate   4,222,290   2,281,940   2,331,623 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   (798,103)  (385,936)  (276,169)
Return of investment from unconsolidated entities   58,275   257,065   389,463 
Proceeds from repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate   -   4,312   - 
Proceeds from the settlement of net investment hedges   3,305   2,352   23,640 
Payments on the settlement of net investment hedges   (16,513)  (9,034)  (30,424)
Net cash used in investing activities   (1,990,058)  (3,074,330)  (685,350)
Financing activities:             
Proceeds from issuance of common partnership units in exchange for contributions from
     Prologis, Inc.   743   2,217   6,082 
Repurchase and retirement of common units   -   (34,829)  - 
Repurchase of preferred units   -   (7,200)  - 
Distributions paid on common and preferred units   (1,935,381)  (1,781,482)  (1,396,051)
Noncontrolling interests contributions   74,404   917,092   11,604 
Noncontrolling interests distributions   (312,534)  (303,143)  (114,028)
Settlement of noncontrolling interests   -   -   (22,471)
Redemption of common limited partnership units   (153,236)  (116,978)  (87,340)
Tax paid with shares of the Parent withheld   (19,855)  (24,887)  (22,434)
Debt and equity issuance costs paid   (23,318)  (54,204)  (17,656)
Net proceeds from (payments on) credit facilities   323,336   (10,959)  127,566 
Repurchase of and payments on debt   (2,560,174)  (6,782,306)  (3,301,827)
Proceeds from the issuance of debt   3,597,690   7,824,517   3,976,956 
Net cash used in financing activities   (1,008,325)  (372,162)  (839,599)
             
Effect of foreign currency exchange rate changes on cash   (39,628)  18,718   5,914 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (41,969)  (490,769)  744,999 
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year   598,086   1,088,855   343,856 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $ 556,117  $ 598,086  $1,088,855
 
 
See Note 18 for information on noncash investing and financing activities and other information.
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
62
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
NOTES T O THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS
 
NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF THE BUSINESS
 
Prologis, Inc. (or the “Parent”) commenced operations as a fully integrated real estate company in 1997, elected to be taxed as a real
estate investment trust (“REIT”) under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the “Internal Revenue Code” or “IRC”), and
believes the current organization and method of operation will enable it to maintain its status as a REIT . The Parent is the general
partner of Prologis, L.P . (or the “Operating Partnership” or “OP”). Through the OP , we are engaged in the ownership, acquisition,
development and management of logistics facilities with a focus on key markets in 19 countries on four continents. W e invest in real
estate through wholly owned subsidiaries and other entities through which we co-invest with partners and investors. W e maintain a
significant level of ownership in these co-investment ventures, which may be consolidated or unconsolidated based on our level of
control of the entity . Our current business strategy consists of two operating business segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic
Capital. Our Real Estate Operations segment represents the ownership and development of logistics properties. Our Strategic Capital
segment represents the management of unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures. See Note 17 for further discussion
of our business segments. Unless otherwise indicated, the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements apply to both the Parent and
the OP . The terms “the Company ,” “Prologis,” “we,” “our” or “us” means the Parent and OP  collectively .
 
For each share of preferred or common stock the Parent issues, the OP  issues a corresponding preferred or common partnership unit,
as applicable, to the Parent in exchange for the contribution of the proceeds from the stock issuance. At December 31, 2021, the Parent
owned a 97.32 % common general partnership interest in the OP  and substantially all of the preferred units in the OP . The remaining
2.68% common limited partnership interests, which include Class A common limited partnership units (“Class A Units”) in the OP , are
owned by unaf filiated investors and certain current and former directors and of ficers of the Parent. Each partner ’s percentage interest in
the OP  is determined based on the number of OP  units held, including the number of OP  units into which Class A Units are convertible,
compared to total OP  units outstanding at each period end and is used as the basis for the allocation of net income or loss to each
partner . At the end of each reporting period, a capital adjustment is made in the OP  to reflect the appropriate ownership interest for each
of the common unitholders. These adjustments are reflected in the line items Reallocation of Equity  in the Consolidated Statements of
Equity of the Parent and Reallocation of Capital  in the Consolidated Statements of Capital of the OP .
 
As the sole general partner of the OP , the Parent has complete responsibility and discretion in the day-to-day management and control
of the OP  and we operate the Parent and the OP  as one enterprise. The management of the Parent consists of the same members as
the management of the OP . These members are of ficers of the Parent and employees of the OP  or one of its subsidiaries. As general
partner with control of the OP , the Parent is the primary beneficiary and therefore consolidates the OP . Because the Parent’ s only
significant asset is its investment in the OP , the assets and liabilities of the Parent and the OP  are the same on their respective financial
statements.
 
Information with respect to the square footage, number of buildings and acres of land is unaudited.
 
NOTE 2. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
 
Basis of Presentation.  The accompanying Consolidated Financial Statements are prepared in accordance with United States
(“U.S.”) generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) and are presented in our reporting currency , the U.S. dollar . Intercompany
transactions with consolidated entities have been eliminated.
 
Consolidation. We consolidate all entities that are wholly owned and those in which we own less than 100% of the equity  but control,
as well as any variable interest entities (“VIEs”) in which we are the primary beneficiary . We evaluate our ability to control an entity and
whether the entity is a VIE and we are the primary beneficiary through consideration of substantive terms of the arrangement to identify
which enterprise has the power to direct the activities of the entity that most significantly impact the entity’ s economic performance and
the obligation to absorb losses and the right to receive benefits from the entity .
 
For entities that are not defined as VIEs, we first consider whether we are the general partner or the limited partner (or the equivalent in
such investments that are not structured as partnerships). W e consolidate entities in which we are the general partner and the limited
partners in such entities do not have rights that would preclude control. For entities in which we are the general partner but do not
control the entity as the other partners hold substantive participating or kick-out rights, we apply the equity method of accounting since,
as the general partner , we have the ability to exercise significant influence over the operating and financial policies of the venture. For
ventures for which we are a limited partner , or our investment is in an entity that is not structured similar to a partnership, we consider
factors such as ownership interest, voting control, authority to make decisions and contractual and substantive participating rights of the
partners. In instances where the factors indicate that we have a controlling financial interest in the venture, we consolidate the entity . 
 
Use of Estimates.  GAAP  requires us to make estimates and assumptions that af fect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities,
disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and revenues and expenses during the reporting
period. Although we believe the assumptions and estimates we made are reasonable and appropriate, as discussed in the applicable
sections throughout the Consolidated Financial Statements, dif ferent assumptions and estimates could materially impact our reported
results.
63
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Foreign Operations.  The U.S. dollar is the functional currency for our consolidated subsidiaries and unconsolidated entities operating in
the U.S. and Mexico. The functional currency for our consolidated subsidiaries and unconsolidated entities operating in other countries
is the principal currency in which the entity’ s assets, liabilities, income and expenses are denominated, which may be dif ferent from the
local currency of the country of incorporation or where the entity conducts its operations. The functional currencies of entities outside of
the U.S. and Mexico generally include the Brazilian real, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar , Chinese renminbi, euro, Japanese yen,
Singapore dollar and Swedish krona. W e take part in business transactions denominated in these and other local currencies where we
operate.
 
For our consolidated subsidiaries whose functional currency is not the U.S. dollar , we translate their financial statements into
U.S. dollars at the time we consolidate those subsidiaries’  financial statements. Generally , assets and liabilities are translated at the
exchange rate in ef fect at the balance sheet date. The resulting translation adjustments are included in Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Income (Loss) (“AOCI/L ”) in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Certain balance sheet items, primarily equity and capital-
related accounts, are reflected at the historical exchange rate. Income statement accounts are translated using the average exchange
rate for the period and income statement accounts that represent significant nonrecurring transactions, are translated at the rate in ef fect
at the date of the transaction. W e translate our share of the net income or loss of our unconsolidated entities at the average exchange
rate for the period and significant nonrecurring transactions of the unconsolidated entities are translated at the rate in ef fect at the date
of the transaction.
 
We and certain of our consolidated subsidiaries have intercompany and third-party debt that is not denominated in the entity’ s functional
currency . When the debt is remeasured against the functional currency of the entity , a gain or loss can result. The resulting adjustment is
reflected in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net  in the Consolidated Statements of Income, unless it is intercompany
debt that is deemed to be long-term in nature or third-party debt that has been designated as a nonderivative net investment hedge and
then the adjustment is recorded as a cumulative translation adjustment in AOCI/L .
 
Acquisitions.  We apply a screen test to evaluate if substantially all the fair value of the acquired property is concentrated in a single
identifiable asset or group of similar identifiable assets to determine whether a transaction is accounted for as an asset acquisition or
business combination. As most of our real estate acquisitions are concentrated in either a single or a group of similar identifiable assets,
our real estate transactions are generally accounted for as asset acquisitions, which permits the capitalization of transaction costs to the
basis of the acquired property . We measure the real estate assets acquired through an asset acquisition based on their cost or total
consideration exchanged and any excess consideration or bargain purchase amount is allocated to the real estate properties and
related lease intangibles on a relative fair value basis . All other assets and liabilities assumed, including debt, and real estate assets that
we do not intend to operate long-term are recorded at fair value. At a property-level, we allocate the fair value to the components which
include building, land, improvements, and intangible assets or liabilities related to acquired leases. Purchase price allocations for a
business combination are recorded at fair value.
 
When we obtain control of an unconsolidated entity and the acquisition qualifies as a business combination, we account for the
acquisition in accordance with the guidance for a business combination achieved in stages. W e remeasure our previously held interest
in the unconsolidated entity at its acquisition-date fair value and recognize any resulting gain or loss in earnings.
 
We allocate the purchase price using primarily Level 2 and Level 3 inputs (further defined in Fair V alue Measurements below) as follows:
 
Investments in Real Estate Properties.  We value operating properties as if vacant. W e estimate fair value by applying an income
approach methodology using either a discounted cash flow analysis or applying a capitalization rate to the estimated Net Operating
Income (“NOI”) of a property . Key assumptions include market rents, growth rates, and discount and capitalization rates. Estimates of
future cash flows are based on a number of factors including historical operating results, known trends and market and economic
conditions. W e determine the discount or capitalization rate by market based on recent transactions and other market data and adjust if
necessary , based on the property characteristics. The fair value of land is generally based on relevant market data, such as a
comparison of the subject site to similar parcels that have recently been sold or are currently being of fered on the market for sale. At a
property level, we allocate the fair value to land and building.
 
Lease Intangibles . We determine the portion of the purchase price related to acquired in-place leases as intangible assets and liabilities
as follows:
 
•Above and Below Market Leases . We recognize an asset or liability for acquired leases with favorable or unfavorable in-place rents
as compared to our estimate of current market rents of the applicable markets. The above or below market lease intangibles are
valued using a discounted cash flow approach through which we recognize the present value of the dif ference in cash flows
between in-place and market rents. The value is recorded in either Other Assets  or Other Liabilities , as appropriate, and is
amortized over the remaining term of the respective leases, including any bargain renewal options, to rental revenues.
 
•Foregone Rent . We calculate the value of the revenue and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease-up period, as if the
space was vacant, in each of the applicable markets. The values are recorded in Other Assets  and amortized over the remaining life
of the respective leases to amortization expense.
 
64
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
•Leasing Commissions.  We recognize an asset for leasing commissions based on our estimate of the cost to lease space in the
applicable markets. The value is recorded in Other Assets and amortized over the remaining life of the respective leases to
amortization expense.
 
Investments in Unconsolidated Entities. We estimate the fair value of the entity by using similar valuation methods as those used for the
consolidated real estate properties and debt. W e apply our ownership percentage to the estimated net asset value of the entity to
determine the fair value of our investment.
 
Debt . We estimate the fair value of debt based on contractual future cash flows discounted using borrowing spreads and market interest
rates that would be available to us for the issuance of debt with similar terms and remaining maturities. In the case of publicly traded
debt, we estimate the fair value based on available market data. Any discount or premium to the principal amount is included in the
carrying value and amortized to interest expense over the remaining term of the related debt using the ef fective interest method.
 
Noncontrolling Interests . We estimate the portion of the fair value of the net assets owned by third parties based on the fair value of the
consolidated net assets, principally real estate properties and debt.
 
Working Capital . We estimate the fair value of other acquired assets and assumed liabilities using the best information available.
 
Fair V alue Measurements.  The objective of fair value is to determine the price that would be received on the sale of an asset or paid to
transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date (the exit price). W e estimate fair value
using available market information and valuation methodologies we believe to be appropriate for these purposes. Considerable
judgment and a high degree of subjectivity are involved in developing these estimates and, accordingly , they are not necessarily
indicative of amounts that we would realize on disposition. The fair value hierarchy consists of three broad levels:
 
•Level 1 — Quoted prices (unadjusted) in active markets for identical assets or liabilities that the entity can access at the
measurement date.
 
•Level 2 — Inputs other than quoted prices included within Level 1 that are observable for the asset or liability , either directly or
indirectly .
 
•Level 3 — Unobservable inputs for the asset or liability .
 
Fair V alue Measurements on a Recurring Basis. We estimate the fair value of our financial instruments using available market
information and valuation methodologies we believe to be appropriate for these purposes. W e determine the fair value of our derivative
financial instruments using widely accepted valuation techniques. The technique utilized depends on the type of derivative financial
instrument being valued, principally foreign  currency forwards and interest rate swaps, and involves the contractual term of the
derivative, observable market-based inputs and implied volatilities.
 
We determine the fair values of our interest rate swaps using a market standard methodology of netting the discounted future fixed cash
receipts and the discounted expected variable cash payments through a discounted cash flow analysis. W e base the variable cash
payments on an expectation of future interest rates, or forward curves, derived from observable market interest rate curves through the
contractual term of the debt. W e determine the fair values of our foreign currency forwards by comparing the contracted forward
exchange rate to the current market exchange rate. W e build a foreign exchange forward curve to determine the foreign exchange
forward rate that pertains to the specific maturity date. Using this foreign exchange forward rate, spot rates and the interest rate curve of
the domestic currency as inputs, we calculate the mark-to-market value of the forward.
 
We incorporate credit valuation adjustments to appropriately reflect nonperformance risk for us and the respective counterparty in the
fair value measurements. In adjusting the fair value of our derivative contracts for the ef fect of nonperformance risk, we consider the
impact of netting and any applicable credit enhancements, such as collateral postings, thresholds, mutual puts and guarantees.
 
We have determined that the majority of the inputs used to value our derivatives fall within Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy . Although
the credit valuation adjustments associated with our derivatives utilize Level 3 inputs, such as estimates of current credit spreads to
evaluate the likelihood of default by us and our counterparties, we assess the significance of the impact of the credit valuation
adjustments on the overall valuation of our derivative positions and have determined that the credit valuation adjustments are not
significant to the overall valuation of our derivatives.
 
Fair V alue Measurements on a Nonrecurring Basis. Assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis generally consist of real
estate assets and investments in unconsolidated entities that were subject to impairment charges due to our evaluation of recoverability
whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate the carrying amount may not be recoverable. As discussed below , our analysis of
recoverability is primarily triggered based on the shortening of the expected hold period due to our change in intent to sell a property in
the near term. W e estimate the fair value of our investments based on expected sales prices in the market (Level 2) or by applying the
income approach methodology using a discounted cash flow analysis (Level 3).
 
Fair V alue of Financial Instruments. We estimate the fair value of our senior notes for disclosure purposes based on quoted market
prices for the same (Level 1) or similar (Level 2) issues when current quoted market prices are available. W e estimate the fair value of
65
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
our credit facilities, term loans, secured mortgage debt and other debt  by discounting the future cash flows using rates and borrowing
spreads currently available to us (Level 3).
 
Real Estate Assets.  Real estate assets are carried at depreciated cost. W e capitalize costs incurred in developing, redeveloping and
improving real estate assets as part of the investment basis. W e expense costs for repairs and maintenance as incurred.
 
Depreciation and Amortization. We charge the depreciable portions of real estate assets to depreciation expense on a straight-line basis
over the respective estimated useful lives. Depreciation on development buildings commences when the asset is ready for its intended
use, which we define as the earlier of stabilization ( 90% occupied) or one year after completion of construction.  We generally use the
following useful lives: 5 to 7 years  for capital improvements, 10 years for standard tenant improvements, 15 to 25 years  for depreciable
land improvements, 25 to 35 years  for operating properties acquired based on the age of the building and 40 years for operating
properties we develop. W e depreciate building improvements on land parcels subject to land leases over the shorter of the estimated life
of the building improvement or the contractual term of the underlying land lease. Capitalized leasing costs are amortized over the
estimated remaining lease term. Our weighted average lease term on leases commenced during 2021, based on square feet for all
leases, was 62 months.
 
Capitalization of Costs. During the land development and construction periods of qualifying projects, we capitalize interest costs,
insurance, real estate taxes and general and administrative costs of the personnel performing the development; if such costs are
incremental and identifiable to a specific activity to ready the asset for its intended use. W e capitalize transaction costs related to the
acquisition of land for future development and operating properties that qualify as asset acquisitions. W e capitalize incremental, third-
party costs incurred to successfully originate a lease that result directly from obtaining a lease and would not have been incurred if the
lease had not been obtained. Beginning on January 1, 2019, we no longer capitalize internal costs related to our leasing activities and
amounts capitalized prior to adoption continue to be amortized in accordance with previously applicable guidance. Leasing costs that
meet the requirements for capitalization are presented as a component of Other Assets  and all other capitalized costs are included in the
investment basis of the real estate assets.
 
Recoverability of Real Estate Assets. We assess the carrying values of our respective long-lived assets whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying amounts of these assets may not be fully recoverable. This assessment is primarily triggered
based on the shortening of the expected hold period due to our change in intent to sell a property in the near term. W e have processes
to monitor our intent with regard to our investments and the estimated disposition value in comparison to the current carrying value. If
our assessment of potential triggering events indicates that the carrying value of a property that we expect to sell in the near term is not
recoverable, we recognize an impairment charge for the amount by which the carrying value exceeds the current estimated fair value of
the property . We determine the fair value of the property based on the proceeds from disposition that are estimated based on quoted
market values, third-party appraisals or discounted cash flow models that utilize the future net rental income of the property and
expected market capitalization rates. The use of projected future cash flows is based on assumptions that are consistent with our
estimates of future expectations and the strategic plan we use to manage our underlying business. Changes in economic and operating
conditions could impact our intent and the assumptions used in determining the fair value that could result in future impairment.
 
At least annually or more frequently given the presence of a triggering event, we measure the recoverability of our assets. W e compare
the carrying amount of the asset to the fair value based on our intent as follows:
 
•for real estate properties that we intend to hold long-term; including land held for development, properties currently under
development and operating properties; recoverability is assessed based on the estimated undiscounted future net rental income
from operating the property and the terminal value, including anticipated costs to develop;
 
•for real estate properties we intend to sell, including properties currently under development and operating properties; recoverability
is assessed based on proceeds from disposition that are estimated based on the future net rental income of the property , expected
market capitalization rates and anticipated costs to develop;
 
•for land parcels we intend to sell, recoverability is assessed based on the estimated proceeds from disposition; and
 
•for costs incurred related to the potential acquisition of land and operating properties and future development projects, recoverability
is assessed based on the probability that the acquisition or development is likely to occur at the measurement date.
 
Assets Held for Sale or Contribution.  We classify a property as held for sale or contribution when certain criteria are met in
accordance with GAAP . Assets classified as held for sale are expected to be sold to a third party and assets classified as held for
contribution are generally newly developed assets we intend to contribute to an unconsolidated co-investment venture within twelve
months. When the criteria are met, the respective assets and liabilities are presented separately in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
and depreciation is not recognized. Assets held for sale or contribution are reported at the lower of carrying amount or estimated fair
value less costs to sell.
 
Investments in Unconsolidated Entities.  We present our investments in certain entities under the equity method. W e use the equity
method when we have the ability to exercise significant influence over operating and financial policies of the venture but do not have
control of the entity . Under the equity method, we initially recognize these investments (including advances) in the balance sheet at our
cost, including formation costs and net of deferred gains from the contribution of properties (recognized prior to January 1, 2018), if
66
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
applicable. The transaction costs related to the formation of equity method investments are also capitalized. We subsequently adjust the
accounts to reflect our proportionate share of net earnings or losses recognized and accumulated other comprehensive income or loss,
distributions received, contributions made , sales and redemptions of our investments and certain other adjustments, as appropriate.
When circumstances indicate there may have been a reduction in the value of an equity investment, we evaluate whether the loss in
value is other than temporary . If we conclude it is other than temporary , we recognize an impairment charge to reflect the equity
investment at fair value.
 
With regard to distributions from unconsolidated entities, we have elected the nature of distribution approach as the information is
available to us to determine the nature of the underlying activity that generated the distributions. In accordance with the nature of
distribution approach, cash flows generated from the operations of an unconsolidated entity are classified as a return on investment
(cash inflow from operating activities) and cash flows that are generated from property sales, debt refinancing or sales and redemptions
of our investments are classified as a return of investment (cash inflow from investing activities).
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents.  We consider all cash on hand, demand deposits with financial institutions and short-term highly liquid
investments with original maturities of three months or less to be cash equivalents. Our cash and cash equivalents are financial
instruments that are exposed to concentrations of credit risk. W e invest our cash with high-credit quality institutions both domestically
and internationally . Cash balances may be invested in money market accounts that are not insured. W e have not realized any losses of
such cash investments or accounts and believe that we are not exposed to any significant credit risk.
 
Derivative Financial Instruments. We primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we invest. W e
may use derivative financial instruments, such as foreign currency forward and option contracts to manage foreign currency exchange
rate risk related to both our foreign investments and the related earnings. In addition, we occasionally use interest rate swap and forward
contracts to manage interest rate risk and limit the impact of future interest rate changes on earnings and cash flows, primarily with
variable-rate debt.
 
We do not use derivative financial instruments for trading or speculative purposes. Each derivative transaction is customized and not
exchange-traded. W e recognize all derivatives at fair value within the line items Other Assets  or Other Liabilities . We do not net our
derivative position by counterparty for purposes of balance sheet presentation and disclosure. Management reviews our derivative
positions, overall risk management strategy and hedging program, on a regular basis. W e only enter into transactions that we believe
will be highly ef fective at of fsetting the underlying risk. Our use of derivatives involves the risk that counterparties may default on a
derivative contract; therefore we: (i) establish exposure limits for each counterparty to minimize this risk and provide counterparty
diversification; (ii) contract with counterparties that have long-term credit ratings of single-A  or better; (iii) enter into master agreements
that generally allow for netting of certain exposures; thereby significantly reducing the actual loss that would be incurred should a
counterparty fail to perform its contractual obligations; and (iv) set minimum credit standards that become more stringent as the duration
of the derivative financial instrument increases. Based on these factors, we consider the risk of counterparty default to be minimal.
 
Designated Derivatives. We may choose to designate our derivative financial instruments, generally foreign currency forwards to hedge
our net investment in foreign operations or interest rate swaps to hedge future interest payments on variable debt. At inception of the
transaction, we formally designate and document the derivative financial instrument as a hedge of a specific underlying exposure, the
risk management objective and the strategy for undertaking the hedge transaction. W e formally assess both at inception and at least
quarterly thereafter , the ef fectiveness of our hedging transactions. Due to the high degree of ef fectiveness between the hedging
instruments and the underlying exposures hedged, fluctuations in the value of the derivative financial instruments will generally be of fset
by changes in the cash flows or fair values of the underlying exposures being hedged.
 
Changes in the fair value of derivatives that are designated and qualify as net investment hedges of our foreign operations and cash
flow hedges are recorded in AOCI/L . For net investment hedges, these amounts of fset the translation adjustments on the underlying net
assets of our foreign investments and are recorded in AOCI/L . This includes debt issued in a currency that is not the same functional
currency of the borrowing entity that we may designate as a nonderivative net investment hedge. W e compare the net equity available
from our foreign investments first to the derivative financial instruments designated as net investment hedges followed by any
nonderivative net investment hedges. If the total notional amount of the derivative and nonderivative net investment hedges exceeds the
net equity available, that excess portion is considered unhedged and recognized in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses),
Net.
 
For cash flow hedges, we report the ef fective portion of the gain or loss as a component of AOCI/ L and reclassify it to the applicable line
item in the Consolidated Statements of Income, generally Interest Expense , over the corresponding period of the underlying hedged
item. The inef fective portion of the change in fair value of a derivative financial instrument is recognized in earnings, generally Interest
Expense , at the time the inef fectiveness occurred. To the extent the hedged forecasted interest payments on debt related to our interest
rate swaps is paid of f, the remaining balance in AOCI/L  is recognized  in Interest Expense  in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
 
Undesignated Derivatives.  We also use derivatives, such as foreign currency forwards and option contracts, that are not designated as
hedges to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk related to the translation of our results of operations. The changes in fair values
of these derivatives that were not designated as hedging instruments are immediately recognized in earnings within the line item Foreign
Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net . These gains or losses are generally of fset by lower or higher earnings due to the
67
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
translation at  exchange rates that were dif ferent than our expectations. In addition, we may choose to not designate our interest rate
swap  contracts . If a swap contract is not designated as a hedge, the changes in fair value of these instruments is immediately
recognized in earnings within the line item Interest Expense  in the Consolidated Statements of Income .
 
Noncontrolling Interests.  Noncontrolling interests represent the share of consolidated entities owned by third parties. W e recognize
each noncontrolling holder ’s respective share of the estimated fair value of the net assets at the date of formation or acquisition.
Noncontrolling interests are subsequently adjusted for the noncontrolling holder ’s share of additional contributions, distributions and their
share of the net earnings or losses of each respective consolidated entity . We allocate net income to noncontrolling interests based on
the weighted average ownership interest during the period. The net income that is not attributable to us is reflected in the line item Net
Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests . We do not recognize a gain or loss on transactions with a consolidated entity in which
we do not own 100% of the equity and recognize the dif ference between the carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest and the
consideration paid or received as additional paid-in-capital .
 
Certain limited partnership interests, including OP  units, are exchangeable into our common stock. Common stock issued upon
exchange of a holder ’s noncontrolling interest is accounted for at the carrying value of the surrendered limited partnership interest and
the dif ference between the carrying value and the fair value of the common stock issued is recorded to additional paid-in-capital.
 
Revenue Recognition.
Rental Revenues and Recoveries.  We lease our operating properties to customers under agreements that are classified as operating
leases. W e recognize the total minimum lease payments provided for under the leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
Generally , under the terms of our leases, the majority of our rental expenses are recovered from our customers, including common area
maintenance, real estate taxes and insurance. Rental expenses recovered through reimbursements received from customers are
recognized in Rental Revenues  in the Consolidated Statements of Income. W e generally record amounts reimbursed by our customers
(“rental recoveries”) as revenues in the period that the applicable expenses are incurred. W e account for and present rental revenue and
rental recoveries as a single component under Rental Revenues  as the timing of recognition is the same, the pattern with which we
transfer the right of use of the property and related services to the lessee are both on a straight-line basis and our leases qualify as
operating leases. W e perform credit analyses of our customers prior to the execution of our leases and continue these analyses for each
individual lease on an ongoing basis in order to ensure the collectability of rental revenue. W e recognize revenue to the extent that
amounts are determined to be collectible.
 
Strategic Capital Revenues.  Strategic capital revenues include revenues we earn from the management services we provide to
unconsolidated entities. These fees are determined in accordance with the terms specific to each arrangement and may include
recurring fees such as asset management and property management fees or transactional fees for leasing, acquisition, development,
construction, financing and tax services provided. W e recognize these fees as we provide the services or on a cost basis for
development fees.
 
We may also earn incentive returns (“promotes” or “promote revenues”) based on a venture’ s cumulative returns over a certain time-
period and the returns are determined by both the operating performance and real estate valuation of the venture, including highly
variable inputs such as capitalization rates, market rents, interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. As these key inputs are
highly volatile and out of our control, and such volatility can materially impact our promotes period over period, we recognize promote
revenues at the end of the performance period. W e generally earn promote revenue directly from third-party investors in the co-
investment ventures. W e include the third-party investors’  share of promotes in Strategic Capital Revenues.
 
We also earn fees from ventures that we consolidate. Upon consolidation, these fees are eliminated from our earnings and the third-
party investors’  share of these fees are recognized as a reduction of Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests.
 
Development Management and Other Revenues. Development management and other revenues principally include development and
construction management fees and are recognized as we provide the services or on a cost basis.
 
Gains on Real Estate T ransactions, Net.
Throughout the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements, Gains on Real Estate T ransactions, Net collectively  refers to Gains on
Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net  and Gains on Other Dispositions of Investments in Real Estate, Net .
 
We recognize gains on the disposition of real estate when control transfers to the buyer , generally when consideration and title are
exchanged and the risks and rewards of ownership transfer . We recognize losses from the disposition of real estate when known.
 
Beginning January 1, 2018 with the adoption of the new revenue recognition guidance, we recognize the entire gain attributed to
contributions of real estate properties to unconsolidated entities. W e previously recognized a gain on contribution only to the extent of
the third-party ownership in the unconsolidated entity acquiring the property and deferred the portion of the gain related to our ownership
through a reduction to our investment in the applicable unconsolidated entity . We adjusted our proportionate share of net earnings or
losses recognized in future periods to reflect the entities’  recorded depreciation expense as if it were computed on our lower basis in the
contributed properties rather than on the entity’ s basis.  For deferred gains from partial sales recorded prior to the adoption, we continue
to recognize these gains over the lives of the underlying real estate properties or at the time of disposition to a third party . If our
ownership interest in an unconsolidated entity decreases and the decrease is expected to be permanent, we recognize the amounts
relating to previously deferred gains to coincide with our new ownership interest.
68
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Gains on Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net.  We present gains separately based on the type of real estate sold or
contributed. W e present gains on sales to third parties or contributions to our unconsolidated entities as Gains on Dispositions of
Development Properties and Land, Net  when the property was included in our land portfolio or when we developed the property with the
intent to sell or contribute.  
 
Gains on Other Dispositions of Investments in Real Estate, Net.  We present all other gains on sales to third parties or contributions to
our unconsolidated entities of primarily operating properties and other real estate transactions as Gains on Other Dispositions of
Investments in Real Estate, Net . We also include gains or losses on the remeasurement of equity investments to fair value upon
acquisition of a controlling interest and the transaction is considered the acquisition of a business and gains or losses upon the partial
redemption or sale of our investment in an unconsolidated entity .
 
Rental Expenses.  Rental expenses principally include the cost of our property management personnel, utilities, repairs and
maintenance, property insurance, real estate taxes and the other costs of managing our properties. Beginning January 1, 2019, certain
indirect costs, such as salaries and related costs for employees working on leasing activities for our properties are now expensed
through Rental Expenses. We are also a lessee of land under leases which generally meet the criteria to be accounted for as operating
leases.
 
Strategic Capital Expenses.  Strategic capital expenses generally include the direct expenses associated with the asset management
of the co-investment ventures provided by our employees who are assigned to our Strategic Capital segment and the costs of our
Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”) based on earned promotes. For further discussion on the PPP , see Note 12. In addition, in order to
achieve ef ficiencies and economies of scale, all of our property management and leasing functions are provided by property
management and leasing personnel who are assigned to our Real Estate Operations segment. These individuals perform the property-
level management and leasing of the properties in our owned and managed portfolio, which include properties we consolidate and those
we manage that are owned by the unconsolidated co-investment ventures. W e allocate the costs of our property management and
leasing teams to the properties we consolidate (included in Rental Expenses ) and the properties owned by the unconsolidated co-
investment ventures (included in Strategic Capital Expenses ) by using the square feet owned by the respective portfolios.
 
Equity-Based Compensation.  We account for equity-based compensation by measuring the cost of employee services received in
exchange for an award of an equity instrument based on the fair value of the award on the grant date. W e recognize the cost of the
award on a straight-line basis over the period during which an employee is required to provide service in exchange for the award,
generally the vesting period.
 
Income T axes.  Under the IRC, REIT s are generally not required to pay federal income taxes if they distribute 100% of their taxable
income and meet certain income, asset and stockholder tests. If we fail to qualify as a REIT  in any taxable year , we will be subject to
federal income taxes at regular corporate rates and may not be able to qualify as a REIT  for the four subsequent taxable years. Even as
a REIT , we may be subject to certain foreign, state and local taxes on our own income and property , and to federal income and excise
taxes on our undistributed taxable income.
 
We have elected taxable REIT  subsidiary (“TRS”) status for some of our consolidated subsidiaries. This allows us to provide services
that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REIT s. Many of the foreign countries in which we have operations do not
recognize REIT s or do not accord REIT  status under their respective tax laws to our entities that operate in their jurisdiction. In the U.S.,
we are taxed in certain states in which we operate. Accordingly , we recognize income tax expense for the federal and state income
taxes incurred by our TRSs, taxes incurred in certain states and foreign jurisdictions, and interest and penalties associated with our
unrecognized tax benefit liabilities.
 
We evaluate tax positions taken in the Consolidated Financial Statements under the interpretation for accounting for uncertainty in
income taxes. As a result of this evaluation, we may recognize a tax benefit from an uncertain tax position only if it is more likely than not
that the tax position will be sustained on examination by taxing authorities.
 
We recognize deferred income taxes in certain taxable entities. For federal income tax purposes, certain acquisitions have been treated
as tax-free transactions resulting in a carry-over basis in assets and liabilities. For financial reporting purposes and in accordance with
purchase accounting, we record all of the acquired assets and assumed liabilities based on their relative fair value at date of acquisition,
as discussed above. For our taxable subsidiaries, including certain international jurisdictions, we recognize the deferred income tax
liabilities that represent the tax ef fect of the dif ference between the tax basis carried over and the fair value of the tangible and intangible
assets at date of acquisition. Any subsequent increases or decreases to the deferred income tax liability recorded in connection with
these acquisitions, are reflected in earnings.
 
If taxable income is generated in these subsidiaries, we recognize a benefit in earnings as a result of the reversal of the deferred income
tax liability previously recorded at the acquisition date and we record current income tax expense representing the entire current income
tax liability . If the reversal of the deferred income tax liability results from a sale or contribution of assets, the classification of the reversal
to the Consolidated Statements of Income is based on the taxability of the transaction. If the sale or contribution is of the real estate
asset and results in a taxable transaction, the reversal is recorded to deferred income tax benefit. If the sale or contribution is the
disposition of the entity that owns the asset, the reversal is recorded through gains.
 
69
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Deferred income tax expense is generally a function of the period’ s temporary dif ferences (items that are treated dif ferently for tax
purposes than for financial reporting purposes) and the utilization of tax net operating losses (“NOL”) generated in prior years that had
been previously recognized as deferred income tax assets. W e provide for a valuation allowance for deferred income tax assets if we
believe all or some portion of the deferred income tax asset may not be realized. Any increase or decrease in the valuation allowance
that results from a change in circumstances that causes a change in the estimated ability to realize the related deferred income tax
asset is included in deferred tax expense.
 
Environmental Costs.  We incur certain environmental remediation costs, including cleanup costs, consulting fees for environmental
studies and investigations, monitoring costs, and legal costs relating to cleanup, litigation defense, and the pursuit of responsible third
parties. W e expense costs incurred in connection with operating properties and properties previously sold. W e capitalize costs related to
undeveloped land as development costs and record any expected future environmental liabilities at the time of acquisition. W e maintain
a liability for the estimated costs of environmental remediation expected to be incurred in connection with undeveloped land, acquired
operating properties and properties previously sold that we adjust as appropriate as information becomes available.
 
Reclassifications.  Lease right-of-use assets and lease liabilities have been reclassified in the Consolidated Financial Statements for
2020 to Other Assets  and Other Liabilities , respectively , in order to conform to the 2021 financial statement presentation.
 
Accounting Pronouncements.
Reference Rate Reform. In March 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued an Accounting Standard Update (“ASU”)  that
provided practical expedients to address existing guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting due to the expected market
transition from the London Inter-bank Of fered Rate (“LIBOR”) and other interbank of fered rates (together “IBORs”) to alternative
reference rates, such as the Secured Overnight Financing Rate. W e refer to this transition as “reference rate reform.”
 
The ASU was ef fective upon issuance on a prospective basis beginning January 1, 2020 and we elected to adopt the ASU over time as
our reference rate reform activities occurred. In reliance on the relief, we modified certain of our Japanese yen term loans ($ 955.6  million
at December 31, 2021) and our available commitments in British pound sterling and Japanese yen on our global senior credit facilities
and Japanese revolver associated with the GBP  LIBOR and Yen LIBOR rates prior to December 31, 2021. W e did not modify any
derivative financial instruments, as none were impacted by this ASU at December 31, 2021. There were no other changes to the
contracts other than the base rate from GBP  LIBOR and Yen LIBOR to their alternative reference rates of SONIA  and TIBOR,
respectively , and therefore there was no material impact on our Consolidated Financial Statements due to the adoption of the ASU.
 
NOTE 3. LIBERTY TRANSACTION
 
On February 4, 2020 , we acquired Liberty Property Trust and Liberty Property Limited Partnership (collectively “Liberty” or the “Liberty
Transaction”).
 
The Liberty Transaction was completed for $ 13.0 billion through the issuance of equity based on the value of the Prologis common stock
and units issued of $ 10.0 billion, the assumption of debt of $ 2.8 billion and transaction costs. In connection with the transaction, each
issued and outstanding share or unit held by a Liberty stockholder or unitholder was converted automatically into 0.675  shares of
Prologis common stock or common units of Prologis, L.P ., respectively , including shares and units under Liberty’ s equity incentive plan
that became fully vested at closing.
 
Through the Liberty Transaction, we acquired a portfolio primarily comprised of logistics real estate assets, including 519 industrial
operating properties, aggregating 99.6 million square feet,  which are highly complementary to our U.S. portfolio in terms of product
quality , location and growth potential in  our key markets .
 
The aggregate equity consideration is calculated below (in millions, except price per share):
 
Number of Prologis shares and units issued upon conversion of Liberty shares and units at February 4, 2020  109.01  
Multiplied by price of Prologis' common stock on February 3, 2020 $ 91.87  
Fair value of Prologis shares and units issued $ 10,015
 
 
We accounted for the Liberty Transaction as an asset acquisition and as a result, the transaction costs of $ 115.8  million were capitalized
to the basis of the acquired properties. Transaction costs included investment banker advisory fees, legal fees and other costs.
 
70
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Under acquisition accounting, the total purchase price was allocated to the Liberty real estate properties and related lease intangibles on
a relative fair value basis. All other assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including debt, and real estate assets that we do not intend
to operate long-term were recorded at fair value as follows (in millions):
 
Net investments in real estate $ 12,636  
Intangible assets, net of intangible liabilities  491 
Cash and other assets  233 
Debt  (2,845 )
Accounts payable, accrued expenses and other liabilities  (383)
Noncontrolling interests  (1)
Total purchase price, including transaction costs $ 10,131
 
 
NOTE 4. REAL ESTATE
 
Investments in real estate properties consisted of the following at December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
 Square Feet   Number of Buildings     
 2021   2020   2021   2020   2021   2020  
Operating properties:                        
Buildings and improvements  444,413    441,336    2,310    2,261   $32,159,514   $31,489,943  
Improved land                  12,294,246    12,017,676  
Development portfolio, including land costs:                        
Prestabilized  6,325    6,076    16   24   710,091    553,266  
Properties under development  28,638    22,004    83   61   2,019,249    1,329,345  
Land (1)                  2,519,590    1,606,358  
Other real estate investments (2)                  3,302,500    3,387,740  
Total investments in real estate properties                  53,005,190    50,384,328  
Less accumulated depreciation                  7,668,187    6,539,156  
Net investments in real estate properties                 $45,337,003   $43,845,172
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2021 and 2020, our land was comprised of 6,227  and 5,304  acres, respectively .
 
(2) Included in other real estate investments were: (i) non-strategic real estate assets acquired that we do not intend to operate long-
term; (ii) real estate assets that we intend to redevelop into industrial properties; (iii) land parcels we own and lease to third
parties; and (iv) costs associated with potential acquisitions and future development projects, including purchase options on land.
 
At December 31, 2021, we had investments in real estate assets in the U.S. and other Americas (Brazil, Canada and Mexico), Europe
(Belgium, the Czech Republic, France, Germany , Hungary , Italy , the Netherlands, Poland, Slovakia, Spain, Sweden and the United
Kingdom (“U.K.”)) and Asia (Japan and Singapore).
 
Acquisitions
 
The following table summarizes our real estate acquisition activity , excluding the Liberty Transaction as discussed in Note 3, for the
years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
  2021 (1)  2020 (2)  2019  
Number of operating properties   31   150   22 
Square feet   6,760    21,874    1,405  
Acquisition cost of net investments in real estate, excluding land (3)  $1,590,457   $2,820,692   $633,923  
             
Acres of land   2,684    830   1,269  
Acquisition cost of land  $1,452,686   $439,773   $440,892
 
 
(1) In 2021, we acquired additional ownership interest in unconsolidated other ventures from our partners and began consolidating
the real estate assets.
 
(2) On January 8, 2020, our two U.S. co-investment ventures, Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund, L.P . (“USLF”) and Prologis U.S.
Logistics V enture, LLC (“USL V”), acquired the wholly-owned real estate assets of Industrial Property Trust Inc. (“IPT”) for $ 2.0
billion each in a cash transaction, including transaction costs and the assumption and repayment of debt (the “IPT  Transaction”).
As we consolidate USL V, the number of operating properties, square feet and acquisition cost for the properties acquired by USL V
are included in the consolidated acquisition activity .
 
71
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
(3) The acquisition cost of net investments in real estate includes other real estate investments of $ 525.5  million, $ 206.1  million and
$302.9  million during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively . Other real estate investments are not
included in the number of operating properties and square feet .
 
Dispositions
 
The following table summarizes our dispositions of net investments in real estate which include contributions to unconsolidated co-
investment ventures and dispositions to third parties for the years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
 2021   2020   2019  
Dispositions of development properties and land, net (1)            
Number of properties  41   41   31 
Square feet  16,482    14,482    10,027  
Net proceeds $2,629,750   $1,693,557   $1,533,055  
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net $817,017   $464,942   $467,577  
            
Other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  (2)(3)            
Number of properties  97   61   66 
Square feet  20,806    10,562    15,816  
Net proceeds $2,536,622   $1,264,692   $1,492,212  
Gains on contributions and dispositions, net $772,570   $252,195   $255,219  
Gains on partial redemptions of investment in an unconsolidated co-investment
     venture (4) $ -  $ -  $135,022  
Total gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net $772,570   $252,195   $390,241
 
 
(1) The gains we recognize in Gains on Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net  are primarily driven by the contribution
of newly developed properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures and occasionally sales to a third party .
 
(2) In 2021, we sold our ownership interest in an unconsolidated other venture.
 
(3) In 2019, we formed Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture (“PBL V”), a Brazilian unconsolidated co-investment venture, with one partner .
We contributed an initial portfolio of real estate properties to PBL V consisting of 14 operating properties totaling 6.9 million square
feet and 371 acres of land. W e received cash proceeds and units for our 20% equity interest .
 
(4) In 2019, we redeemed a portion of our investment in a European unconsolidated co-investment venture.
 
Leases
 
As a Lessor
 
We lease our operating properties to customers under agreements that are classified primarily as operating leases. W e recognize the
total minimum lease payments provided for under the leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Our weighted average lease
term remaining was 51 months based on square feet for all leases in ef fect at December 31, 2021.
 
The following table summarizes the minimum lease payments due from our customers on leases for space in our operating properties,
prestabilized and under development properties, other real estate investments and assets held for sale or contribution at December 31,
2021 (in thousands):  
     
2022  $ 3,160,098  
2023   2,990,115  
2024   2,605,766  
2025   2,223,715  
2026   1,791,256  
Thereafter   6,462,209  
Total  $ 19,233,159
 
 
These amounts do not reflect future rental revenue from the renewal or replacement of existing leases and exclude reimbursements of
operating expenses and rental increases that are not fixed.
 
72
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
As a Lessee
 
We had approximately 120 and 130 land and of fice space leases in which we were the lessee at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively , which primarily qualify as operating leases with remaining lease terms of 1 to 88 years at December 31, 2021. Our lease
liabilities were $ 448.4  million and $ 487.0  million at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively .
 
The following table summarizes the fixed, future minimum rental payments, excluding variable costs, for leases that had commenced at
December 31, 2021, with amounts discounted by our incremental borrowing rates to calculate the lease liabilities of our leases (in
thousands):
     
2022  $ 49,740  
2023   47,453  
2024   46,823  
2025   43,293  
2026   30,708  
Thereafter   580,056  
Total undiscounted rental payments   798,073  
Less imputed interest   349,628  
Total lease liabilities  $ 448,445
 
 
The weighted average remaining lease term for these leases was 28 and 34 years at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . We do
not include renewal options in the lease term for calculating the lease liability unless we are reasonably certain we will exercise the
option or the lessor has the sole ability to exercise the option. The weighted average incremental borrowing rate was 3.2% and 3.4% at
December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . We assigned a collateralized interest rate to each lease based on the term of the lease and
the currency in which the lease was denominated.
 
NOTE 5. UNCONSOLIDATED ENTITIES
 
Summary of Investments
 
We have investments in entities through a variety of ventures. W e co-invest in entities that own multiple properties with partners and
investors and we provide asset management and property management services to these entities, which we refer to as co-investment
ventures. These entities may be consolidated or unconsolidated depending on the structure, our partner ’s participation and other rights
and our level of control of the entity . This note details our investments in unconsolidated co-investment ventures, which are related
parties and accounted for using the equity method of accounting. See Note 11 for more detail regarding our consolidated investments
that are not wholly owned.
 
We also have investments in other ventures, generally with one partner , which we account for using the equity method. W e refer to our
investments in both unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures, collectively , as unconsolidated entities.
 
The following table summarizes our investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020  
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures  $ 7,825,455   $ 6,685,567  
Other ventures (1)   785,503    916,447  
Total  $ 8,610,958   $ 7,602,014
 
 
(1) In 2021, we acquired additional ownership interest in unconsolidated other ventures from our partners and began consolidating
the real estate assets. W e also sold our ownership interest in an unconsolidated other venture.
 
73
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment Ventures
 
The following table summarizes our investments in the individual co-investment ventures at December 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
  Ownership
Percentage  Investment in
and Advances to 
Co-Investment V enture  2021   2020   2021   2020  
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund, L.P . (“USLF”)   27.0%  25.6% $2,393,232   $1,885,467  
FIBRA  Prologis (1)   47.3%  46.8%  694,590    691,204  
Prologis European Logistics Partners Holding Sàrl (“PELP”) (2) (3)   50.0%  50.0%  2,097,332    1,687,749  
Prologis European Logistics Fund (“PELF”) (3)   23.8%  24.3%  1,605,253    1,401,355  
Prologis UK Logistics V enture (“UKL V”) (2) (3)   15.0%  15.0%  9,243    63,228  
Nippon Prologis REIT , Inc. (“NPR”) (4)   15.1%  15.1%  684,029    643,663  
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund, LP  (“PCCLF”)   15.3%  15.8%  75,922    81,581  
Prologis China Logistics V enture I, LP , II, LP  and III, LP
     (“Prologis China Logistics V enture”) (2)   15.0%  15.0%  120,283    111,406  
Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture (“PBL V”) and other joint ventures (2)   20.0%  20.0%  145,571    119,914  
Total          $7,825,455   $6,685,567
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2021, we owned 404.6  million units of FIBRA  Prologis that had a closing price of Ps 56.83  ($2.77) per unit on the
Mexican Stock Exchange. W e have granted FIBRA  Prologis a right of first refusal with respect to stabilized properties that we plan
to sell in Mexico.
 
(2) We have one partner in each of these co-investment ventures.
 
(3) In December 2021, UKL V sold its operating properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, PELF and PELP , and its
land to us and recognized the related gains upon disposition. At December 31, 2021, there is a $ 9.2 million outstanding receivable
balance anticipated to be paid in the first quarter of 2022 .
 
(4) At December 31, 2021, we owned 0.4 million units of NPR that  had a closing price of ¥ 407,000  ($3,536 ) per share on the Tokyo
Stock Exchange. For any properties we develop and plan to sell in Japan, we have committed to of fer those properties to NPR if
we determine the properties meet NPR’ s investment objectives.
 
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had receivables from NPR of $ 175.2  million and $ 160.3  million, respectively , related to
customer security deposits that originated through a leasing company owned by us that pertain to properties previously
contributed to NPR. W e have a corresponding payable to NPR’ s customers in Other Liabilities . These amounts are repaid to us as
the leases turn over .
 
The amounts recognized in Strategic Capital Revenues  and Earnings from Unconsolidated Entities, Net  depend on the size, operations
and transactions of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures, the timing of revenues earned through promotes and transactional fees,
as well as fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and our ownership interest. W e recognized Strategic Capital Expenses  for
direct costs associated with the asset management of these ventures and allocated property-level management and leasing costs for
the properties owned by the ventures.
 
The following table summarizes the Strategic Capital Revenues  we recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Income related to our
unconsolidated co-investment ventures for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
Recurring fees  $395,765   $318,423   $266,615  
Transactional fees   78,552    65,804    57,334  
Promote revenue   77,199    239,268    165,635  
Total strategic capital revenues from unconsolidated co-investment ventures (1) $551,516   $623,495   $489,584
 
 
(1) These amounts exclude strategic capital revenues from other ventures.
 
74
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
The following table summarizes the key property information, financial position and operating information of our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures on a U.S. GAAP  basis (not our proportionate share) and the amounts we recognized in the Consolidated Financial
Statements related to these ventures at December 31 and for the years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
 U.S. Other Americas (1) Europe Asia Total  
At: 2021  2020  2021  2020  2021  2020  2021  2020  2021  2020 
Key property information:                                        
Ventures  1   1   2   2   2   3   3   3   8   9 
Operating properties  732   706   254   229   818   768   203   167   2,007   1,870 
Square feet  122   117   56   51   198   185   82   67   458   420 
                                        
Financial position:                                        
Total assets ($)  11,619   10,840   3,349   3,023   18,373   16,918   10,746   10,209   44,087   40,990 
Third-party debt ($)  3,069   3,129   1,052   854   3,737   4,002   4,157   3,831   12,015   11,816 
Total liabilities ($)  3,717   3,722   1,116   898   5,619   5,607   4,685   4,389   15,137   14,616 
                                        
Our investment balance ($)  (2)  2,393   1,886   840   811   3,712   3,152   880   837   7,825   6,686 
Our weighted average ownership
(3)  27.0%  25.6%  40.8%  40.8%  30.9%  30.0%  15.1%  15.2%  26.9%  26.1%
 
 U.S.   Other Americas (1)  Europe   Asia   Total  
Operating Information: 2021  2020  2019  2021  2020  2019  2021 2020  2019  2021  2020  2019  2021  2020  2019 
For the years ended:                                                           
Total revenues ($)  1,039   946   738   321   278   266   1,387  1,208   1,099   653   584   514   3,400   3,016   2,617 
Net earnings ($)  312   169   128   120   91   91   1,070  390   311   160   255   49   1,662   905   579 
                                                           
Our earnings from
unconsolidated
     co-investment ventures, net
($)  82   46   38   43   34   32   214  121   102   27   39   10   366   240   182
 
 
(1) PBLV and our other Brazilian joint ventures are combined as one venture for the purpose of this table.  
 
(2) Prologis’  investment balance is presented at our adjusted basis. The dif ference between our ownership interest of a venture’ s
equity and our investment balance at December 31, 2021 and 2020, results principally from four types of transactions: (i) deferred
gains from the contribution of property to a venture prior to January 1, 2018 ($ 559.7  million and $ 589.3  million, respectively); (ii)
recording additional costs associated with our investment in the venture ($ 96.6 million and $ 101.5  million, respectively); (iii)
receivables, principally for fees and promotes ($ 149.5  million and $ 165.6  million, respectively); and (iv) customer security deposits
retained subsequent to property contributions to NPR, as discussed above.
 
(3) Represents our weighted average ownership interest in all unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on each entity’ s
contribution of total assets before depreciation, net of other liabilities.
 
Equity Commitments Related to Certain Unconsolidated Co-Investment Ventures
 
Certain unconsolidated co-investment ventures have equity commitments from us and our venture partners. Our venture partners fulfill
their equity commitment with cash. W e may fulfill our equity commitment through contributions of properties or cash. The contributions
are generally used for the acquisition or development of properties but may be used for the repayment of debt or other general uses.
The venture may obtain financing for the acquisition of properties and therefore the acquisition price of additional investments that the
venture could make may be more than the equity commitment. Depending on market conditions, the investment objectives of the
ventures, our liquidity needs and other factors, we may make additional contributions of properties or additional cash investments in
these ventures.
 
At December 31, 2021, our outstanding equity commitments were $ 312.5  million, principally for Prologis China Logistics V enture.  The
equity commitments expire from 2022  to 2028  if they have not been previously called.
 
75
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
NOTE 6. ASSETS HELD FOR SALE OR CONTRIBUTION
 
We had investments in certain real estate properties that met the criteria to be classified as held for sale or contribution at December 31,
2021 and 2020. At the time of classification, these properties were expected to be sold to third parties or were recently stabilized and
expected to be contributed to unconsolidated co-investment ventures within twelve months. The amounts included in Assets Held for
Sale or Contribution  represented real estate investment balances and the related assets and liabilities.
 
Assets held for sale or contribution consisted of the following at December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
  2021   2020 (1) 
Number of operating properties   14   66 
Square feet   5,486    12,923  
Total assets held for sale or contribution  $669,688   $1,070,724  
Total liabilities associated with assets held for sale or contribution – included in Other Liabilities  $ 10,631   $ 16,214
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2020, Assets Held for Sale or Contribution included certain properties acquired through the Liberty Transaction
and the IPT  Transaction that were subsequently sold during 2021.
 
NOTE 7. OTHER ASSETS AND OTHER LIABILITIES
 
The following table summarizes our other assets, net of amortization and depreciation, and other liabilities, net of amortization, if
applicable, at December 31 (in thousands):
  2021   2020  
Rent leveling  $ 578,960   $ 488,828  
Acquired lease intangibles   552,517    726,821  
Leasing commissions   520,778    425,995  
Lease right-of-use assets (1)   459,364    492,801  
Accounts receivable   424,240    189,356  
Prepaid assets   153,591    138,726  
Value added taxes receivable   133,034    146,270  
Fixed assets   118,044    117,700  
Derivative assets   91,047    1,667  
Other notes receivable   35,970    44,751  
Management contracts   12,282    13,610  
Deferred income taxes   8,926    5,592  
Other   223,701    156,892  
Total other assets  $3,312,454   $2,949,009  
         
Lease liabilities (1)  $ 448,445   $ 486,972  
Tenant security deposits   373,432    342,627  
Acquired lease intangibles   198,894    197,807  
Unearned rents   164,669    152,536  
Income tax liabilities   105,537    86,210  
Environmental liabilities   86,920    69,930  
Indemnification liability   44,416    45,129  
Deferred income   21,699    15,437  
Value added taxes payable   17,556    23,959  
Liabilities associated with assets held for sale or contribution   10,631    16,214  
Derivative liabilities   9,675    36,482  
Other   294,315    274,674  
Total other liabilities  $1,776,189   $1,747,977
 
 
(1) For the amortization of the future minimum rental payments into rental expense and G&A  expense on our land and of fice leases,
respectively , refer to Note 4.
 
76
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
The following table summarizes the expected future amortization of leasing commissions and forgone rent (included in acquired lease
intangibles above) into amortization expense and above and below market leases (included in acquired lease intangibles above) and
rent leveling net assets into rental revenues, all based on the balances at December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
 
  Amortization
Expense   Net Decrease (Increase) to
Rental Revenues 
2022  $ 241,588   $ (53,070 )
2023   192,651    24,397  
2024   151,053    56,904  
2025   117,190    75,823  
2026   87,226    72,319  
Thereafter   199,398    287,882  
Total  $ 989,106   $ 464,255
 
 
NOTE 8. DEBT
 
All debt is incurred by the OP  or its consolidated subsidiaries. The following table summarizes our debt at December 31 (dollars in
thousands):
 
 2021   2020  
 Weighted Average   Amount   Weighted Average   Amount  
 Interest Rate  (1)  Term (2)  Outstanding (3)  Interest Rate  (1)  Term (2)  Outstanding (3) 
Credit facilities 0.8%    1.6   $ 491,393   0.8%    2.0   $ 171,794  
Senior notes (4) 1.7%    11.6    14,981,690   2.0%    11.2    14,275,870  
Term loans and
     unsecured other 0.5%    4.2    1,825,195   0.9%    5.6    1,764,311  
Secured mortgage (5) 5.1%    4.7    416,776   3.1%    3.0    637,101  
Total 1.6%    10.4   $ 17,715,054   1.9%    10.2   $ 16,849,076
 
 
(1) The weighted average interest rates presented represent the ef fective interest rates (including amortization of debt issuance costs
and noncash premiums or discounts) at the end of the period for the debt outstanding and include the impact of designated
interest rate swaps, which ef fectively fix the interest rate on certain variable rate debt.
 
(2) The weighted average term represents the remaining maturity in years on the debt outstanding at period end.
 
(3) We borrow in the functional currencies of the countries where we invest. Included in the outstanding balances at December 31
were borrowings denominated in the following currencies:
 
   2021   2020  
   Weighted Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total   Weighted Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total  
 British pound sterling   2.1% $1,376,807    7.8%  2.2% $1,019,480    6.1%
 Canadian dollar   2.7%  283,773    1.6%  2.7%  285,708    1.7%
 Euro   1.0%  7,408,407    41.8%  1.4%  6,549,676    38.8%
 Japanese yen   0.9%  2,878,542    16.2%  0.8%  2,877,247    17.1%
 U.S. dollar   2.6%  5,767,525    32.6%  2.8%  6,116,965    36.3%
 Total   1.6% $17,715,054    100.0 %  1.9% $16,849,076    100.0 %
 
(4) Senior notes are due from February 2022 to June 2061 with ef fective interest rates ranging from - 0.2% to 4.5% at December 31,
2021.
 
(5) Secured mortgage debt is due from October 2022 to September 2033 with ef fective interest rates ranging from 3.3% to 7.8% at
December 31, 2021. The debt was principally secured by 90 operating properties and 1 land parcel with an aggregate
undepreciated cost of $ 1.4 billion at December 31, 2021.
 
Credit Facilities
 
We have a global senior credit facility (the “2019 Global Facility”) under which we may draw in British pound sterling, Canadian dollars,
euro, Japanese yen, Mexican pesos  and U.S. dollars on a revolving basis up to $ 3.5 billion (subject to currency fluctuations). In April
2021, we entered into a second global senior credit facility (the “2021 Global Facility”) under which we may draw in Canadian dollars,
euro, British pound sterling, Japanese yen, Mexican pesos and U.S. dollars on a revolving basis up to $ 1.0 billion (subject to currency
fluctuations). The 2019 Global Facility is scheduled to initially mature in  January 2023  and the 2021 Global Facility in April 2024 ;
77
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
however , we may extend the maturity date for both facilities by six months on two occasions, subject to the payment of extension fees.
We have the ability to increase the 2019 Global Facility to $4.5 billion  and the 2021 Global Facility to $ 2.0 billion, subject to currency
fluctuations and obtaining additional lender commitments .
 
We also have a Japanese yen revolver (the “Y en Credit Facility”) with total commitments of ¥ 55.0 billion ($ 477.8  million at December 31,
2021). W e have the ability to increase the borrowing capacity of the Yen Credit Facility to ¥ 75.0 billion ($ 651.5  million at December 31,
2021), subject to obtaining additional lender commitments. The Yen Credit Facility is initially scheduled to mature in July 2024 ; however ,
we may extend the maturity date for one year , subject to the payment of extension fees.
 
We refer to the 2019 Global Facility , the 2021 Global Facility and the Yen Credit Facility , collectively , as our “Credit Facilities.” Pricing for
the Credit Facilities, including the spread over the applicable benchmark and the rates applicable to facility fees and letter of credit fees,
varies based on the public debt ratings of the OP .
 
Liquidity
 
The following table summarizes information about our available liquidity (dollars in millions):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
For the years ended December 31:             
Weighted average daily interest rate   1.3%  1.1%  1.5%
Weighted average daily borrowings  $ 60  $ 109  $ 85 
Maximum borrowings outstanding at any month-end  $ 491  $ 727  $ 257 
At December 31:             
Aggregate lender commitments             
Credit Facilities  $ 4,940   $ 4,119   $ 3,946  
Less:             
Borrowings outstanding   491   172   184 
Outstanding letters of credit   7   24   36 
Current availability  $ 4,442   $ 3,923   $ 3,726  
Available term loans   -   250   500 
Cash and cash equivalents   556   598   1,089  
Total liquidity  $ 4,998   $ 4,771   $ 5,315  
            
 
Senior Notes
 
The senior notes are unsecured and our obligations are ef fectively subordinated in certain respects to any of our debt that is secured by
a lien on real property , to the extent of the value of such real property . The senior notes require interest payments be made quarterly ,
semi-annually or annually . The majority of the senior notes are redeemable at any time at our option, subject to certain prepayment
penalties. Such repurchase and other terms are governed by the provisions of indenture agreements, various note purchase
agreements or trust deeds.  The following table summarizes the issuances and redemptions of senior notes during 2021 (principal in
thousands):
 
  Aggregate Principal   Issuance Date W eighted Average    
Issuance Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate (2)   Term  (3)  Maturity Dates
February  € 1,350,000   $ 1,639,305   0.7%    14.3   February 2032 – 2041
February  $ 400,000   $ 400,000   1.6%    10.1   March 2031
June  ¥ 65,000,000   $ 587,441   0.8%    15.4   June 2028 – 2061
December  £ 215,000   $ 284,455   2.0%    17.7   December 2033 – 2041
Total      $ 2,911,201   1.0%    14.2    
                   
  Aggregate Principal   Redemption Date W eighted Average    
Redemption Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate (2)   Term  (3)  Maturity Dates
March  € 599,514   $ 715,700   3.4%    3.0   February 2024
March  $ 750,000   $ 750,000   3.8%    4.7   November 2025
Total      $ 1,465,700   3.6%    3.8    
 
(1) The exchange rate used to calculate into U.S. dollars was the spot rate at the settlement date.
 
(2) The weighted average interest rate represents the fixed or variable interest rates of the related debt at the issuance or redemption
date.
78
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
(3) The weighted average term represents the remaining maturity in years on the related debt at the issuance or redemption date.
 
In 2021, we used the net proceeds from the issuance of the senior notes to fund the senior note redemptions, repay other indebtedness
and for general corporate purposes.
 
Early Extinguishment of Debt
 
Over the last three years, we repurchased or repaid certain debt before the maturity date in an ef fort to reduce our borrowing costs and
extend our debt maturities. As a result, the dif ference between the recorded debt (including premiums, discounts and related debt
issuance costs) and the consideration we paid to retire the debt, including fees, was recognized as gains or losses. Fees associated
with the restructuring of debt that meets the modification criteria, along with existing unamortized premium or discount and debt
issuance costs, are amortized over the term of the new debt .
 
We recognized $ 187.5  million, $ 188.3  million and $ 16.1 million of losses on the early extinguishment of debt in 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively . The losses during 2021 and 2020 were driven by the redemption of certain higher interest rate senior notes before their
stated maturity . We redeemed $ 1.5 billion of senior notes in 2021, with stated maturities of 2024 and 2025, and $ 2.6 billion of senior
notes in 2020, with stated maturities between 2021 and 2024. The losses in 2020 included the extinguishment of debt assumed in the
Liberty Transaction and the IPT  Transaction, which represented the excess of the prepayment penalties over the premium recorded
upon assumption of the debt.  
 
Term Loans
 
The following table summarizes our outstanding term loans at December 31 (dollars and borrowing currency in thousands):
 
Term LoanBorrowing
Currency Issuance
Date  Lender Commitment at
2021   Amount
Outstanding
at 2021  Amount
Outstanding
at 2020  Interest Rate  Maturity Date
     Borrowing
Currency USD  USD   USD        
2017 Term Loan (1)USD, EUR,
JPY and GBP June 2014 $ 500,000 $500,000  $ -   $250,000  LIBOR + 0.9%  May 2021
2015 Canadian
     Term Loan CAD  December
2015  $ 170,506 $134,173   134,173   133,837  CDOR + 0.9%  February 2023
March 2017 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  March 2017 ¥12,000,000 $104,243   104,243   116,414  0.9% and
1.0%   March 2027 –
2028
October 2017 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  October
2017  ¥10,000,000 $86,869   86,869   97,012  0.9%   October 2032
December 2018 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  December
2018  ¥20,000,000 $173,738   173,738   194,023  1.2% and
TIBOR + 0.7%  December 2031
– June 2033
January 2019 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  January
2019  ¥15,000,000 $130,304   130,304   145,517  TIBOR + 0.5%
to 0.6%   January 2028 –
2030
March 2019 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  March 2019 ¥85,000,000 $738,388   738,388   824,599  TIBOR + 0.4%  March 2026
Subtotal             1,367,715   1,761,402       
Debt issuance costs, net            (5,169)  (7,385)      
Total term loans            $1,362,546  $1,754,017       
 
 (1) In April 2021, the multi-currency term loan (“2017 Term Loan”) was terminated, the outstanding balance paid down and the
interest rate swap contracts associated with the outstanding balance of $250.3  million were settled .
 
Other Debt
 
In December 2021, we entered into a loan for € 400.0  million ($ 453.0  million at December 31, 2021) with an interest rate of - 0.5% and a
maturity of June 2022 .
79
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Long-Term Debt Maturities
 
Scheduled principal payments due on our debt for each year through the period ended December 31, 2026, and thereafter were as
follows at December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
 
 Unsecured        
  Credit   Senior   Term Loans   Secured      
Maturity  Facilities   Notes   and Other   Mortgage   Total  
2022  (1)  $ -  $ 509,670   $ 462,649   $ 13,422   $ 985,741  
2023  (2)   265,818    -   134,173    35,999    435,990  
2024  (3)   225,575    -   -   135,510    361,085  
2025   -   43,435    -   144,784    188,219  
2026   -   966,179    738,388    3,466    1,708,033  
Thereafter   -   13,536,089    495,154    74,629    14,105,872  
Subtotal   491,393    15,055,373    1,830,364    407,810    17,784,940  
Premiums (discounts), net   -   2,548    -   10,544    13,092  
Debt issuance costs, net   -   (76,231 )  (5,169 )  (1,578 )  (82,978 )
Total  $ 491,393   $14,981,690   $ 1,825,195   $ 416,776   $17,715,054 
 
(1) We expect to repay the amounts maturing in the next twelve months  with cash generated from operations, proceeds from
dispositions of real estate properties, or as necessary , with additional borrowings.
 
(2) Included in the 2023 maturities is the 2019 Global Facility that can be extended until 2024.
 
(3) Included in the 2024 maturities is the 2021 Global Facility that can be extended until 2025.
 
Interest Expense
 
The following table summarizes the components of interest expense for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
Gross interest expense  $ 299,115   $ 348,427   $ 271,451  
Amortization of debt discounts (premiums), net   (7,478 )  (6,741 )  3,713  
Amortization of debt issuance costs, net   16,134    14,600    13,293  
Interest expense before capitalization  $ 307,771   $ 356,286   $ 288,457  
Capitalized amounts   (41,543 )  (41,779 )  (48,504 )
Net interest expense  $ 266,228   $ 314,507   $ 239,953  
Total cash paid for interest, net of amounts capitalized  $ 278,861   $ 309,390   $ 214,375
 
 
Financial Debt Covenants
 
Our senior notes, term loans and Credit Facilities outstanding at December 31, 2021 were subject to certain financial covenants under
their related documents. At December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with all of our financial debt covenants.
 
Guarantee of Finance Subsidiary Debt
 
We have finance subsidiaries as part of our operations in Europe (Prologis Euro Finance LLC), Japan (Prologis Yen Finance LLC) and
the U.K. (Prologis Sterling Finance LLC) in order to mitigate our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we invest.
These entities are 100% indirectly owned by the OP  and all unsecured debt issued or to be issued by each entity is or will be fully and
unconditionally guaranteed by the OP . There are no restrictions or limits on the OP’ s ability to obtain funds from its subsidiaries by
dividend or loan. In reliance on Rule 13-01 of Regulation S-X, the separate financial statements of Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis
Yen Finance LLC and Prologis Sterling Finance LLC are not provided.
 
NOTE 9. STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY OF PROLOGIS, INC.
 
Shares Authorized
 
At December 31, 2021, 2.1 billion shares were authorized to be issued by the Parent, of which 2.0 billion shares represent common
stock and 0.1 billion shares represent preferred stock. Our board of directors (the “Board”) may , without stockholder approval, classify or
reclassify any unissued shares of our stock from time to time by setting or changing the preferences, conversion or other rights, voting
powers, restrictions, limitations as to distributions, qualifications and terms or conditions of redemption of such shares.
 
80
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Common Stock
 
Our at-the-market program allows us to sell up to $ 1.5 billion in aggregate gross sales proceeds of shares of common stock through
twenty  designated agents. These agents earn a fee of up to 2% of the gross sales price per share of common stock as agreed to on a
transaction-by-transaction basis. W e have not issued any shares of common stock under this program.
 
On February 4, 2020, we issued 106.7  million common shares in the Liberty Transaction.  See Note 3 for more detail on this transaction.
 
Under the 2020 Long-T erm Incentive Plan, certain of our employees and outside directors are able to participate in equity-based
compensation plans. See Note 12 for additional information on equity-based compensation plans.
 
Share Purchase Program
 
We have a share purchase program for the repurchase of outstanding shares of our common stock on the open market or in privately
negotiated transactions for an aggregate purchase price of up to $ 1.0 billion. In 2020, we repurchased and retired 0.5 million shares of
common stock for an aggregate price of $ 34.8 million at a weighted average price of $ 64.66  per share on the open market.
 
Preferred Stock
 
In 2020, we repurchased approximately 0.1 million shares of Series Q preferred stock and recognized a loss of $ 2.3 million, which
primarily represented the dif ference between the repurchase price and the carrying value of the preferred stock, net of original issuance
costs.
 
At December 31, 2021 and 2020 our Series Q preferred stock outstanding had a dividend rate of 8.54% and will be redeemable at our
option on or after November 13, 2026. Holders have, subject to certain conditions, limited voting rights and all holders are entitled to
receive cumulative preferential dividends based on liquidation preference. The dividends are payable quarterly when, and if, they have
been declared by the Board, out of funds legally available for the payment of dividends.
 
Ownership Restrictions
 
For us to qualify as a REIT , five or fewer individuals may not own more than 50% of the value of our outstanding stock at any time during
the last half of our taxable year . Therefore, our charter restricts beneficial ownership (or ownership generally attributed to a person under
the REIT  rules), by a person, or persons acting as a group, of issued and outstanding common and preferred stock that would cause
that person to own or be deemed to own more than 9.8% (by value or number of shares, whichever is more restrictive) of our issued and
outstanding common stock. Furthermore, subject to certain exceptions, no person shall at any time directly or indirectly acquire
ownership of more than 25% of any of the preferred stock. These provisions assist us in protecting and preserving our REIT  status and
protect the interests of stockholders in takeover transactions by preventing the acquisition of a substantial block of outstanding shares of
stock.
 
Shares of stock owned by a person or group of people in excess of these limits are subject to redemption by us. The provision does not
apply where a majority of the Board, in its sole and absolute discretion, waives such limit after determining that our status as a REIT  for
federal income tax purposes will not be jeopardized.
 
Dividends
 
To comply with the REIT  requirements of the IRC, we are generally required to make common and preferred stock dividends (other than
capital gain distributions) to our stockholders in amounts that together at least equal (i) the sum of (a) 90% of our “REIT  taxable income”
computed without regard to the dividends paid deduction and net capital gains and (b) 90% of the net income (after tax), if any , from
foreclosure property , minus (ii) certain excess noncash income. Our common stock distribution policy is to distribute a percentage of our
cash flow that ensures that we will meet the distribution requirements of the IRC and that allows us to also retain cash to meet other
needs, such as capital improvements and other investment activities.
 
The taxability of our dividends for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 are presented below . The taxability of dividends
paid in 2021 was based on management’ s estimates as our tax return for the year ended December 31, 2021 has not been filed. As the
statute of limitations is generally three years, our tax returns for certain years remain subject to examination and consequently the
taxability of the dividends is subject to change.
 
81
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
In 2021, 2020 and 2019, we paid all of our dividends in cash.
 
The following summarizes the taxability of our common and preferred stock dividends for the years ended December 31:
 
  2021 (1)   2020   2019  
Common Stock:             
Ordinary income  $ 2.45  $ 2.12  $ 2.08 
Qualified dividend   0.00   0.00   0.00 
Capital gains   0.07   0.20   0.04 
Total distribution  $ 2.52  $ 2.32  $ 2.12 
Preferred Stock – Series Q:             
Ordinary income  $ 4.15  $ 3.96  $ 4.00 
Qualified dividend   0.01   0.02   0.01 
Capital gains   0.11   0.29   0.26 
Total dividend  $ 4.27  $ 4.27  $ 4.27
 
 
(1) Taxability for 2021 is estimated.
 
Common stock dividends are characterized for federal income tax purposes as ordinary income, qualified dividend, capital gains, non-
taxable return of capital or a combination of the four . Common stock dividends that exceed our current and accumulated earnings and
profits (calculated for tax purposes) constitute a return of capital rather than a dividend and generally reduce the stockholder ’s basis in
the common stock. To the extent that a dividend exceeds both current and accumulated earnings and profits and the stockholder ’s basis
in the common stock, it will generally be treated as a gain from the sale or exchange of that stockholder ’s common stock. At the
beginning of each year , we notify our stockholders of the taxability of the common stock dividends paid during the preceding year .
 
Pursuant to the terms of our preferred stock, we are restricted from declaring or paying any dividend with respect to our common stock
unless and until all cumulative dividends with respect to the preferred stock have been paid and suf ficient funds have been set aside for
dividends that have been declared for the relevant dividend period with respect to the preferred stock.
 
NOTE 10. PARTNERS’ CAPITAL OF PROLOGIS, L.P.
 
Distributions paid on the common limited partnership units, and the taxability of those distributions, are similar to dividends paid on the
Parent’ s common stock disclosed above.
 
On February 4, 2020, we issued 2.3 million common limited partnership units in the OP  in the Liberty Transaction. See Note 3 for more
detail on this transaction. Additionally , we issued 1.0 million limited partnership units to our partner as partial consideration for the
acquisition of additional ownership interest in an unconsolidated other venture in 2021 and 0.5 million limited partnership units as partial
consideration for the acquisition of other properties in 2020.
 
We issued Class A Units in the OP  through an acquisition of a portfolio of properties in 2015. The Class A Units generally have the same
rights as the existing common limited partnership units of the OP , except that the Class A Units are entitled to a quarterly distribution
equal to $ 0.64665  per unit so long as the common limited partnership units receive a quarterly distribution of at least $ 0.40 per unit (in
the event the common limited partnership units receive a quarterly distribution of less than $0.40 per unit, the Class A Unit distribution
would be reduced by a proportionate amount). Class A Units are convertible into common limited partnership units at an initial
conversion rate of one-for-one. The conversion rate will be increased or decreased to the extent that, at the time of conversion, the net
present value of the distributions paid with respect to the Class A Units are less or more than the distributions paid on common limited
partnership units from the time of issuance of the Class A Units until the time of conversion. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the Class
A Units were convertible into 8.0 million  common limited partnership units. The OP  may redeem the Class A Units at any time after
October 7, 2025, for an amount in cash equal to the then-current number of the common limited partnership units into which the Class A
Units are convertible, multiplied by $ 43.11 , subject to the holders’  right to convert the Class A Units into common limited partnership
units. Distributions paid to the Class A Units were $ 2.58660  annually during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
 
NOTE 11. NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS
 
Prologis, L.P.
 
We report noncontrolling interests related to several entities we consolidate but of which we do not own 100% of the equity . These
entities include two real estate partnerships that have issued limited partnership units to third parties. Depending on the specific
partnership agreements, these limited partnership units are redeemable for cash or , at our option, shares of the Parent’ s common stock,
generally at a rate of one share of common stock to one limited partnership unit . We also consolidate certain entities in which we do not
own 100% of the equity but the equity of these entities is not exchangeable into our common stock.
82
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
As discussed in Note 1, the Parent has complete responsibility , power and discretion in the day-to-day management of the OP . The
Parent, through its majority interest, has the right to receive benefits from and incur losses of the OP . In addition, the OP  does not have
either substantive liquidation rights or substantive kick-out rights without cause or substantive participating rights that could be exercised
by a simple majority of noncontrolling interests. The absence of such rights renders the OP  as a VIE. Accordingly , the Parent is the
primary beneficiary and therefore consolidates the OP .
 
Prologis, Inc.
 
The noncontrolling interests of the Parent include the noncontrolling interests described above for the OP , as well as the limited
partnership units in the OP  that are not owned by the Parent. The outstanding limited partnership units receive quarterly cash
distributions equal to the quarterly dividends paid on our common stock pursuant to the terms of the applicable partnership agreements.
 
The following table summarizes these entities at December 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
 Our Ownership
Percentage   Noncontrolling
Interests   Total Assets   Total Liabilities  
 2021   2020   2021   2020   2021   2020   2021   2020  
Prologis U.S. Logistics V enture  55.0%  55.0% $3,264,337   $3,385,110   $7,397,195   $7,663,800   $147,545   $145,131  
Other consolidated entities  (1)various   various    133,201    98,416    1,453,236    1,066,129    162,598    73,987  
Prologis, L.P .          3,397,538    3,483,526    8,850,431    8,729,929    310,143    219,118  
Limited partners in Prologis, L.P .
(2)(3)          917,799    869,507    -   -   -   - 
Prologis, Inc.         $4,315,337   $4,353,033   $8,850,431   $8,729,929   $310,143   $219,118
 
 
(1) Includes our two partnerships that have issued limited partnership units to third parties, as discussed above, along with various
other consolidated entities. The limited partnership units outstanding at December 31, 2021 and 2020 were exchangeable into
cash or , at our option, 0.3 million shares of the Parent’ s common stock.
(2) We had 8.6 million Class A Units at December 31, 2021 and 2020 that were convertible into 8.0 million limited partnership units of
the OP  at the end of each year . See Note 10 for further discussion of our Class A Units .
(3) There were limited partnership units in the OP , excluding the Class A Units, that were exchangeable into cash or , at our option, 8.4
million and 8.2 million shares of the Parent’ s common stock, at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . Also included are the
vested OP  Long-T erm Incentive Plan Units (“L TIP Units”) associated with our long-term compensation plans of 4.0 million and 3.9
million at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively . See further discussion of L TIP Units in Note 12. 
 
NOTE 12. LONG-TERM COMPENSATION
 
2020 Long-Term Incentive Plan
 
In 2020, our stockholders approved the 2020 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (“2020 L TIP”), which replaced the 2012 Long-T erm Incentive
Plan (“2012 L TIP”). After approval of the 2020 L TIP, no further awards could be made under the 2012 L TIP and outstanding awards
previously granted under the 2012 L TIP will remain outstanding in accordance with the awards’  terms.
 
The 2020 L TIP provides for grants of awards to of ficers, directors, employees and consultants of the Parent or its subsidiaries. Awards
can be in the form of: full value awards, stock appreciation rights and stock options (non-qualified options and incentive stock options).
Full value awards generally consist of: (i) common stock; (ii) restricted stock units (“RSUs”); (iii) OP  LTIP units (“L TIP Units”) and (iv)
Prologis Outperformance Plan (“POP”) OP  LTIP units (“POP  LTIP Units”).  The equity-based compensation plans and programs under
which awards can be made were not changed under the 2020 L TIP. Awards may be made under the 2020 L TIP until it is terminated by
the Board or until the ten-year anniversary of the ef fective date of the plan.
 
The awards have been issued under the following components of our equity-based compensation plans and programs at December 31,
2021 : (i) POP; (ii) Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”); (iii) annual long-term incentive (“L TI”) equity award program (“Annual L TI Award”); and
(iv) annual bonus exchange program. Under all of these components, certain employees may elect to receive their equity award payout
either in the form of RSUs or other equity of the Parent or L TIP Units of the OP .
 
At December 31, 2021, we had 33.8 million shares reserved or available for issuance, including 4.6 million shares of common stock to
be issued upon vesting of awards previously granted and 23.2 million shares of common stock remaining available for future issuance
under equity compensation plans. Each L TIP Unit and POP  LTIP Unit counts as one share of common stock for purposes of calculating
the limit on shares that may be issued.
 
83
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Equity-Based Compensation Plans and Programs
 
Prologis Outperformance Plan (“POP”)
 
We have allocated participation points or a percentage of the compensation pool to participants under our POP  corresponding to three-
year performance periods beginning every January 1. The fair value of the awards is measured at the grant date and amortized over the
period from the grant date to the date at which the awards vest, which ranges from three  to ten years . The performance hurdle
(“Outperformance Hurdle”) at the end of the initial three-year performance period requires our three-year compound annualized total
stockholder return (“TSR”) to exceed a threshold set at the three-year compound annualized TSR for the Morgan Stanley Capital
International (“MSCI”) US REIT  Index for the same period plus 100 basis points. If the Outperformance Hurdle is met, a compensation
pool will be formed equal to 3% of the excess value created, subject to a maximum as defined by each performance period. POP
awards cannot be paid at a time when we meet the outperformance hurdle yet our absolute TSR is negative. If after seven years  our
absolute TSR has not been positive, the awards will be forfeited.
 
We granted participation points for the 2021 – 2023 performance period in January 2021, as discussed in the table below . The 2021 –
2023 performance period has an absolute maximum cap of $ 100 million. If an award is earned at the end of the initial three-year
performance period, then 20% of the POP  award is paid at the end of the initial performance period and the remaining 80% is subject to
additional seven-year  cliff vesting. The 20% that is paid at the end of the initial three-year  performance period is subject to an additional
three-year  holding requirement.
 
Each participant is eligible to receive a percentage of the total compensation pool based on the number of participation points allocated
to the participant, or in the case of certain executive of ficers, a set percentage of the compensation pool. If the performance criteria are
met, the participants’  points or compensation pool percentage will be paid in the form of common stock, restricted stock units or POP
LTIP Units, as elected by the participant. Annually , a participant may exchange their participation points or compensation pool
percentage for POP  LTIP Units. If the performance criteria are not met, the participants’  points, compensation pool percentage and POP
LTIP Units will be forfeited.
 
At December 31, 2021 , all awards were equity classified. The initial valuation was calculated using a Monte Carlo valuation model.
 
The following table details the assumptions used for each grant based on the year it was granted (dollars in thousands):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
Risk free interest rate   0.2%  1.7%  2.6%
Prologis expected volatility   32.0%  19.0%  23.0%
MSCI US REIT  Index expected volatility   29.0%  13.0%  17.0%
Aggregate fair value  $30,300   $28,800   $21,200
 
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to the POP  at December 31, 2021, was $ 60.8 million, prior to adjustments for capitalized
amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2030, with a weighted average
period of 3.2 years.
 
The performance criteria were met for the 2019 – 2021, 2018 – 2020, 2017 – 2019 and 2016 – 2018 performance periods at the end of
the initial three-year  performance period, which resulted in awards being earned in January 2022, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively , in
the form of the awards listed below . See below for details on these performance periods (dollars, shares and units in thousands, except
average price):
 
  2019 – 2021   2018 – 2020   2017 – 2019 (1)  2016 – 2018 (1) 
Performance pool  $ 100,000   $ 100,000   $ 119,753   $ 114,950  
Common stock shares   34   61   384   489 
Restricted stock units   134   242   -   - 
POP  LTIP Units and L TIP Units   426   701   804   1,082  
Average price used to determine number of awards  $ 168.37   $ 99.67   $ 100.79   $ 73.20
 
 
(1) These performance period amounts include awards earned subsequent to the initial three-year performance period. One-third of
the remaining compensation pool in excess of the $ 75 million aggregate initial award amounts can be earned at the end of each of
the three years  following the end of the initial three-year performance period if our performance meets or exceeds the MSCI US
REIT  Index at the end of each of such three years.
 
The tables below include POP  awards that were earned but are unvested while any vested awards are reflected within the Consolidated
Statements of Equity and Capital. The initial grant date fair value derived using a Monte Carlo valuation model was used in determining
the grant date fair value per unit in the award tables below .
84
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Other Equity-Based Compensation Plans and Programs
 
Awards may be issued in the form of RSUs or L TIP Units at the participants’  elections under the following equity-based compensation
plans and programs. RSUs and L TIP Units are valued based on the market price of the Parent’ s common stock on the date the award is
granted and the grant date value is charged to compensation expense over the service period. The service period is generally four
years , except for awards under the annual bonus exchange program. Dividends and distributions are paid with respect to both RSUs
and L TIP Units during the vesting period, and therefore they are considered participating securities. W e do not allocate undistributed
earnings to participating securities as our net earnings per share or unit would not be materially dif ferent. The value of the dividend is
charged to retained earnings for RSUs and the distribution is charged to Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests  in the OP
for LTIP Units in the Consolidated Financial Statements of the Parent.
 
Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”)
 
Under the PPP , we establish a compensation pool for certain employees up to 40% of the third-party portion of promotes earned by
Prologis from the co-investment ventures. The awards may be settled in some combination of cash and full value awards, at our
election.
 
Annual LTI Equity Award Program (“Annual LTI Award”)
 
The Annual L TI Award provides for grants to certain employees subject to our performance against benchmark indices that relate to the
most recent year ’s performance.
 
Annual Bonus Exchange Program
 
Under our bonus exchange program, generally all our employees may elect to receive all or a portion of their annual cash bonus in
equity . Equity awards granted through the bonus exchange are valued at a premium to the cash bonus exchanged and vest over three
years, excluding certain executive of ficers. As certain executive of ficers do not receive a bonus exchange premium for participating in
the bonus exchange program, the equity they receive upon exchange for their cash bonuses does not have a vesting period.
 
Summary of Award Activity
 
RSUs
 
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of common stock of the Parent.
 
The following table summarizes the activity for RSUs for the year ended December 31, 2021 (units in thousands):
 
  Unvested RSUs   Weighted Average Grant
Date Fair V alue  
Balance at January 1, 2021   986  $ 80.32  
Granted (1)   826   90.24  
Vested and distributed   (414)  78.82  
Forfeited   (161)  77.08  
Balance at December 31, 2021   1,237   $ 87.87
 
 
(1) Included in granted were unvested units based on the POP  performance criteria being met for the 2018 – 2020 performance
period and represented the earned award amounts subject to an additional vesting period. Unvested units are included in the
award discussion above. These amounts also include awards earned for prior performance periods related to the compensation
pool in excess of the initial award.
 
The fair value of stock awards granted and vested was $ 74.5 million and $ 32.6 million for 2021, respectively , and $ 45.8 million and
$36.0 million for 2020, respectively , based on the weighted average grant date fair value per unit.
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to RSUs outstanding, excluding POP , at December 31, 2021, was $ 63.3 million, prior to
adjustments for capitalized amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through
2025, with a weighted average period of 1.4 years.
 
LTIP Units
 
An LTIP Unit represents a partnership interest in the OP . After vesting and the satisfaction of certain conditions, an L TIP Unit may be
exchangeable for a common limited partnership unit in the OP  and then redeemable for a share of common stock or cash at our option.
85
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
The following table summarizes the activity for L TIP Units for the year ended December 31, 2021 (units in thousands):
 
  Unvested L TIP
Units   Weighted Average Grant
Date Fair V alue  
Balance at January 1, 2021   3,052   $ 66.50  
Granted (1)   1,337    64.77  
Forfeited   (51)  55.66  
Vested L TIP Units   (1,021 )  80.55  
Balance at December 31, 2021   3,317   $ 61.65
 
 
(1) Included in granted were unvested units based on the POP  performance criteria being met for the 2018 – 2020 performance
period and represented the earned award amounts subject to an additional vesting period. Unvested units are included in the
award discussion above. These amounts also include awards earned for prior performance periods related to the compensation
pool in excess of the initial award.
 
The fair value of unit awards granted and vested, excluding POP  awards, was $ 86.6 million and $ 82.2 million for 2021, respectively , and
$105.1  million and $ 69.3 million for 2020, respectively , based on the weighted average grant date fair value per unit.
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to L TIP Units, excluding POP , at December 31, 2021, was $ 121.2  million, prior to adjustments
for capitalized amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2025, with a
weighted average period of 1.3 years.
 
Other Plans
 
In 2020, the Prologis 401(k) Plan (the “401(k) Plan”) was amended to provide for a new matching employer contribution of $ 0.50 for
every dollar contributed by an employee, up to 12% of the employee’ s annual compensation (within the statutory compensation limit).
The matching employer contribution was previously up to 6% of the employee’ s annual compensation. In the 401(k) Plan, vesting in the
matching employer contributions is based on the employee’ s years of service, with 100% vesting at the completion of one year  of
service. Our contributions under the matching provisions were $ 5.8 million, $ 5.9 million and $ 3.0 million for the years ended December
31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
 
We have a non-qualified savings plan that allows highly compensated employees the opportunity to defer the receipt and income
taxation of a certain portion of their compensation in excess of the amount permitted under the 401(k) Plan. There has been no
employer matching within this plan in the three-year period ended December 31, 2021.
 
NOTE 13. INCOME TAXES
 
Components of Earnings Before Income Taxes
 
The following table summarizes the components of earnings before income taxes for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
Domestic  $2,208,168   $1,030,609   $981,188  
International   1,114,680    716,479    795,175  
Earnings before income taxes  $3,322,848   $1,747,088   $1,776,363
 
 
Summary of Current and Deferred Income Taxes
 
The following table summarizes the components of the provision for income taxes for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
Current income tax expense:             
U.S. federal  $ 58,906   $48,440   $ 3,232  
International   103,488    65,720    41,855  
State and local   10,542    15,554    17,209  
Total current income tax expense   172,936    129,714    62,296  
             
Deferred income tax expense (benefit):             
U.S. federal   2,895    (2,464 )  (208)
International   (1,573 )  3,208    12,429  
Total deferred income tax expense   1,322    744   12,221  
Total income tax expense  $174,258   $130,458   $74,517
 
86
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
 
Current Income Taxes
 
We recognize current income tax expense for the federal and state income taxes incurred by our TRSs  and taxes incurred in certain
states and foreign jurisdictions. Current income tax expense fluctuates from period to period based primarily on the timing of our taxable
income. Taxable income incurred over the last three years was principally due to the following: (i) the contribution of real estate
properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures and sales to third parties; (ii) recurring and transactional fees earned; and (iii)
taxable earnings from unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds, was $ 148.7  million, $ 100.7
million and $ 62.1 million, respectively .
 
Deferred Income Taxes
 
The deferred income tax expense recognized in 2021, 2020 and 2019 was primarily due to changes in temporary dif ferences and
utilization of NOLs.
 
The following table summarizes the deferred income tax assets and liabilities at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020  
Gross deferred income tax assets:         
NOL carryforwards  $272,713   $297,900  
Basis dif ference – real estate properties   99,984    59,259  
Basis dif ference – equity investments   8,462    - 
Section 163(j) interest limitation   1,599    1,486  
Capital loss carryforward   14,238    16,845  
Other – temporary dif ferences   10,027    4,122  
Total gross deferred income tax assets   407,023    379,612  
Valuation allowance   (337,587 )  (326,706 )
Gross deferred income tax assets, net of valuation allowance   69,436    52,906  
Gross deferred income tax liabilities:         
Basis dif ference – real estate properties   104,292    79,230  
Basis dif ference – equity investments   30,276    31,995  
Other – temporary dif ferences   949   999 
Total gross deferred income tax liabilities   135,517    112,224  
Net deferred income tax liabilities  $ 66,081   $ 59,318
 
 
At December 31, 2021, we had NOL  carryforwards as follows (in thousands):
 
 U.S.   Europe   Mexico   Japan   Other  
Gross NOL  carryforward $ 80,467   $ 656,532   $ 195,591   $ 89,531   $ 38,815  
Tax-ef fected NOL  carryforward  20,298    167,334    61,483    14,315    9,283  
Valuation allowance  17,168    161,178    61,483    13,842    9,283  
Net deferred tax asset – NOL  carryforward $ 3,130   $ 6,156   $ -  $ 473  $ - 
Expiration periods 2022 – 2041   2022 – indefinite   2022 – 2032   2022 – 2031   2022 – indefinite
 
 
The deferred tax asset valuation allowance at December 31, 2021, was adequate to reduce the total deferred tax asset to an amount
that we estimate will more likely than not be realized.
 
Liability for Uncertain Tax Positions
 
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we believe that we had complied with the REIT  requirements of the IRC.
The statute of limitations for our tax returns is generally three years. As such, our tax returns that remain subject to examination would
be primarily from 2018 and thereafter . Liabilities or any related settlements for uncertain tax positions for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019 were not material to our Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
87
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
NOTE 14. EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE OR UNIT
 
We determine basic earnings per share or unit based on the weighted average number of shares of common stock or units outstanding
during the period. W e compute diluted earnings per share or unit based on the weighted average number of shares or units outstanding
combined with the incremental weighted average ef fect from all outstanding potentially dilutive instruments.
 
The computation of our basic and diluted earnings per share and unit for the years ended December 31 was as follows (in thousands,
except per share and unit amounts):
 
Prologis, Inc.  2021   2020   2019  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders – Basic  $2,933,571   $1,473,122   $1,566,950  
Net earnings attributable to exchangeable limited partnership units (1)   82,092    41,938    46,986  
Adjusted net earnings attributable to common stockholders – Diluted  $3,015,663   $1,515,060   $1,613,936  
             
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Basic   739,363    728,323    630,580  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of limited partnership units (1)   20,913    20,877    19,154  
Incremental weighted average ef fect of equity awards   4,486    5,214    5,169  
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Diluted (2)   764,762    754,414    654,903  
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders:             
Basic  $ 3.97  $ 2.02  $ 2.48 
Diluted  $ 3.94  $ 2.01  $ 2.46
 
 
Prologis, L.P .  2021   2020   2019  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $3,015,363   $1,514,743   $1,613,615  
Net earnings attributable to Class A Units   (31,758 )  (16,262 )  (20,454 )
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders – Basic   2,983,605    1,498,481    1,593,161  
Net earnings attributable to Class A Units   31,758    16,262    20,454  
Net earnings attributable to exchangeable other limited partnership units   300   317   321 
Adjusted net earnings attributable to common unitholders – Diluted  $3,015,663   $1,515,060   $1,613,936  
             
Weighted average common partnership units outstanding – Basic   751,973    740,860    641,128  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of Class A Units   8,004    8,041    8,231  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of other limited partnership units   299   299   375 
Incremental weighted average ef fect of equity awards of Prologis, Inc.   4,486    5,214    5,169  
Weighted average common units outstanding – Diluted  (2)   764,762    754,414    654,903  
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders:             
Basic  $ 3.97  $ 2.02  $ 2.48 
Diluted  $ 3.94  $ 2.01  $ 2.46
 
 
(1) Earnings allocated to the exchangeable OP  units not held by the Parent have been included in the numerator and exchangeable
common units have been included in the denominator for the purpose of computing diluted earnings per share for all periods as
the per share and unit amount is the same .
 
(2) Our total weighted average potentially dilutive shares and units outstanding for the years ended December 31 consisted of the
following:
 
  2021   2020   2019  
 Class A Units  8,004    8,041    8,231  
 Other limited partnership units  299   299   375 
 Equity awards  6,719    7,798    7,933  
 Prologis, L.P .  15,022    16,138    16,539  
 Common limited partnership units  12,610    12,537    10,548  
 Prologis, Inc.  27,632    28,675    27,087
 
 
88
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
NOTE 15. FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS AND FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
 
Derivative Financial Instruments
 
In the normal course of business, our operations are exposed to market risks, including the ef fect of changes in foreign currency
exchange rates and interest rates. W e may enter into derivative financial instruments to of fset these underlying market risks. See Note 2
for our derivative financial instruments policy .
 
The following table presents the fair value of our derivative financial instruments recognized within Other Assets and Other Liabilities on
the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020  
  Asset   Liability   Asset   Liability  
Undesignated derivatives                 
Foreign currency contracts                 
     Forwards                 
          Brazilian real  $ 664  $ -  $ 620  $ 66 
          British pound sterling   5,361    3,492    174   7,589  
          Canadian dollar   2,856    1,790    80   5,827  
          Chinese renminbi   -   550   -   717 
          Euro   40,484    136   73   6,247  
          Japanese yen   23,341    -   720   1,604  
          Swedish krona   3,773    201   -   2,355  
                 
Designated derivatives                 
Foreign currency contracts                 
     Net investment hedges                 
          British pound sterling   9,158    2,683    -   2,081  
          Canadian dollar   5,410    823   -   9,847  
                 
Interest rate swaps                 
     Cash flow hedges                 
          Euro   -   -   -   9 
          U.S. dollar   -   -   -   140 
Total fair value of derivatives  $ 91,047   $ 9,675   $ 1,667   $ 36,482
 
 
Undesignated Derivative Financial Instruments
 
Foreign Currency Contracts
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our undesignated foreign currency contracts for the years ended December 31 (in
millions, except for weighted average forward rates and number of active contracts):
 
 2021  2020  2019
 CADEURGBPJPYSEKOtherTotal CADEURGBP JPY SEKOtherTotal CADEURGBP JPY SEKOtherTotal
Notional amounts at
     January 1 ($) 163 474207 252 38 281,162 120 581 178 182 31 15 1,107 55314 118 177 - 5 669
New contracts ($) 225 437308 76 64 271,137 881,314 364 154 37 48 2,005 2016191,111 85 315242,571
Matured, expired or
     settled contracts ($)(213)(162)(132)(78)(17)(35)(637) (45)(1,421)(335) (84)(30)(35)(1,950) (136)(352)(1,051) (80) -(514)(2,133)
Notional amounts at
     December 31 ($) 175 749383 250 85 201,662 163 474 207 252 38 28 1,162 120581 178 182 31 151,107
                        
Weighted average
     forward rate
     at December 31 1.26 1.221.20103.149.28   1.321.23 1.32102.668.64   1.321.131.32103.399.42  
Active contracts at
     December 31 72 86 70 74 72   58 64 53 59 42   40 53 50 44 20 
 
89
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
 
The following table summarizes the undesignated derivative financial instruments exercised and associated realized and unrealized
gains (losses) in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net in the Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended
December 31 (in millions, except for number of exercised contracts):
             
  2021   2020   2019  
Exercised contracts   161   173   115 
Realized gains (losses) on the matured, expired or settled contracts  $ (8) $ (6) $ 28 
Unrealized gains (losses) on the change in fair value of outstanding contracts  $ 88  $ (13) $ (10)
 
Designated Derivative Financial Instruments
 
Changes in the fair value of derivatives that are designated as net investment hedges of our foreign operations and cash flow hedges
are recorded in Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) (“AOCI/L”)  and reflected within the Other Comprehensive Income
(Loss) table below .
 
Foreign Currency Contracts
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our foreign currency contracts designated as net investment hedges for the years ended
December 31 (in millions, except for weighted average forward rates and number of active contracts):
 2021   2020   2019  
 CAD GBP Total  CAD GBP Total  BRL CAD EUR GBP Total 
Notional amounts at January 1 ($)  377  135  512   97  387  484   460  100  -  127  687 
New contracts ($)  535  432  967   377  459  836   489  97  420  649  1,655 
Matured, expired or settled contracts ($)  (377) (135) (512)  (97) (711) (808)  (949) (100) (420) (389) (1,858)
Notional amounts at December 31 ($)  535  432  967   377  135  512   -  97  -  387  484 
                                    
Weighted average forward rate
     at December 31  1.25  1.37      1.31  1.35      -  1.32  -  1.29    
Active contracts at December 31  6  4      6  1      -  2  -  5   
 
 
Interest Rate Swaps
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our interest rate swaps designated as cash flow hedges for the years ended December 31
(in millions):
 
 2021   2020   2019  
 EUR  USD (1) Total  EUR USD Total  EUR Total 
Notional amounts at January 1 ($)  165  250  415   -  -  -   500  500 
New contracts ($)  -  -  -   165  1,500  1,665   -  - 
Matured, expired or settled contracts ($)  -  (250) (250)  -  (1,250) (1,250)  (500) (500)
Notional amounts at December 31 ($)  165  -  165   165  250  415   -  -
 
 
(1) In April 2021, the 2017 Term Loan was terminated and the interest rate swap contracts associated with the outstanding balance
were settled.
 
Designated Nonderivative Financial Instruments
 
The following table summarizes our debt and accrued interest, designated as a hedge of our net investment in international subsidiaries
at December 31 (in millions):
 
   2021    2020    2019  
British pound sterling  $ 624  $ 842  $ 329 
Euro  $ -  $ -  $ 850
 
 
The following table summarizes the unrealized gains (losses) in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net on the
remeasurement of the unhedged portion of our debt and accrued interest, including euro and British pound sterling denominated debt,
for the years ended December 31 (in millions):
             
  2021   2020   2019  
Unrealized gains (losses) on the unhedged portion  $ 81  $ (139) $ (64)
 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
90
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
The change in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income during the periods
presented was due to the translation into U.S. dollars from the consolidation of the financial statements of our consolidated subsidiaries
whose functional currency is not the U.S. dollar . The change in fair value of the ef fective portion of our derivative financial instruments
that have been designated as net investment hedges and cash flow hedges and the translation of the hedged portion of our debt, as
discussed above, are also included in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss).
 
The following table presents these changes in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020   2019  
Derivative net investment hedges  $ 9,792   $ (4,301 ) $ (22,600 )
Debt designated as nonderivative net investment hedges   (832)  (62,263 )  141,675  
Cumulative translation adjustment   296,969    (128,109 )  (20,593 )
Total foreign currency translation gains (losses), net  $ 305,929   $ (194,673 ) $ 98,482  
             
Cash flow hedges  (1)(2)  $ 9,098   $ (11,269 ) $ 4,665  
Our share of derivatives from unconsolidated co-investment ventures   8,444    (2,848 )  (6,000 )
Total unrealized gains (losses) on derivative contracts, net  $ 17,542   $ (14,117 ) $ (1,335 )
Total change in other comprehensive income (loss)  $ 323,471   $ (208,790 ) $ 97,147
 
 
(1) We estimate an additional expense of $ 2.2 million will be reclassified to Interest Expense over the next 12 months from December
31, 2021, due to the amortization of previously settled derivatives designated as cash flow hedges.
 
(2) Included in the year ended December 31, 2020, was $ 16.8 million in losses associated with the termination of four U.S. dollar
treasury lock contracts with an aggregate notional amount of $ 750.0  million that fixed the interest rate on the forecasted issuance
of U.S. dollar senior notes, which were then issued in February 2020.
 
Fair Value Measurements
 
We have estimated the fair value of our financial instruments using available market information and valuation methodologies we believe
to be appropriate for these purposes. Considerable judgment and a high degree of subjectivity are involved in developing these
estimates and, accordingly , they are not necessarily indicative of amounts that we would realize on disposition. See Note 2 for more
information on our fair value measurements policy .
 
Fair Value Measurements on a Recurring Basis
 
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, other than the derivatives discussed previously , we had no significant financial assets or financial
liabilities that were measured at fair value on a recurring basis in the Consolidated Financial Statements. All of our derivatives held at
December 31, 2021 and 2020 were classified as Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy .
 
Fair Value Measurements on Nonrecurring Basis
 
Acquired properties and assets we expect to sell or contribute are significant nonfinancial assets that met the criteria to be measured at
fair value on a nonrecurring basis, as detailed in our accounting policy in Note 2. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we estimated the fair
value of our properties using Level 2 or Level 3 inputs from the fair value hierarchy . See more information on our acquired properties in
Notes 3 and 4 and assets held for sale or contribution in Note 6.
 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
 
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the carrying amounts of certain financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts
and notes receivable, accounts payable and accrued expenses were representative of their fair values.
 
The dif ferences in the fair value of our debt from the carrying value in the table below were the result of dif ferences in interest rates or
borrowing spreads that were available to us at December 31, 2021 and 2020, as compared with those in ef fect when the debt was
issued or assumed, including reduced borrowing spreads due to our improved credit ratings. The fair value of the senior notes
decreased in 2021 due to the increase in bond yields in the market as compared to the weighted average interest rates on our senior
notes. The senior notes and many of the issuances of secured mortgage debt contain prepayment penalties or yield maintenance
provisions that could make the cost of refinancing the debt at lower rates exceed the benefit that would be derived from doing so. W e
evaluate this on an on-going basis and have taken the opportunity to refinance some of our debt at lower rates and longer maturities as
discussed in Note 8.
 
91
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
The following table reflects the carrying amounts and estimated fair values of our debt at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2021   2020  
  Carrying V alue   Fair V alue   Carrying V alue   Fair V alue  
Credit Facilities  $ 491,393   $ 491,429   $ 171,794   $ 171,794  
Senior notes   14,981,690    15,151,781    14,275,870    15,452,381  
Term loans and unsecured other   1,825,195    1,835,569    1,764,311    1,785,706  
Secured mortgage   416,776    437,215    637,101    673,549  
Total  $ 17,715,054   $ 17,915,994   $ 16,849,076   $ 18,083,430
 
 
NOTE 16. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
 
Environmental Matters
 
A majority of the properties we acquire, including land, are subjected to environmental reviews either by us or the previous owners. In
addition, we may incur environmental remediation costs associated with certain land parcels we acquire in connection with the
development of the land. W e have acquired certain properties that may have been leased to or previously owned by companies that
discharged hazardous materials. W e establish a liability at the time of acquisition to cover such costs and adjust the liabilities as
appropriate when additional information becomes available. W e record our environmental liabilities in Other Liabilities . We purchase
various environmental insurance policies to mitigate our exposure to environmental liabilities. W e are not aware of any environmental
liabilities that would have a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
 
Indemnification Agreements
 
We have entered into agreements whereby we indemnify certain co-investment ventures, or our venture partners, outside of the U.S. for
taxes that may be assessed with respect to certain properties we contributed to these ventures. Our contributions to these ventures are
generally structured as contributions of shares of companies that own the real estate assets. Accordingly , the capital gains associated
with the step up in the value of the underlying real estate assets, for tax purposes, are deferred and transferred at contribution. W e have
generally indemnified these ventures to the extent that the ventures incur capital gains or withholding tax as a result of a direct sale. The
agreements limit the amount that is subject to our indemnification with respect to each property to 100% of the actual tax liabilities
related to the capital gains that are deferred and transferred by us to the ventures at the time of the initial contribution less any deferred
tax assets transferred with the property .
 
The outcome under these agreements is uncertain as it depends on the method and timing of dissolution of the related venture or
disposition of any properties by the venture. W e record liabilities related to the indemnification agreements in Other Liabilities . We
continue to monitor these agreements and the likelihood of the sale of assets that would result in recognition and will adjust the potential
liability in the future as facts and circumstances dictate.
 
Off-Balance Sheet Liabilities
 
We have issued performance and surety bonds and standby letters of credit in connection with certain development projects.
Performance and surety bonds are commonly required by public agencies from real estate developers. Performance and surety bonds
are renewable and expire on the completion of the improvements and infrastructure. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had $ 394.6
million and $ 275.2  million, respectively , outstanding under such arrangements.
 
We may be required under capital commitments or we may choose to make additional capital contributions to certain of our
unconsolidated entities, representing our proportionate ownership interest, should additional capital contributions be necessary to fund
development or acquisition costs, repayment of debt or operational shortfalls. See Note 5 for further discussion related to equity
commitments to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Litigation
 
From time to time, we are party to a variety of legal proceedings arising in the ordinary course of business. W e believe that, with respect
to any such matters that we are currently a party to, the ultimate disposition of any such matter will not have material adverse ef fect on
our business, financial position or results of operations.
 
92
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
NOTE 17. BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
Our current business strategy includes two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital. W e generate revenues,
earnings, net operating income and cash flows through our segments, as follows:
 
• Real Estate Operations.  This operating segment represents the ownership and development of operating properties and is the
largest component of our revenue and earnings. W e collect rent from our customers through operating leases, including
reimbursements for the majority of our property operating costs. Each operating property is considered to be an individual
operating segment with similar economic characteristics; these properties are combined within the reportable business segment
based on geographic location. Our Real Estate Operations segment also includes development activities that lead to rental
operations, including land held for development and properties currently under development,  and other real estate investments.
Within this line of business, we utilize the following: (i) our land bank; (ii) the development expertise of our local teams; and (iii) our
customer relationships. Land we own and lease to customers under land leases, along with land and buildings we lease, is also
included in this segment.
 
• Strategic Capital.  This operating segment represents the management of unconsolidated co-investment ventures. W e generate
strategic capital revenues primarily from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures through asset management and property
management services and we earn additional revenues by providing leasing, acquisition, construction, development, financing and
disposition services. Depending on the structure of the venture and the returns provided to our partners, we also earn revenues
through promotes periodically during the life of a venture or upon liquidation. Each unconsolidated co-investment venture we
manage is considered to be an individual operating segment with similar economic characteristics; these ventures are combined
within the reportable business segment based on geographic location.
 
Reconciliations are presented below for: (i) each reportable business segment’ s revenues from external customers to Total Revenues ;
(ii) each reportable business segment’ s net operating income from external customers to Operating Income and Earnings Before Income
Taxes ; and (iii) each reportable business segment’ s assets to Total Assets . Our chief operating decision makers rely primarily on net
operating income and similar measures to make decisions about allocating resources and assessing segment performance. The
applicable components of Total Revenues, Operating Income, Earnings Before Income T axes  and Total Assets  are allocated to each
reportable business segment’ s revenues, net operating income and assets. Items that are not directly assignable to a segment, such as
certain corporate income and expenses, are not allocated but reflected as reconciling items.
 
93
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
The following reconciliations are presented in thousands:
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
   2021    2020    2019  
Revenues:             
Real estate operations segment:             
U.S.  $3,967,180   $3,600,335   $2,645,194  
Other Americas   98,620    87,830    94,984  
Europe   55,533    68,801    44,356  
Asia   47,357    44,782    54,201  
Total real estate operations segment   4,168,690    3,801,748    2,838,735  
Strategic capital segment:             
U.S.   171,761    354,825    86,271  
Other Americas   58,655    37,696    40,347  
Europe   249,600    145,016    283,909  
Asia   110,734    99,450    81,359  
Total strategic capital segment   590,750    636,987    491,886  
             
Total revenues   4,759,440    4,438,735    3,330,621  
             
Segment net operating income:             
Real estate operations segment:             
U.S. (1)   2,966,498    2,679,685    1,953,727  
Other Americas   72,424    64,473    69,393  
Europe   31,163    43,531    27,525  
Asia   34,854    31,986    40,675  
Total real estate operations segment   3,104,939    2,819,675    2,091,320  
Strategic capital segment:             
U.S. (1)   59,991    237,271    (10,945 )
Other Americas   47,247    24,923    27,369  
Europe   203,779    99,504    246,213  
Asia   72,562    57,248    44,588  
Total strategic capital segment   383,579    418,946    307,225  
             
Total segment net operating income   3,488,518    3,238,621    2,398,545  
             
Reconciling items:             
General and administrative expenses   (293,167 )  (274,845 )  (266,718 )
Depreciation and amortization expenses   (1,577,942 )  (1,561,969 )  (1,139,879 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   817,017    464,942    467,577  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   772,570    252,195    390,241  
Operating income   3,206,996    2,118,944    1,849,766  
             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   404,255    297,370    200,178  
Interest expense   (266,228 )  (314,507 )  (239,953 )
Interest and other income, net   871   1,044    24,213  
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   164,407    (167,473 )  (41,715 )
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   (187,453 )  (188,290 )  (16,126 )
Earnings before income taxes  $3,322,848   $1,747,088   $1,776,363
 
 
94
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
  December 31,  
   2021    2020  
Segment assets:         
Real estate operations segment:         
U.S.  $44,136,140   $42,559,023  
Other Americas   1,148,371    1,145,699  
Europe   1,837,800    1,604,393  
Asia   965,854    1,081,876  
Total real estate operations segment   48,088,165    46,390,991  
Strategic capital segment (2):         
U.S.   11,984    13,257  
Europe   25,280    25,280  
Asia   299   354 
Total strategic capital segment   37,563    38,891  
Total segment assets   48,125,728    46,429,882  
         
Reconciling items:         
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   8,610,958    7,602,014  
Assets held for sale or contribution   669,688    1,070,724  
Cash and cash equivalents   556,117    598,086  
Other assets   523,729    364,299  
Total reconciling items   10,360,492    9,635,123  
Total assets  $58,486,220   $56,065,005
 
 
(1) This includes compensation and personnel costs for employees who were located in the U.S. but also support other geographies.
 
(2) Represents management contracts and goodwill recorded in connection with business combinations associated with the Strategic
Capital segment. Goodwill was $25.3 million at December 31, 2021 and 2020 .
 
NOTE 18. SUPPLEMENTAL CASH FLOW INFORMATION
 
Our significant noncash investing and financing activities for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 included the following:
 
• We recognized lease right-of-use assets and lease liabilities related to leases in which we are the lessee within Other Assets  and
Other Liabilities  on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, including  new leases, renewals and modifications of $ 71.4 million in 2021
and $ 47.8 million in 2020 for both assets and liabilities. W e adopted the new lease standard on January 1, 2019 and recognized
lease right-of-use assets of $ 523.8  million and lease liabilities of $ 527.3  million in 2019.
• We capitalized $ 25.6 million, $ 22.4 million and $ 21.4 million in 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively , of equity-based compensation
expense.
• We received $ 886.1  million, $ 433.7  million and $ 646.8  million of ownership interests in certain unconsolidated co-investment
ventures as a portion of our proceeds from the contribution of properties to these entities during 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively , as disclosed in Note 5.  Included in 2019 was our initial 20.0% investment in PBL V in exchange for our contribution of
the initial portfolio of properties to PBL V upon formation.  Included in 2020 and 2019 was the equity interests we received in
PCCLF for the contribution of real estate properties from Prologis China Logistics V enture II, LP  and Prologis China Logistics
Venture I, LP .
• We issued 0.8 million, 0.7 million and 1.2 million shares in 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively , of the Parent’ s common stock upon
redemption of an equal number of common limited partnership units in the OP .
• We issued 1.0 million common limited partnership units for $ 130.4  million to our partner and assumed debt of $ 215.3  million in our
acquisition of additional ownership interest in and subsequent consolidation of two unconsolidated other ventures in 2021. W e
issued 0.5 million common limited partnership units for $ 48.5 million as partial consideration for the acquisition of properties in
2020. See Note 10 for more information.
• We received a distribution of proceeds from UKL V for the sale of real estate properties that we subsequently reinvested in PELF
and PELP  of $153.0  million in 2021.
• We reinvested distributions from unconsolidated co-investment ventures of $ 45.6 million and $ 80.9 million and increased our
ownership in 2020 and 2019, respectively .
95
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
• We completed the Liberty Transaction on February 4, 2020 for $ 13.0 billion through the issuance of equity and the assumption of
debt. See Note 3 for more information on this transaction. Additionally , USL V assumed $ 341.8  million debt as part of the IPT
Transaction.
• As partial consideration for the disposition of a portfolio of properties during 2020, the buyer assumed debt of $ 169.8  million.
 
96
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
NOTE 19. SELECTED QUARTERLY FINANCIAL DATA (UNAUDITED)
 
The following table details our selected quarterly financial data (in thousands, except per share and unit data):
 
  Three Months Ended  
Prologis, Inc.  March 31,   June 30,   September 30,   December 31,  
2021:                 
Rental revenues  $1,021,656   $1,014,763   $ 1,037,281   $ 1,074,294  
Total revenues  $1,148,316   $1,150,842   $ 1,183,049   $ 1,277,233  
Rental expenses  $(277,884 ) $(245,133 ) $ (256,607 ) $ (261,692 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $173,643   $187,361   $ 139,406   $ 316,607  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 16,623   $127,167   $ 214,390   $ 414,390  
Operating income  $532,197   $700,866   $ 765,660   $ 1,208,273  
Consolidated net earnings  $399,693   $650,313   $ 797,731   $ 1,300,853  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $365,815   $598,625   $ 722,007   $ 1,247,124  
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Basic (1)  $ 0.50  $ 0.81  $ 0.98  $ 1.68 
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Diluted (1)(2)  $ 0.49  $ 0.81  $ 0.97  $ 1.67 
2020:                 
Rental revenues  $878,807   $944,366   $ 980,148   $ 987,810  
Total revenues  $978,241   $1,266,124   $ 1,082,773   $ 1,111,597  
Rental expenses  $(227,618 ) $(232,109 ) $ (245,490 ) $ (246,846 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $162,750   $ 86,416   $ 134,207   $ 81,569  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 31,491   $ 43,939   $ 108,927   $ 67,838  
Operating income  $468,057   $611,987   $ 556,520   $ 482,380  
Consolidated net earnings  $521,164   $454,938   $ 332,521   $ 308,007  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $489,418   $404,539   $ 298,695   $ 280,470  
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Basic  (1)  $ 0.70  $ 0.55  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Diluted  (1)(2)  $ 0.70  $ 0.54  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
                 
Prologis, L.P .                 
2021:                 
Rental revenues  $1,021,656   $1,014,763   $ 1,037,281   $ 1,074,294  
Total revenues  $1,148,316   $1,150,842   $ 1,183,049   $ 1,277,233  
Rental expenses  $(277,884 ) $(245,133 ) $ (256,607 ) $ (261,692 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $173,643   $187,361   $ 139,406   $ 316,607  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 16,623   $127,167   $ 214,390   $ 414,390  
Operating income  $532,197   $700,866   $ 765,660   $ 1,208,273  
Consolidated net earnings  $399,693   $650,313   $ 797,731   $ 1,300,853  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $376,083   $615,478   $ 741,794   $ 1,282,008  
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Basic (1)  $ 0.50  $ 0.81  $ 0.98  $ 1.68 
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Diluted (1)  $ 0.49  $ 0.81  $ 0.97  $ 1.67 
2020:                 
Rental revenues  $878,807   $944,366   $ 980,148   $ 987,810  
Total revenues  $978,241   $1,266,124   $ 1,082,773   $ 1,111,597  
Rental expenses  $(227,618 ) $(232,109 ) $ (245,490 ) $ (246,846 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $162,750   $ 86,416   $ 134,207   $ 81,569  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 31,491   $ 43,939   $ 108,927   $ 67,838  
Operating income  $468,057   $611,987   $ 556,520   $ 482,380  
Consolidated net earnings  $521,164   $454,938   $ 332,521   $ 308,007  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $503,388   $416,189   $ 307,069   $ 288,097  
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Basic  (1)  $ 0.70  $ 0.55  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Diluted  (1)  $ 0.70  $ 0.54  $ 0.40  $ 0.38
 
 
97
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
(1) Quarterly earnings per common share or unit amounts may not total to the annual amounts due to rounding and the changes in
the number of weighted average common shares or units outstanding included in the calculation of basic and diluted shares or
units.
 
(2) Income allocated to the exchangeable OP  units not held by the Parent has been included in the numerator and exchangeable OP
units have been included in the denominator for the purpose of computing diluted earnings per share for all periods since the per
share and unit is the same.
 
98
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
SCHEDULE III – REAL  EST ATE AND ACCUMULA TED DEPRECIA TION
DECEMBER 31, 2021
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, as applicable)
 
       Initial Cost to
Prologis   Costs
Capitalized  Gross Amounts at Which Carried
at December 31, 2021        
DescriptionNo. of
Bldgs.  Encum-
brances Land   Building &
Improvements  Subsequent
to
Acquisition  Land   Building &
Improvements  Total
(a,b)   Accumulated
Depreciation
(c)   Date of
Construction/
Acquisition
Operating Properties (d)                                    
                                    
U.S. Markets                                    
Atlanta  117  (d)  264,973   1,016,540   347,824   285,290   1,344,047   1,629,337   (300,774) 1994-2021
Austin  10     12,783   52,335   9,567   12,837   61,848   74,685   (27,202) 1994-2015
Baltimore/Washington D.C. 75  (d)  300,564   722,249   196,973   312,915   906,871   1,219,786   (161,553) 1995-2020
Central PA  32     240,657   943,307   124,148   253,737   1,054,375   1,308,112   (197,801) 2002-2020
Central Valley  34  (d)  163,294   386,853   776,157   181,008   1,145,296   1,326,304   (221,738) 1999-2020
Charlotte  44  (d)  104,747   333,992   93,011   118,553   413,197   531,750   (67,326) 1994-2020
Chicago  193  (d)  715,951   2,073,268   495,652   741,301   2,543,570   3,284,871   (672,820) 1995-2020
Cincinnati  38  (d)  59,573   294,976   99,029   67,783   385,795   453,578   (73,309) 1996-2020
Columbus  26  (d)  31,733   161,881   62,815   34,683   221,746   256,429   (93,376) 1996-2020
Dallas/Ft. Worth  167  (d)  355,277   1,472,061   453,509   377,989   1,902,858   2,280,847   (457,367) 1994-2020
Denver  37     106,088   295,412   153,217   104,495   450,222   554,717   (137,632) 1993-2020
Houston  180  (d)  368,780   1,873,268   276,456   411,046   2,107,458   2,518,504   (296,712) 1993-2020
Indianapolis  21     19,337   135,609   58,710   20,575   193,081   213,656   (63,341) 1995-2020
Jacksonville  1     -   2,892   273   -   3,165   3,165   (2,758) 2011
Las Vegas  56     139,227   345,348   179,899   132,895   531,579   664,474   (107,515) 1996-2021
Lehigh Valley  56     886,276   1,902,902   317,508   958,783   2,147,903   3,106,686   (192,292) 2004-2021
Louisville  11     41,944   188,696   60,895   44,196   247,339   291,535   (71,601) 2005-2020
Nashville  22     66,590   236,777   125,256   68,809   359,814   428,623   (62,723) 1995-2021
New Jersey/New York City 131  (d)  1,498,825   1,869,356   618,259   1,506,727   2,479,713   3,986,440   (675,959) 1996-2021
Orlando  84  (d)  191,754   699,537   131,196   206,702   815,785   1,022,487   (123,996) 1994-2021
Phoenix  49     146,888   394,219   305,641   175,268   671,480   846,748   (95,664) 1992-2021
Portland  39  (e)  111,263   276,956   147,090   156,345   378,964   535,309   (58,904) 2006-2021
Reno  17  (d)  25,389   142,279   111,695   26,761   252,602   279,363   (85,685) 1994-2021
San Antonio  20  (d)  25,735   95,828   45,308   25,958   140,913   166,871   (63,820) 1994-2016
San Francisco Bay Area  229  (d)  1,009,632   1,612,507   494,115   1,020,132   2,096,122   3,116,254   (777,530) 1993-2021
Seattle  99     643,665   1,107,085   315,415   664,887   1,401,278   2,066,165   (252,838) 2008-2021
South Florida  107  (d)  500,373   889,481   224,399   506,262   1,107,991   1,614,253   (275,170) 1994-2021
Southern California  351  (d)(e)  3,270,727   4,753,548   1,381,334   3,542,081   5,863,528   9,405,609   (1,581,543) 2005-2021
Tampa  12     22,028   69,520   12,429   28,143   75,834   103,977   (5,694) 2020
Subtotal U.S. Markets:  2,258     11,324,073   24,348,682   7,617,780   11,986,161   31,304,374   43,290,535   (7,204,643)  
                                    
Other Americas Markets                                    
Canada  32  (d)  223,831   389,604   219,429   232,036   600,828   832,864   (150,693) 2008-2021
Mexico  1     730   2,287   3,249   1,708   4,558   6,266   (1,823) 2011
Subtotal Other Americas
Markets:  33     224,561   391,891   222,678   233,744   605,386   839,130   (152,516)  
                                    
Europe Markets                                    
France  2     2,831   4,844   192   2,832   5,035   7,867   (418) 2019
Germany  1     7,737   5,032   601   7,737   5,633   13,370   (3,992) 2011
Poland  1     588   -   6,804   648   6,744   7,392   -  2021
Slovakia  2     2,743   -   13,844   -   16,587   16,587   -  2021
Spain  6     17,496   36,639   22,543   15,626   61,052   76,678   (17,856) 2011-2019
United Kingdom  1     47,208   3,689   -   47,341   3,556   50,897   (2,605) 2019
Subtotal Europe Markets: 13     78,603   50,204   43,984   74,184   98,607   172,791   (24,871)  
                                    
Asia Markets                                    
Japan  1     -   -   10,198   157   10,041   10,198   (1,547) 2019
Singapore  5     -   136,744   4,362   -   141,106   141,106   (67,805) 2011
Subtotal Asia Markets:  6     -   136,744   14,560   157   151,147   151,304   (69,352)  
Total Operating Properties  2,310     11,627,237   24,927,521   7,899,002   12,294,246   32,159,514   44,453,760   (7,451,382) 
 
 
99
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
SCHEDULE III – REAL  EST ATE AND ACCUMULA TED DEPRECIA TION
DECEMBER 31, 2021
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, as applicable)
 
       Initial Cost to
Prologis   Costs
Capitalized  Gross Amounts at Which Carried
at December 31, 2021       Date of
DescriptionNo. of
Bldgs.  Encum-
brances Land   Building &
Improvements  Subsequent
to
Acquisition  Land   Building &
Improvements  Total
(a,b)   Accumulated
Depreciation
(c)   Construction/
Acquisition
(f)
Development Portfolio                                    
                                    
U.S. Markets                                    
Atlanta  3     31,458   -   75,873   31,458   75,873   107,331       
Baltimore/Washington D.C. 1     3,621   -   7,135   3,621   7,135   10,756       
Central Valley  3     60,124   -   139,469   60,124   139,469   199,593      2021
Charlotte  1     6,667   -   8,079   6,667   8,079   14,746       
Chicago  6     101,797   -   55,358   101,797   55,358   157,155      2021
Cincinnati  1     1,155   -   10,430   1,155   10,430   11,585      2021
Dallas/Ft. Worth  6     27,481   -   28,128   27,481   28,128   55,609       
Denver  1     9,892   -   6,133   9,892   6,133   16,025       
Houston  1     14,059   -   56,429   14,059   56,429   70,488       
Las Vegas  1     12,502   -   3,896   12,502   3,896   16,398       
Lehigh Valley  1     31,694   -   38,657   31,694   38,657   70,351       
Louisville  1     6,195   -   25,092   6,195   25,092   31,287       
Nashville  3     6,829   -   43,440   6,829   43,440   50,269      2021
New Jersey/New York City  2     68,476   -   25,922   68,476   25,922   94,398       
Orlando  3     22,494   -   26,036   22,494   26,036   48,530      2021
Phoenix  1     2,067   -   12,283   2,067   12,283   14,350       
Portland  1     9,989   -   13,121   9,989   13,121   23,110       
Reno  1     4,461   -   7,779   4,461   7,779   12,240       
San Francisco Bay Area  2     13,566   -   3,083   13,566   3,083   16,649       
Seattle  2     28,392   -   18,543   28,392   18,543   46,935      2021
South Florida  5     55,768   -   50,450   55,768   50,450   106,218      2021
Southern California  6     124,327   -   72,831   124,327   72,831   197,158       
Subtotal U.S. Markets:  52     643,014   -   728,167   643,014   728,167   1,371,181       
                                    
Other Americas Markets                                    
Canada 2     19,030   -   17,143   19,030   17,143   36,173       
Mexico 5     24,106   -   29,951   24,106   29,951   54,057      2021
Subtotal Other Americas
Markets:  7     43,136   -   47,094   43,136   47,094   90,230       
                                    
Europe Markets                                    
Czech Republic 3     11,762   -   10,894   11,762   10,894   22,656       
France 1     2,988   -   3,156   2,988   3,156   6,144       
Germany 3     23,389   -   32,405   23,389   32,405   55,794       
Hungary 2     4,389   -   5,993   4,389   5,993   10,382       
Italy 5     14,830   -   23,948   14,830   23,948   38,778       
Netherlands 4     23,989   -   67,407   23,989   67,407   91,396      2021
Poland 1     1,985   -   7,149   1,985   7,149   9,134       
Sweden 1     1,857   -   229   1,857   229   2,086       
U.K. 12     240,561   -   74,203   240,561   74,203   314,764      2021
Subtotal Europe Markets:  32     325,750   -   225,384   325,750   225,384   551,134       
                                    
Asia Markets                                    
Japan  8     179,710   -   537,085   179,710   537,085   716,795      2021
Subtotal Asia Markets:  8     179,710   -   537,085   179,710   537,085   716,795       
Total Development Portfolio  99     1,191,610   -   1,537,730   1,191,610   1,537,730   2,729,340       
                                    
GRAND TOTAL  2,409     12,818,847   24,927,521   9,436,732   13,485,856   33,697,244   47,183,100   (7,451,382) 
 
 
Schedule III – Footnotes
 
(a) The following table reconciles real estate assets per Schedule III to the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data at December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
 
 Total operating properties and development portfolio per Schedule III  $ 47,183,100  (g)
 Land   2,519,590   
 Other real estate investments (i)   3,302,500   
 Total per Consolidated Balance Sheets  $ 53,005,190   
 
 (i)Other real estate investments includes n on-strategic real estate assets acquired that we do not intend to operate long-term at
December 31, 2021.
 
100
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
(b) The aggregate cost for federal tax purposes at December 31, 2021, of our real estate assets was approximately $ 40 billion
(unaudited).
 
(c) Real estate assets (excluding land balances) are depreciated over their estimated useful lives. These useful lives are generally 5
to 7 years  for capital improvements, 10 years for standard tenant improvements, 15 to 25 years  for depreciable land
improvements, 25 to 35 years for operating properties acquired based on the age of the building and 40 years for operating
properties we develop.
 
The following table reconciles accumulated depreciation per Schedule III to the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data at December 31, 2021 (in thousands):
 
 Total accumulated depreciation per Schedule III  $ 7,451,382  (g)
 Accumulated depreciation on other real estate investments   216,805   
 Total per Consolidated Balance Sheets  $ 7,668,187  
 
 
(d) Properties with an aggregate undepreciated cost of $ 1.3 billion secure $ 397.2  million of mortgage notes. See Note 8 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for more information related to our
secured mortgage debt.
 
(e) Assessment bonds of $ 9.6 million are secured by assessments (similar to property taxes) on various underlying real estate
properties with an aggregate undepreciated cost of $ 638.7  million. The assessment bonds are included in term loans and
unsecured other debt in Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data.
 
(f) Date of construction is provided for properties in the development portfolio that were completed but not yet stabilized.
 
(g) The following table summarizes our real estate assets and accumulated depreciation per Schedule III for the years ended
December 31 (in thousands):
 
   2021   2020   2019  
 Real estate assets:             
 Balance at beginning of year  $45,390,230   $33,157,100   $32,774,956  
 Acquisitions of and improvements to operating properties, development
     activity and net ef fect of changes in foreign exchange rates and other   3,351,730    13,985,898    2,821,919  
 Basis of operating properties disposed of   (1,589,527 )  (1,045,128 )  (1,471,764 )
 Change in the development portfolio balance, including the acquisition of
     properties   846,729    13,345    (273,534 )
 Assets transferred to held for sale and contribution   (816,062 )  (720,985 )  (694,477 )
 Balance at end year  $47,183,100   $45,390,230   $33,157,100  
              
 Accumulated depreciation:             
 Balance at beginning of year  $6,370,341   $5,294,212   $4,550,958  
 Depreciation expense   1,143,758    1,112,075    843,872  
 Balances retired upon disposition of operating properties and net ef fect of
     changes in foreign exchange rates and other   (42,483 )  (35,083 )  (77,583 )
 Assets transferred to held for sale and contribution   (20,234 )  (863)  (23,035 )
 Balance at end of year  $7,451,382   $6,370,341   $5,294,212
 
 
 
 
101
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
Certain of the following documents are filed herewith. Certain other of the following documents that have been previously filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission and, pursuant to Rule 12b-32, are incorporated herein by reference.
   
2.1a  Amended and Restated Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of August 20, 2019, among Industrial Property Trust
Inc., Prologis, L.P . and Rockies Acquisition LLC. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.2 to Prologis’  Current Report
From 8-K/A  filed on August 23, 2019).
 
2.2a  Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of July 15, 2019, by and among Prologis, L.P ., Rockies Acquisition LLC, and
Industrial Property Trust Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Prologis’  Current Report From 8-K filed on
July 15, 2019).
 
2.3a  Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of October 27, 2019, by and among the Prologis Parties and the Liberty
Parties. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Prologis’  Current Report form 8-K filed on October 27, 2019).
 
3.1
 Articles of Incorporation of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on
Form S-11/A  (No. 333-35915) filed November 4, 1997).
 
3.2  Articles Supplementary establishing and fixing the rights and preferences of the Series Q Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form 8-A
filed June 2, 2011).
 
3.3  Articles of Merger of New Pumpkin Inc., a Maryland corporation, with and into Prologis, Inc., a Maryland corporation,
changing the name of “AMB Property Corporation” to “Prologis, Inc.”, as filed with the Stated Department of
Assessments and Taxation of Maryland on June 2, 2011, and ef fective June 3, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.4  Articles of Amendment (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 8,
2012).
 
3.5  Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.6 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.6  First Amendment to Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P ., dated
February 27, 2014, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February
27, 2014).
 
3.7  Second Amendment to the Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of the Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P .,
dated October 7, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
October 13, 2015).
 
3.8  Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.7 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.9  Articles Supplementary dated April 3, 2014, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on April 3, 2014).
 
3.10  Third Amendment to Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P .
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 4, 2020).
 
3.11  Prologis, Inc. Articles of Amendment, dated May 4, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report Form 8-K filed on May 4, 2020).
 
3.12  Ninth Amended and Restated Bylaws of Prologis, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 24, 2021).
 
4.1†  Description of Registrant’ s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
 
4.2  Form of Certificate for Common Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Registration
Statement on Form S-4/A  (No. 333-172741) filed April 12, 2011).
 
4.3  Form of Certificate for the Series Q Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form S-4/A  (No. 333-172741) filed April 28, 2011).
 
102
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
4.4  Indenture, dated as of June 8, 2011, by and among the Operating Partnership, as issuer , Prologis, as guarantor , and
U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Registration
Statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-177112) filed September 30, 2011).
 
4.5  Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 15, 2013, among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank
National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 15,
2013).
 
4.6  Form of Sixth Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., Elavon Financial Services Limited, UK
Branch, Elavon Financial Services Limited and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed December 2, 2013).
 
4.7  Form of Seventh Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., Elavon Financial Services Limited, UK
Branch, Elavon Financial Services Limited and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 18, 2014).
 
4.8  Form of Eighth Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., U.S. Bank National Association and
Elavon Financial Services DAC, UK Branch (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form
8-K filed on June 6, 2017).
 
4.9  Indenture dated as of August 1, 2018 among Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A
filed on August 1, 2018).
 
4.10  First Supplemental Indenture dated as of August 1, 2018 among Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P ., U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee, transfer agent and security registrar and Elavon Financial Services DAC, UK Branch,
as paying agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A  filed on
August 1, 2018).
 
4.11  Form of lndenture dated as of September 25, 2018 among Prologis Yen Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.12  Form of First Supplemental Indenture dated as of September 25, 2018 among Prologis Yen Finance LLC, Prologis,
L.P., U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee, transfer agent, paying agent and security registrar (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.13  Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of March 26, 2019 among Prologis Yen Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and
U.S. Bank National Association as trustee, transfer agent, paying agent and security registrar (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on April 23, 2019).
 
4.14  Form of 4.250% Notes due 2023 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K
filed August 15, 2013).
 
4.15  Form of 3.000% Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K
filed December 2, 2013).
 
4.16  Form of 3.00% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on May 28, 2014).
 
4.17  Form of 2.250% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on June 6, 2017).
 
4.18  Form of 3.875% Notes Due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on June 20, 2018).
 
4.19  Form of 4.375% Notes Due 2048 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on June 20, 2018).
 
4.20  Form of 1.875% Notes Due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on July 31, 2018).
 
4.21  Form of 0.652% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
103
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
4.22  Form of 0.972% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.23  Form of 1.077% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.24  Form of 1.470% Notes due 2038 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.25  Form of 1.15% Notes due 2039 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 10-Q filed
on April 23, 2019).
 
4.26  Form of 0.250% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Registration Statement 8-A12B
filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.27  Form of 0.625% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Registration Statement 8-A12B
filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.28  Form of 1.500% Notes due 2049 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis’  Registration Statement 8-A12B
filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.29  Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 3.00% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 28, 2014).
 
4.30  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 2.250% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 6, 2017).
 
4.31 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 3.875% Notes Due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on June 20, 2018).
 
4.32 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 4.375% Notes Due 2048 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on June 20, 2018).
 
4.33 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 0.652% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.34 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 0.972% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.35 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 1.077% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018) .
 
4.36 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 1.470% Notes due 2038 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018) .
 
4.37 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 1.875% Notes Due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A  filed on August 1, 2018).
 
4.38 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 1.15% Notes due 2039 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 10-Q filed in April 23, 2019).
 
4.39 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 0.250% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Prologis’  Registration Statement 8-A12B filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.40 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 0.625% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to
Prologis’  Registration Statement 8-A12B filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.41 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 1.500% Notes due 2049 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
Prologis’  Registration Statement 8-A12B filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.42 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.375% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
104
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
4.43 Form of 0.375% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on
Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.44 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.000% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis
L.P.’s Registration Statement on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.45 Form of 1.000% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on
Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.46 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the Floating Rates Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.47 Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement
on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.48 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 3.250% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.49 Form of 3.250% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.50 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 4.375% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.51 Form of 4.375% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.52 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 2.125% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.53 Form of 2.125% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.54 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 2.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.55 Form of 2.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.56 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 3.000% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.57 Form of 3.000% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.58 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.589% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.59 Form of 0.589% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.60 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.850% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.61 Form of 0.850% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.62 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.003% Notes due 2032 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.63 Form of 1.003% Notes due 2032 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
105
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
4.64 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.222% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.65 Form of 1.222% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.66 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.600% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.67 Form of 1.600% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.68 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 19, 2020).
 
4.69 Form of 1.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
August 19, 2020).
 
4.70 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 2.125% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 19, 2020).
 
4.71 Form of 2.125% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
August 19, 2020).
 
4.72 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the Floating Rate Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on December 23, 2020).
 
4.73 Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K
filed on December 23, 2020).
 
4.74  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.500% Notes due 2032 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 16, 2021).
 
4.75  Form of 0.500% Notes due 2032 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
February 16, 2021).
 
4.76  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.000% Notes due 2041 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 16, 2021).
 
4.77  Form of 1.000% Notes due 2041 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
February 16, 2021).
 
4.78  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.625% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 19, 2021).
 
4.79  Form of 1.625% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
February 19, 2021).
 
4.80  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.448% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 28, 2021).
 
4.81  Form of 0.448% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 28, 2021).
 
4.82  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.564% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 28, 2021).
 
4.83  Form of 0.564% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 28, 2021).
 
4.84  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 0.885% Notes due 2036 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 28, 2021).
 
106
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
4.85  Form of 0.885% Notes due 2036 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 28, 2021).
 
4.86  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.134% Notes due 2041 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 28, 2021).
 
4.87  Form of 1.134% Notes due 2041 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 28, 2021).
 
4.88  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.550% Notes due 2061 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 28, 2021).
 
4.89  Form of 1.550% Notes due 2061 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed
on June 28, 2021).
 
Other debt instruments are omitted in accordance with Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A) of Registration S-K. Copies of such instruments will be
furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
 
10.1  Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of ProLogis Fraser , L.P., dated as of August 4, 2004
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2004).
 
10.2  Fifteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis 2, L.P ., (f/k/a AMB Property II, L.P .)
dated February 19, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the
year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.3*  Amended and Restated 2002 Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 4, 2006  and also incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the
Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 4, 2006).
 
10.4*  The Amended and Restated 2002 Stock Option and Incentive Plan of AMB Property Corporation and AMB Property ,
L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2007  and also
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15,
2007).
 
10.5*  Prologis Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
December 22, 2011).
 
10.6*  Prologis, Inc. 2016 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form
8-K filed on August 16, 2016).
 
10.7*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2016 Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2
to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 16, 2016).
 
10.8*  Form of Participation Points and L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 27, 2014).
 
10.9*  Second Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2014).
 
10.10*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Second Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 18, 2014).
 
10.11*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General) (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.12*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (L TIP Unit election)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.27 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2015).
 
10.13*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
107
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
10.14*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (Bonus exchange) (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.15*  ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Trust’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed June 2, 2006).
 
10.16*  First Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010).
 
10.17*  Second Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 19, 2010).
 
10.18*  Third Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010).
 
10.19*  Form of Non-Qualified Share Option Award Terms; The Trust 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.25 to the Trust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.20*  Form of Restricted Share Award Terms; ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.27 to the Trust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.21*  Form of Performance Share Award Terms; ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.26 to the Trust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.22*  ProLogis 2000 Share Option Plan for Outside Trustees (as Amended and Restated Ef fective as of December 31, 2008)
(incorporated by reference to exhibit 10.13 to ProLogis’  Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008).
 
10.23*  ProLogis Deferred Fee Plan for Trustees (As Amended and Restated Ef fective as of May 14, 2010) (incorporated by
reference to exhibit 10.3 to ProLogis’  Form 8-K filed on May 19, 2010).
 
10.24*  Form of Indemnification Agreement between ProLogis and certain directors and executive of ficers (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
10.25*  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement; Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012).
 
10.26*  Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on
Form 8-K filed May 8, 2012).
 
10.27*  Form of Director Deferred Stock Unit Award terms (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report
on Form 8-K filed May 8, 2012).
 
10.28*  Form of Change of Control and Noncompetition Agreement by and between Prologis, Inc. and its executive of ficers
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 16, 2013).
 
10.29*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General form 2015) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.57 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.30*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Bonus exchange) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2015).
 
10.31*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General form 2016) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.48 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015).
 
10.32*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Exchange Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.58 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.33*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan Equity Exchange Of fer LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.59 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.34*  Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. 2011 Notional Account Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.60 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
108
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
10.35*  Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.61 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.36*  Second Amended and Restated Prologis 2005 Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.62 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.37*  Prologis, Inc. 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-
K filed on January 18, 2018).
 
10.38*  Prologis, Inc. Amended and Restated 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 27, 2018).
 
10.39*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2018 Amendment to Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreements (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 27, 2018).
 
10.40*  Amended and Restated Director Deferred Stock Unit Award Terms (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2018).
 
10.41  Form of Time-Sharing Agreement for Hamid Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 10-Q filed on October 22, 2018).
 
10.42*  Prologis, Inc. Second Amended and Restated 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.43*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.44*  Form of L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Bonus Exchange) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’  Current
Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.45*  Form of L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Omnibus) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Prologis’  Current Report
Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.46*  Form of RSU Agreement (Global) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on August 28, 2018).
 
10.47*  Form of RSU Agreement (L TIP Unit Election) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’  Current Report
Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.48*  Form of NEO Retirement Eligibility W aiver (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to Prologis’  Current Report Form
8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.49  Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 18, 2016 among Prologis GK Holdings Y.K., as borrower , Prologis, Inc. and
Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, the banks listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on August 22, 2016).
 
10.50  Guaranty of Payment dated as of August 18, 2016 among Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, and
Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the
Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 18, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 22, 2016).
 
10.51  Letter Agreement dated February 3, 2017 by and between Prologis, Inc. and Hamid R. Moghadam (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 3, 2017).
 
10.52  Fifth Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2017, among Prologis Marunouchi
Finance Investment Limited Partnership, as initial borrower , Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, the lenders
listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 21, 2017).
 
10.53  Guaranty of Payment, date as of February 16, 2017, among Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the Fifth Amend
and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 22, 2017).
 
109
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
10.54  Amended and Restated Senior Term Loan Agreement dated as of May 4, 2017 among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P .,
various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K on May 8, 2017).
 
10.55  Second Amended and Restated Global Senior Credit Agreement, dated as of January 16, 2019, by and among
Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Global
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K on January 16,
2019).
 
10.56  Term Loan Agreement dated as of March 4, 2019 among Prologis GK Holdings Y.K., as borrower , Prologis, L.P ., as
guarantor , the lenders party thereto, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 6, 2019).
 
10.57  Guaranty of Payment dated as of March 4, 2019 between Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the lenders that are from time to time parties to the Term Loan Agreement
dated as of March 4, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
March 6, 2019).
 
10.58  Amended and Restated Change in Control and Noncompetition Agreement, dated April 30, 2019, between Prologis,
Inc. and Hamid R. Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report From 8-K filed on
May 3, 2019).
 
10.59  Form of Retirement Eligibility W aiver Amendment for Hamid Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on December 10, 2019).
 
10.60  Form of Retirement Eligibility W aiver Amendment for Named Executive Of ficers (other than Hamid Moghadam)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on December 10, 2019).
 
10.61  Prologis, Inc. 2020 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report
Form 8-K filed on May 4, 2020).
 
10.62  Sixth Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2020, among Prologis Marunouchi
Finance Investment Limited Partnership, as initial borrower , Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , the lenders listed on the
signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on July 14, 2020).
 
10.63  Guaranty of Payment, dated as of July 10, 2020, between Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the Sixth Amended and
Restated Revolving Credit Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K
filed on July 14, 2020).
 
10.64*  Form of First Amendment to Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. 2011 Notional Account Deferred Compensation Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.65*  Form of L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Omnibus 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current
Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.66*  Form of L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Bonus Exchange 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.67*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement for Named Executive Of ficers (2020) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.68*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.69*  Form of Deferred Compensation L TIP Unit Award Agreement (2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.70*  Form of RSU Agreement (Global 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K
filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.71*  Form of RSU Agreement (Bonus Exchange 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to Prologis’  Current Report
Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
110
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
10.72*  Form of RSU Agreement (L TIP Unit Election 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 to Prologis’  Current
Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
 
10.73  Global Senior Credit Agreement dated as of April 15, 2021 among Prologis, L.P ., various af filiates of Prologis, L.P .,
various lenders and agents, and Bank of America, N.A., as Global Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on April 16, 2021).
 
10.74  First Amendment to Sixth Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of October 1, 2021, among
Prologis Marunouchi Finance Investment Limited Partnership, as initial borrower , Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , the
lenders listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 10-Q filed on October 26, 2021).
 
10.75  First Amendment to Term Loan Agreement, dated as of October 1, 2021 among Prologis GK Holdings Y.K, as borrower ,
Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , the lenders party thereto, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative
Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 10-Q filed on October 26, 2021).
 
10.76  First Amendment, dated as of September 20, 2021, to the Global Senior Credit Agreement dated as of April 15, 2021,
among Prologis, L.P ., various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Global
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 10-Q filed on October
26, 2021).
 
10.77  First Amendment, dated as of September 20, 2021, to the Global Senior Credit Agreement dated as of January 16,
2019, among Prologis, L.P ., various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 10-Q filed on October
26, 2021).
 
10.78 *  Third Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 2, 2021).
 
21.1†  Subsidiaries of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .
 
22.1†  Subsidiary guarantors and issuers of guaranteed securities.
 
23.1†  Consent of KPMG LLP  with respect to Prologis, Inc.
 
23.2†  Consent of KPMG LLP  with respect to Prologis, L.P .
 
24.1†  Power of Attorney for Prologis, Inc. (included in signature page of this annual report).
 
24.2†  Power of Attorney for Prologis, L.P . (included in signature page of this annual report).
 
31.1†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of Prologis, Inc.
 
31.2†  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of Prologis, Inc.
 
31.3†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer for Prologis, L.P .
 
31.4†  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer for Prologis, L.P .
 
32.1†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer of Prologis, Inc., pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
32.2†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer for Prologis, L.P ., pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
99.1  Supplemental United States Federal Income Tax Considerations (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 20, 2016).
 
99.2  Blackout Notice provided to directors and executive of ficers of Prologis. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed November 22, 2019).
 
101. INS†  Inline XBRL  Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL  Document.
 
111
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
101. SCH†  Inline XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema
 
101. CAL†  Inline XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
 
101. DEF†  Inline XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
 
101. LAB†  Inline XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
 
101. PRE†  Inline XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase
 
104  Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL  and contained in Exhibit 101).
 
 
* Management Contract or Compensatory Plan or Arrangement
† Filed herewith
a Prologis has omitted certain schedules and exhibits pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K and shall furnish supplementally
to the SEC copies of any of the omitted schedules and exhibits upon request by the SEC.
 
 
 
 
 
 
112
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
SIGNA TURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
   
By: /s/ Hamid R. Moghadam
  Hamid R. Moghadam
  Chief Executive Of ficer
 
Date: February 9, 2022
 
POWER OF ATTORNEY
 
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY  THESE PRESENTS, that we, the undersigned of ficers and directors of Prologis, Inc., hereby severally
constitute Hamid R. Moghadam, Thomas S. Olinger and Edward S. Nekritz, and each of them singly , our true and lawful attorneys with
full power to them, and each of them singly , to sign for us and in our names in the capacities indicated below , the Form 10-K filed
herewith and any and all amendments to said Form 10-K, and generally to do all such things in our names and in our capacities as
officers and directors to enable Prologis, Inc. to comply with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and all requirements
of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming our signatures as they may be signed by our said
attorneys, or any of them, to said Form 10-K and any and all amendments thereto.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 
Signature  Title  Date
     
/s/ Hamid R. Moghadam  Chairman of the Board and Chief
Executive Of ficer February 9, 2022
Hamid R. Moghadam   
     
/s/ Thomas S. Olinger  Chief Financial Of ficer  February 9, 2022
Thomas S. Olinger   
     
/s/ Lori A. Palazzolo  Managing Director and Chief Accounting
Officer February 9, 2022
Lori A. Palazzolo   
     
/s/ Cristina G. Bita  Director  February 9, 2022
Cristina G. Bita   
     
/s/ George L. Fotiades  Director  February 9, 2022
George L. Fotiades   
     
/s/ Lydia H. Kennard  Director  February 9, 2022
Lydia H. Kennard     
     
/s/ Irving F . Lyons III  Director  February 9, 2022
Irving F . Lyons III   
     
/s/ Avid Modjtabai  Director  February 9, 2022
Avid Modjtabai     
     
/s/ David P . O’Connor  Director  February 9, 2022
David P . O’Connor     
     
/s/ Olivier Piani  Director  February 9, 2022
Olivier Piani     
     
/s/ Jef frey L. Skelton  Director  February 9, 2022
Jeffrey L. Skelton     
     
/s/ Carl B. W ebb  Director  February 9, 2022
Carl B. W ebb     
     
/s/ William D. Zollars  Director  February 9, 2022
William D. Zollars     
113
Table of Contents
   Index to Item 15
 
 
SIGNA TURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to
be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
By: Prologis, Inc., its general partner
   
By: /s/ Hamid R. Moghadam
  Hamid R. Moghadam
  Chief Executive Of ficer
 
Date: February 9, 2022
 
POWER OF ATTORNEY
 
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY  THESE PRESENTS, that we, the undersigned of ficers and directors of Prologis, L.P ., hereby severally
constitute Hamid R. Moghadam, Thomas S. Olinger and Edward S. Nekritz, and each of them singly , our true and lawful attorneys with
full power to them, and each of them singly , to sign for us and in our names in the capacities indicated below , the Form 10-K filed
herewith and any and all amendments to said Form 10-K, and generally to do all such things in our names and in our capacities as
officers and directors to enable Prologis, L.P . to comply with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and all requirements
of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming our signatures as they may be signed by our said
attorneys, or any of them, to said Form 10-K and any and all amendments thereto.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 
Signature  Title  Date
     
/s/ Hamid R. Moghadam  Chairman of the Board and Chief
Executive Of ficer February 9, 2022
Hamid R. Moghadam   
     
/s/ Thomas S. Olinger  Chief Financial Of ficer  February 9, 2022
Thomas S. Olinger   
     
/s/ Lori A. Palazzolo  Managing Director and Chief Accounting
Officer February 9, 2022
Lori A. Palazzolo   
     
/s/ Cristina G. Bita  Director  February 9, 2022
Cristina G. Bita   
     
/s/ George L. Fotiades  Director  February 9, 2022
George L. Fotiades   
     
/s/ Lydia H. Kennard  Director  February 9, 2022
Lydia H. Kennard     
     
/s/ Irving F . Lyons III  Director  February 9, 2022
Irving F . Lyons III   
     
/s/ Avid Modjtabai  Director  February 9, 2022
Avid Modjtabai     
     
/s/ David P . O’Connor  Director  February 9, 2022
David P . O’Connor     
     
/s/ Olivier Piani  Director  February 9, 2022
Olivier Piani     
     
/s/ Jef frey L. Skelton  Director  February 9, 2022
Jeffrey L. Skelton     
     
/s/ Carl B. W ebb  Director  February 9, 2022
Carl B. W ebb     
     
/s/ William D. Zollars  Director  February 9, 2022
William D. Zollars     
 
114
